Анна устала. поэтому Анна ошибается чаще. почему Анна ошибается чаще? потому что Анна устала.
Ольга голодна. поэтому Ольга ищет еду.
Вера не знает, что будет. поэтому Вера боится. почему Вера боится? потому что Вера не знает, что будет.
почему человек делает не думая то, что делает каждый день? потому что повторение делает действие привычным.
почему человек не видит знака, когда смотрит в другую сторону? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит: когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Пётр получил подарок. значит Пётр радуется.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Борис потерял дорогую ему вещь. значит Борис грустит.
Иван получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Иван злится.
Олег сидит без дела. поэтому Олег скучает. почему Олег скучает? потому что Олег сидит без дела.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Анна много раз повторила слова. значит Анна помнит их лучше.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Вера мало спала. значит Вера устаёт быстрее.
Иван устал. поэтому Иван ошибается чаще. почему Иван ошибается чаще? потому что Иван устал.
Борис голоден. поэтому Борис ищет еду.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Мария не знает, что будет. значит Мария боится.
Анна хочет успеть. поэтому Анна спешит.
Мария делает это каждый день. поэтому Мария делает это не думая. почему Мария делает это не думая? потому что Мария делает это каждый день.
Вера смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Вера не увидела знака.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. почему он грустит? потому что человек теряет дорогую ему вещь.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. почему? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо.
почему, когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает? потому что время без занятия тянется долго.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Олег много раз повторил слова. значит Олег помнит их лучше.
Пётр мало спал. поэтому Пётр устаёт быстрее. почему Пётр устаёт быстрее? потому что Пётр мало спал.
почему человек ошибается чаще, когда устал? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание: когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Пётр голоден. значит Пётр ищет еду.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Борис не знает, что будет. значит Борис боится.
Иван хочет успеть. поэтому Иван спешит.
Олег делает это каждый день. поэтому Олег делает это не думая. почему Олег делает это не думая? потому что Олег делает это каждый день.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Анна смотрела в другую сторону. значит Анна не увидела знака.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Вера получила подарок. значит Вера радуется.
Мария потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Мария грустит.
Ольга получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Ольга злится. почему Ольга злится? потому что Ольга получила несправедливое замечание.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше.
почему люди устают быстрее, когда мало спят? потому что сон восстанавливает силы.
зачем человек учится? чтобы уметь больше.
Вера устала. поэтому Вера ошибается чаще.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. почему он боится? потому что человек не знает, что будет.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. почему? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно.
почему, когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая? потому что повторение делает действие привычным.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Олег смотрел в другую сторону. значит Олег не увидел знака.
Пётр получил подарок. поэтому Пётр радуется. почему Пётр радуется? потому что Пётр получил подарок.
Олег потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Олег грустит.
Борис получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Борис злится. почему Борис злится? потому что Борис получил несправедливое замечание.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Ольга сидит без дела. значит Ольга скучает.
Анна много раз повторила слова. поэтому Анна помнит их лучше. почему Анна помнит их лучше? потому что Анна много раз повторила слова.
Ольга мало спала. поэтому Ольга устаёт быстрее.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Анна устала. значит Анна ошибается чаще.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Вера голодна. значит Вера ищет еду.
Мария не знает, что будет. поэтому Мария боится.
Ольга хочет успеть. поэтому Ольга спешит. почему Ольга спешит? потому что Ольга хочет успеть.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака.
почему люди радуются подаркам? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят.
почему люди грустят, когда теряют дорогие им вещи? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого: когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Иван получил несправедливое замечание. значит Иван злится.
Пётр сидит без дела. поэтому Пётр скучает.
Иван много раз повторил слова. поэтому Иван помнит их лучше. почему Иван помнит их лучше? потому что Иван много раз повторил слова.
Борис мало спал. поэтому Борис устаёт быстрее.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Олег устал. значит Олег ошибается чаще.
Пётр голоден. поэтому Пётр ищет еду. почему Пётр ищет еду? потому что Пётр голоден.
Олег не знает, что будет. поэтому Олег боится.
Борис хочет успеть. поэтому Борис спешит. почему Борис спешит? потому что Борис хочет успеть.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Ольга делает это каждый день. значит Ольга делает это не думая.
Анна смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Анна не увидела знака. почему Анна не увидела знака? потому что Анна смотрела в другую сторону.
Ольга получила подарок. поэтому Ольга радуется.
Вера потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Вера грустит. почему Вера грустит? потому что Вера потеряла дорогую ей вещь.
почему человек скучает, когда сидит без дела? потому что время без занятия тянется долго.
почему человек помнит слова лучше, когда много раз их повторяет? потому что повторение укрепляет память: когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Пётр мало спал. значит Пётр устаёт быстрее.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще.
почему люди ищут еду, когда голодны? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает.
почему люди боятся неизвестного? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть: когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Иван хочет успеть. значит Иван спешит.
Пётр делает это каждый день. поэтому Пётр делает это не думая.
Иван смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Иван не увидел знака. почему Иван не увидел знака? потому что Иван смотрел в другую сторону.
Борис получил подарок. поэтому Борис радуется.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Мария потеряла дорогую ей вещь. значит Мария грустит.
Анна получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Анна злится.
Мария сидит без дела. поэтому Мария скучает. почему Мария скучает? потому что Мария сидит без дела.
Вера много раз повторила слова. поэтому Вера помнит их лучше.
зачем люди спят? чтобы отдохнуть.

anna is tired. therefore anna makes more mistakes. why does anna make more mistakes? because anna is tired.
kate is hungry. therefore kate looks for food.
jane does not know what will happen. therefore jane is afraid. why is jane afraid? because jane does not know what will happen.
why does a person do without thinking what they do every day? because repetition makes an action a habit.
why does a person not see the sign when looking the other way? because a person sees only what they look at: when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. peter got a gift. so peter is glad.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. mark lost something dear. so mark is sad.
ivan got an unfair remark. therefore ivan is angry.
john has nothing to do. therefore john is bored. why is john bored? because john has nothing to do.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. anna repeated the words many times. so anna remembers them better.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. jane slept little. so jane gets tired faster.
ivan is tired. therefore ivan makes more mistakes. why does ivan make more mistakes? because ivan is tired.
mark is hungry. therefore mark looks for food.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. mary does not know what will happen. so mary is afraid.
anna wants to be in time. therefore anna hurries.
mary does it every day. therefore mary does it without thinking. why does mary do it without thinking? because mary does it every day.
jane looked the other way. therefore jane did not see the sign.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. why is that person sad? because a person loses something dear.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. why? because a person expects to be treated fairly.
why, when a person has nothing to do, is that person bored? because time without an occupation seems long.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. john repeated the words many times. so john remembers them better.
peter slept little. therefore peter gets tired faster. why does peter get tired faster? because peter slept little.
why does a person make more mistakes when tired? because tiredness weakens attention: when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. peter is hungry. so peter looks for food.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. mark does not know what will happen. so mark is afraid.
ivan wants to be in time. therefore ivan hurries.
john does it every day. therefore john does it without thinking. why does john do it without thinking? because john does it every day.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. anna looked the other way. so anna did not see the sign.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. jane got a gift. so jane is glad.
mary lost something dear. therefore mary is sad.
kate got an unfair remark. therefore kate is angry. why is kate angry? because kate got an unfair remark.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better.
why do people get tired faster when they sleep little? because sleep restores strength.
why does a person study? in order to be able to do more.
jane is tired. therefore jane makes more mistakes.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. why is that person afraid? because a person does not know what will happen.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. why? because less time is left than is needed.
why, when a person does something every day, does that person do it without thinking? because repetition makes an action a habit.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. john looked the other way. so john did not see the sign.
peter got a gift. therefore peter is glad. why is peter glad? because peter got a gift.
john lost something dear. therefore john is sad.
mark got an unfair remark. therefore mark is angry. why is mark angry? because mark got an unfair remark.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. kate has nothing to do. so kate is bored.
anna repeated the words many times. therefore anna remembers them better. why does anna remember them better? because anna repeated the words many times.
kate slept little. therefore kate gets tired faster.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. anna is tired. so anna makes more mistakes.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. jane is hungry. so jane looks for food.
mary does not know what will happen. therefore mary is afraid.
kate wants to be in time. therefore kate hurries. why does kate hurry? because kate wants to be in time.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign.
why are people glad to get gifts? because a gift shows that someone remembers them.
why are people sad when they lose something dear? because they miss what was dear to them: when a person loses something dear, that person is sad.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. ivan got an unfair remark. so ivan is angry.
peter has nothing to do. therefore peter is bored.
ivan repeated the words many times. therefore ivan remembers them better. why does ivan remember them better? because ivan repeated the words many times.
mark slept little. therefore mark gets tired faster.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. john is tired. so john makes more mistakes.
peter is hungry. therefore peter looks for food. why does peter look for food? because peter is hungry.
john does not know what will happen. therefore john is afraid.
mark wants to be in time. therefore mark hurries. why does mark hurry? because mark wants to be in time.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. kate does it every day. so kate does it without thinking.
anna looked the other way. therefore anna did not see the sign. why did anna not see the sign? because anna looked the other way.
kate got a gift. therefore kate is glad.
jane lost something dear. therefore jane is sad. why is jane sad? because jane lost something dear.
why is a person bored when they have nothing to do? because time without an occupation seems long.
why does a person remember words better when they repeat them many times? because repetition strengthens memory: when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. peter slept little. so peter gets tired faster.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes.
why do people look for food when they are hungry? because the body asks for what it lacks.
why do people fear the unknown? because the unknown cannot be foreseen: when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. ivan wants to be in time. so ivan hurries.
peter does it every day. therefore peter does it without thinking.
ivan looked the other way. therefore ivan did not see the sign. why did ivan not see the sign? because ivan looked the other way.
mark got a gift. therefore mark is glad.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. mary lost something dear. so mary is sad.
anna got an unfair remark. therefore anna is angry.
mary has nothing to do. therefore mary is bored. why is mary bored? because mary has nothing to do.
jane repeated the words many times. therefore jane remembers them better.
why do people sleep? in order to rest.

Maria ist müde. deshalb macht Maria mehr Fehler.
warum fürchten Menschen das Unbekannte? weil man das Unbekannte nicht vorhersehen kann.
Paul will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Paul sich. warum beeilt Paul sich? weil Paul rechtzeitig kommen will.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Eva macht es jeden Tag. also macht Eva es ohne nachzudenken.
Lena hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Lena das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Lena das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Lena weggeschaut hat.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Jonas hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Jonas traurig.
Felix hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Felix.
Maria hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Maria. warum langweilt sich Maria? weil Maria nichts zu tun hat.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. warum? weil Schlaf die Kräfte wiederherstellt.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Max ist hungrig. also sucht Max Essen.
Felix weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Felix Angst. warum hat Felix Angst? weil Felix nicht weiß, was kommt.
Eva will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Eva sich.
warum sieht ein Mensch das Zeichen nicht, wenn er wegschaut? weil ein Mensch nur sieht, wohin er schaut: wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht.
Jonas hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Jonas. warum freut sich Jonas? weil Jonas ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
Anna hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Anna traurig.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. warum langweilt er sich? weil ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Felix hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Felix sie sich besser.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Anna hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Anna schneller müde.
Max ist müde. deshalb macht Max mehr Fehler.
Anna ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Anna Essen. warum sucht Anna Essen? weil Anna hungrig ist.
warum beeilt sich ein Mensch, wenn er rechtzeitig kommen will? weil weniger Zeit bleibt als nötig ist.
Paul macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Paul es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Maria hat weggeschaut. also hat Maria das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Lena hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Lena.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Paul hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Paul.
Max hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Max. warum langweilt sich Max? weil Max nichts zu tun hat.
Maria hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Maria sie sich besser.
wozu isst ein Mensch? um nicht hungrig zu sein.
Lena ist müde. deshalb macht Lena mehr Fehler. warum macht Lena mehr Fehler? weil Lena müde ist.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Jonas weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Jonas Angst.
Felix will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Felix sich.
Maria macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Maria es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Maria es ohne nachzudenken? weil Maria es jeden Tag macht.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. warum? weil ein Geschenk zeigt, dass jemand an ihn denkt.
Jonas hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Jonas traurig.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Lena hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Lena.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Max hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Max schneller müde.
warum macht ein Mensch mehr Fehler, wenn er müde ist? weil Müdigkeit die Aufmerksamkeit schwächt: wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler.
Jonas ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Jonas Essen. warum sucht Jonas Essen? weil Jonas hungrig ist.
Anna weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Anna Angst.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht er es ohne nachzudenken? weil ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Felix hat weggeschaut. also hat Felix das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Anna hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Anna.
Eva hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Eva traurig. warum ist Eva traurig? weil Eva etwas Liebes verloren hat.
warum langweilen sich Menschen, wenn sie nichts zu tun haben? weil Zeit ohne Beschäftigung lang wird: wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich.
Max hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Max sie sich besser.
Anna hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Anna schneller müde. warum wird Anna schneller müde? weil Anna wenig geschlafen hat.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Maria ist müde. also macht Maria mehr Fehler.
Lena ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Lena Essen.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Paul will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Paul sich.
Max macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Max es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Max es ohne nachzudenken? weil Max es jeden Tag macht.
Maria hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Maria das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
warum sind Menschen traurig, wenn sie etwas Liebes verlieren? weil ihm fehlt, was ihm lieb war.
Paul hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Paul. warum ärgert sich Paul? weil Paul eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Eva hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Eva.
Lena hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Lena sie sich besser. warum merkt Lena sie sich besser? weil Lena die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
Menschen lernen. wozu lernen Menschen? um mehr zu können.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. warum? weil der Körper verlangt, was ihm fehlt.
Jonas weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Jonas Angst.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Lena will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Lena sich.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Max hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Max.
Felix hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Felix traurig. warum ist Felix traurig? weil Felix etwas Liebes verloren hat.
Eva hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Eva.
warum merkt sich ein Mensch Wörter besser, wenn er sie oft wiederholt? weil Wiederholung das Gedächtnis stärkt: wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser.
Jonas hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Jonas schneller müde. warum wird Jonas schneller müde? weil Jonas wenig geschlafen hat.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Felix ist müde. also macht Felix mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Anna ist hungrig. also sucht Anna Essen.
Eva weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Eva Angst. warum hat Eva Angst? weil Eva nicht weiß, was kommt.
warum machen Menschen ohne nachzudenken, was sie jeden Tag machen? weil Wiederholung eine Handlung zur Gewohnheit macht: wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken.
Max hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Max das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Anna hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Anna. warum freut sich Anna? weil Anna ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
warum ärgert sich ein Mensch, wenn er eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt? weil ein Mensch erwartet, gerecht behandelt zu werden.
Paul hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Paul.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Maria hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Maria sie sich besser.
Lena hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Lena schneller müde.

Anne est fatiguée. donc Anne fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Anne fait plus d'erreurs ? parce qu'Anne est fatiguée.
Julie a faim. donc Julie cherche à manger.
Claire ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Claire a peur. pourquoi Claire a peur ? parce que Claire ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
pourquoi une personne fait-elle sans réfléchir ce qu'elle fait chaque jour ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel.
pourquoi une personne ne voit-elle pas le signe quand elle regarde ailleurs ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde: quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Paul a reçu un cadeau. donc Paul est content.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Hugo a perdu une chose chère. donc Hugo est triste.
Louis a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Louis est en colère.
Jules n'a rien à faire. donc Jules s'ennuie. pourquoi Jules s'ennuie ? parce que Jules n'a rien à faire.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Anne a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Anne les retient mieux.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Claire a peu dormi. donc Claire se fatigue plus vite.
Louis est fatigué. donc Louis fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Louis fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Louis est fatigué.
Hugo a faim. donc Hugo cherche à manger.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Marie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Marie a peur.
Anne veut arriver à temps. donc Anne se dépêche.
Marie le fait chaque jour. donc Marie le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Marie le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Marie le fait chaque jour.
Claire regardait ailleurs. donc Claire n'a pas vu le signe.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. pourquoi elle est triste ? parce qu'une personne perd une chose chère.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. pourquoi ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice.
pourquoi, quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Jules a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Jules les retient mieux.
Paul a peu dormi. donc Paul se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Paul se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Paul a peu dormi.
pourquoi une personne fait-elle plus d'erreurs quand elle est fatiguée ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention: quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Paul a faim. donc Paul cherche à manger.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Hugo ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Hugo a peur.
Louis veut arriver à temps. donc Louis se dépêche.
Jules le fait chaque jour. donc Jules le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Jules le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Jules le fait chaque jour.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Anne regardait ailleurs. donc Anne n'a pas vu le signe.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Claire a reçu un cadeau. donc Claire est contente.
Marie a perdu une chose chère. donc Marie est triste.
Julie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Julie est en colère. pourquoi Julie est en colère ? parce que Julie a reçu une remarque injuste.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux.
pourquoi les gens se fatiguent-ils plus vite quand ils dorment peu ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces.
pourquoi une personne apprend ? pour savoir faire plus.
Claire est fatiguée. donc Claire fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. pourquoi elle a peur ? parce qu'une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. pourquoi ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut.
pourquoi, quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Jules regardait ailleurs. donc Jules n'a pas vu le signe.
Paul a reçu un cadeau. donc Paul est content. pourquoi Paul est content ? parce que Paul a reçu un cadeau.
Jules a perdu une chose chère. donc Jules est triste.
Hugo a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Hugo est en colère. pourquoi Hugo est en colère ? parce que Hugo a reçu une remarque injuste.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Julie n'a rien à faire. donc Julie s'ennuie.
Anne a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Anne les retient mieux. pourquoi Anne les retient mieux ? parce qu'Anne a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
Julie a peu dormi. donc Julie se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Anne est fatiguée. donc Anne fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Claire a faim. donc Claire cherche à manger.
Marie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Marie a peur.
Julie veut arriver à temps. donc Julie se dépêche. pourquoi Julie se dépêche ? parce que Julie veut arriver à temps.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe.
pourquoi les gens sont-ils contents de recevoir des cadeaux ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle.
pourquoi les gens sont-ils tristes quand ils perdent une chose chère ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque: quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Louis a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Louis est en colère.
Paul n'a rien à faire. donc Paul s'ennuie.
Louis a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Louis les retient mieux. pourquoi Louis les retient mieux ? parce que Louis a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
Hugo a peu dormi. donc Hugo se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Jules est fatigué. donc Jules fait plus d'erreurs.
Paul a faim. donc Paul cherche à manger. pourquoi Paul cherche à manger ? parce que Paul a faim.
Jules ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Jules a peur.
Hugo veut arriver à temps. donc Hugo se dépêche. pourquoi Hugo se dépêche ? parce que Hugo veut arriver à temps.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Julie le fait chaque jour. donc Julie le fait sans réfléchir.
Anne regardait ailleurs. donc Anne n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Anne n'a pas vu le signe ? parce qu'Anne regardait ailleurs.
Julie a reçu un cadeau. donc Julie est contente.
Claire a perdu une chose chère. donc Claire est triste. pourquoi Claire est triste ? parce que Claire a perdu une chose chère.
pourquoi une personne s'ennuie-t-elle quand elle n'a rien à faire ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long.
pourquoi une personne retient-elle mieux les mots quand elle les répète plusieurs fois ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire: quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Paul a peu dormi. donc Paul se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs.
pourquoi les gens cherchent-ils à manger quand ils ont faim ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque.
pourquoi les gens craignent-ils l'inconnu ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu: quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Louis veut arriver à temps. donc Louis se dépêche.
Paul le fait chaque jour. donc Paul le fait sans réfléchir.
Louis regardait ailleurs. donc Louis n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Louis n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Louis regardait ailleurs.
Hugo a reçu un cadeau. donc Hugo est content.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Marie a perdu une chose chère. donc Marie est triste.
Anne a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Anne est en colère.
Marie n'a rien à faire. donc Marie s'ennuie. pourquoi Marie s'ennuie ? parce que Marie n'a rien à faire.
Claire a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Claire les retient mieux.
pourquoi les gens dorment ? pour se reposer.

Ana está cansada. por eso Ana comete más errores. ¿por qué Ana comete más errores? porque Ana está cansada.
Lucía tiene hambre. por eso Lucía busca comida.
Elena no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Elena tiene miedo. ¿por qué Elena tiene miedo? porque Elena no sabe qué va a pasar.
¿por qué una persona hace sin pensar lo que hace cada día? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre.
¿por qué una persona no ve la señal cuando mira hacia otro lado? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira: cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Pablo recibió un regalo. así que Pablo está contento.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Carlos perdió algo querido. así que Carlos está triste.
Luis recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Luis está enfadado.
Diego no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Diego se aburre. ¿por qué Diego se aburre? porque Diego no tiene nada que hacer.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Ana repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Ana las recuerda mejor.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Elena durmió poco. así que Elena se cansa antes.
Luis está cansado. por eso Luis comete más errores. ¿por qué Luis comete más errores? porque Luis está cansado.
Carlos tiene hambre. por eso Carlos busca comida.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. María no sabe qué va a pasar. así que María tiene miedo.
Ana quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Ana se apresura.
María lo hace cada día. por eso María lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué María lo hace sin pensar? porque María lo hace cada día.
Elena miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Elena no vio la señal.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. ¿por qué está triste? porque una persona pierde algo querido.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. ¿por qué? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia.
¿por qué, cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Diego repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Diego las recuerda mejor.
Pablo durmió poco. por eso Pablo se cansa antes. ¿por qué Pablo se cansa antes? porque Pablo durmió poco.
¿por qué una persona comete más errores cuando está cansada? porque el cansancio debilita la atención: cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Pablo tiene hambre. así que Pablo busca comida.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Carlos no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Carlos tiene miedo.
Luis quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Luis se apresura.
Diego lo hace cada día. por eso Diego lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Diego lo hace sin pensar? porque Diego lo hace cada día.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Ana miraba hacia otro lado. así que Ana no vio la señal.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Elena recibió un regalo. así que Elena está contenta.
María perdió algo querido. por eso María está triste.
Lucía recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Lucía está enfadada. ¿por qué Lucía está enfadada? porque Lucía recibió un comentario injusto.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué la gente se cansa antes cuando duerme poco? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas.
¿por qué una persona estudia? para saber hacer más.
Elena está cansada. por eso Elena comete más errores.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. ¿por qué tiene miedo? porque una persona no sabe qué va a pasar.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. ¿por qué? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta.
¿por qué, cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Diego miraba hacia otro lado. así que Diego no vio la señal.
Pablo recibió un regalo. por eso Pablo está contento. ¿por qué Pablo está contento? porque Pablo recibió un regalo.
Diego perdió algo querido. por eso Diego está triste.
Carlos recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Carlos está enfadado. ¿por qué Carlos está enfadado? porque Carlos recibió un comentario injusto.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Lucía no tiene nada que hacer. así que Lucía se aburre.
Ana repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Ana las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Ana las recuerda mejor? porque Ana repitió las palabras muchas veces.
Lucía durmió poco. por eso Lucía se cansa antes.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Ana está cansada. así que Ana comete más errores.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Elena tiene hambre. así que Elena busca comida.
María no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso María tiene miedo.
Lucía quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Lucía se apresura. ¿por qué Lucía se apresura? porque Lucía quiere llegar a tiempo.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal.
¿por qué la gente se alegra de recibir regalos? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella.
¿por qué la gente está triste cuando pierde algo querido? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido: cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Luis recibió un comentario injusto. así que Luis está enfadado.
Pablo no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Pablo se aburre.
Luis repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Luis las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Luis las recuerda mejor? porque Luis repitió las palabras muchas veces.
Carlos durmió poco. por eso Carlos se cansa antes.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Diego está cansado. así que Diego comete más errores.
Pablo tiene hambre. por eso Pablo busca comida. ¿por qué Pablo busca comida? porque Pablo tiene hambre.
Diego no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Diego tiene miedo.
Carlos quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Carlos se apresura. ¿por qué Carlos se apresura? porque Carlos quiere llegar a tiempo.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Lucía lo hace cada día. así que Lucía lo hace sin pensar.
Ana miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Ana no vio la señal. ¿por qué Ana no vio la señal? porque Ana miraba hacia otro lado.
Lucía recibió un regalo. por eso Lucía está contenta.
Elena perdió algo querido. por eso Elena está triste. ¿por qué Elena está triste? porque Elena perdió algo querido.
¿por qué una persona se aburre cuando no tiene nada que hacer? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo.
¿por qué una persona recuerda mejor las palabras cuando las repite muchas veces? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria: cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Pablo durmió poco. así que Pablo se cansa antes.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores.
¿por qué la gente busca comida cuando tiene hambre? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta.
¿por qué la gente teme lo desconocido? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever: cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Luis quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Luis se apresura.
Pablo lo hace cada día. por eso Pablo lo hace sin pensar.
Luis miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Luis no vio la señal. ¿por qué Luis no vio la señal? porque Luis miraba hacia otro lado.
Carlos recibió un regalo. por eso Carlos está contento.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. María perdió algo querido. así que María está triste.
Ana recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Ana está enfadada.
María no tiene nada que hacer. por eso María se aburre. ¿por qué María se aburre? porque María no tiene nada que hacer.
Elena repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Elena las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué la gente duerme? para descansar.

Anna è stanca. perciò Anna fa più errori. perché Anna fa più errori? perché Anna è stanca.
Giulia ha fame. perciò Giulia cerca del cibo.
Chiara non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Chiara ha paura. perché Chiara ha paura? perché Chiara non sa che cosa succederà.
perché una persona fa senza pensare ciò che fa ogni giorno? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale.
perché una persona non vede il segnale quando guarda dall'altra parte? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda: quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Marco ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Marco è contento.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Matteo ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Matteo è triste.
Luca ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Luca è arrabbiato.
Paolo non ha niente da fare. perciò Paolo si annoia. perché Paolo si annoia? perché Paolo non ha niente da fare.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Anna ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Anna le ricorda meglio.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Chiara ha dormito poco. quindi Chiara si stanca prima.
Luca è stanco. perciò Luca fa più errori. perché Luca fa più errori? perché Luca è stanco.
Matteo ha fame. perciò Matteo cerca del cibo.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Maria non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Maria ha paura.
Anna vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Anna si affretta.
Maria lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Maria lo fa senza pensare. perché Maria lo fa senza pensare? perché Maria lo fa ogni giorno.
Chiara guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Chiara non ha visto il segnale.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. perché è triste? perché una persona perde una cosa cara.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. perché? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia.
perché, quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Paolo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Paolo le ricorda meglio.
Marco ha dormito poco. perciò Marco si stanca prima. perché Marco si stanca prima? perché Marco ha dormito poco.
perché una persona fa più errori quando è stanca? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione: quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Marco ha fame. quindi Marco cerca del cibo.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Matteo non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Matteo ha paura.
Luca vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Luca si affretta.
Paolo lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Paolo lo fa senza pensare. perché Paolo lo fa senza pensare? perché Paolo lo fa ogni giorno.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Anna guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Anna non ha visto il segnale.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Chiara ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Chiara è contenta.
Maria ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Maria è triste.
Giulia ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Giulia è arrabbiata. perché Giulia è arrabbiata? perché Giulia ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio.
perché le persone si stancano prima quando dormono poco? perché il sonno ridà le forze.
perché una persona studia? per saper fare di più.
Chiara è stanca. perciò Chiara fa più errori.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. perché ha paura? perché una persona non sa che cosa succederà.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. perché? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve.
perché, quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Paolo guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Paolo non ha visto il segnale.
Marco ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Marco è contento. perché Marco è contento? perché Marco ha ricevuto un regalo.
Paolo ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Paolo è triste.
Matteo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Matteo è arrabbiato. perché Matteo è arrabbiato? perché Matteo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Giulia non ha niente da fare. quindi Giulia si annoia.
Anna ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Anna le ricorda meglio. perché Anna le ricorda meglio? perché Anna ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
Giulia ha dormito poco. perciò Giulia si stanca prima.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Anna è stanca. quindi Anna fa più errori.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Chiara ha fame. quindi Chiara cerca del cibo.
Maria non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Maria ha paura.
Giulia vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Giulia si affretta. perché Giulia si affretta? perché Giulia vuole arrivare in tempo.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale.
perché le persone sono contente di ricevere regali? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei.
perché le persone sono tristi quando perdono una cosa cara? perché le manca ciò che le era caro: quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Luca ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Luca è arrabbiato.
Marco non ha niente da fare. perciò Marco si annoia.
Luca ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Luca le ricorda meglio. perché Luca le ricorda meglio? perché Luca ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
Matteo ha dormito poco. perciò Matteo si stanca prima.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Paolo è stanco. quindi Paolo fa più errori.
Marco ha fame. perciò Marco cerca del cibo. perché Marco cerca del cibo? perché Marco ha fame.
Paolo non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Paolo ha paura.
Matteo vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Matteo si affretta. perché Matteo si affretta? perché Matteo vuole arrivare in tempo.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Giulia lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Giulia lo fa senza pensare.
Anna guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Anna non ha visto il segnale. perché Anna non ha visto il segnale? perché Anna guardava dall'altra parte.
Giulia ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Giulia è contenta.
Chiara ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Chiara è triste. perché Chiara è triste? perché Chiara ha perso una cosa cara.
perché una persona si annoia quando non ha niente da fare? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo.
perché una persona ricorda meglio le parole quando le ripete molte volte? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria: quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Marco ha dormito poco. quindi Marco si stanca prima.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori.
perché le persone cercano del cibo quando hanno fame? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca.
perché le persone temono l'ignoto? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere: quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Luca vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Luca si affretta.
Marco lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Marco lo fa senza pensare.
Luca guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Luca non ha visto il segnale. perché Luca non ha visto il segnale? perché Luca guardava dall'altra parte.
Matteo ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Matteo è contento.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Maria ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Maria è triste.
Anna ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Anna è arrabbiata.
Maria non ha niente da fare. perciò Maria si annoia. perché Maria si annoia? perché Maria non ha niente da fare.
Chiara ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Chiara le ricorda meglio.
perché le persone dormono? per riposare.

Ana está cansada. por isso Ana comete mais erros. porque é que Ana comete mais erros? porque Ana está cansada.
Rita tem fome. por isso Rita procura comida.
Sofia não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Sofia tem medo. porque é que Sofia tem medo? porque Sofia não sabe o que vai acontecer.
porque é que uma pessoa faz sem pensar o que faz todos os dias? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual.
porque é que uma pessoa não vê o sinal quando olha para o outro lado? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha: quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Pedro recebeu um presente. portanto Pedro está contente.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. João perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto João está triste.
Tiago recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Tiago está zangado.
Rui não tem nada para fazer. por isso Rui aborrece-se. porque é que Rui aborrece-se? porque Rui não tem nada para fazer.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Ana repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Ana lembra-se melhor delas.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Sofia dormiu pouco. portanto Sofia cansa-se mais depressa.
Tiago está cansado. por isso Tiago comete mais erros. porque é que Tiago comete mais erros? porque Tiago está cansado.
João tem fome. por isso João procura comida.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Maria não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Maria tem medo.
Ana quer chegar a tempo. por isso Ana apressa-se.
Maria fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Maria fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Maria fá-lo sem pensar? porque Maria fá-lo todos os dias.
Sofia olhava para o outro lado. por isso Sofia não viu o sinal.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. porque é que está triste? porque uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. porquê? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Rui repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Rui lembra-se melhor delas.
Pedro dormiu pouco. por isso Pedro cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Pedro cansa-se mais depressa? porque Pedro dormiu pouco.
porque é que uma pessoa comete mais erros quando está cansada? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção: quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Pedro tem fome. portanto Pedro procura comida.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. João não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto João tem medo.
Tiago quer chegar a tempo. por isso Tiago apressa-se.
Rui fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Rui fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Rui fá-lo sem pensar? porque Rui fá-lo todos os dias.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Ana olhava para o outro lado. portanto Ana não viu o sinal.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Sofia recebeu um presente. portanto Sofia está contente.
Maria perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Maria está triste.
Rita recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Rita está zangada. porque é que Rita está zangada? porque Rita recebeu um comentário injusto.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que as pessoas se cansam mais depressa quando dormem pouco? porque o sono repõe as forças.
porque é que uma pessoa estuda? para saber fazer mais.
Sofia está cansada. por isso Sofia comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. porque é que tem medo? porque uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. porquê? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Rui olhava para o outro lado. portanto Rui não viu o sinal.
Pedro recebeu um presente. por isso Pedro está contente. porque é que Pedro está contente? porque Pedro recebeu um presente.
Rui perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Rui está triste.
João recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso João está zangado. porque é que João está zangado? porque João recebeu um comentário injusto.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Rita não tem nada para fazer. portanto Rita aborrece-se.
Ana repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Ana lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Ana lembra-se melhor delas? porque Ana repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
Rita dormiu pouco. por isso Rita cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Ana está cansada. portanto Ana comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Sofia tem fome. portanto Sofia procura comida.
Maria não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Maria tem medo.
Rita quer chegar a tempo. por isso Rita apressa-se. porque é que Rita apressa-se? porque Rita quer chegar a tempo.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal.
porque é que as pessoas ficam contentes com presentes? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela.
porque é que as pessoas ficam tristes quando perdem uma coisa querida? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido: quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Tiago recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Tiago está zangado.
Pedro não tem nada para fazer. por isso Pedro aborrece-se.
Tiago repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Tiago lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Tiago lembra-se melhor delas? porque Tiago repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
João dormiu pouco. por isso João cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Rui está cansado. portanto Rui comete mais erros.
Pedro tem fome. por isso Pedro procura comida. porque é que Pedro procura comida? porque Pedro tem fome.
Rui não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Rui tem medo.
João quer chegar a tempo. por isso João apressa-se. porque é que João apressa-se? porque João quer chegar a tempo.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Rita fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Rita fá-lo sem pensar.
Ana olhava para o outro lado. por isso Ana não viu o sinal. porque é que Ana não viu o sinal? porque Ana olhava para o outro lado.
Rita recebeu um presente. por isso Rita está contente.
Sofia perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Sofia está triste. porque é que Sofia está triste? porque Sofia perdeu uma coisa querida.
porque é que uma pessoa se aborrece quando não tem nada para fazer? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo.
porque é que uma pessoa se lembra melhor das palavras quando as repete muitas vezes? porque a repetição reforça a memória: quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Pedro dormiu pouco. portanto Pedro cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros.
porque é que as pessoas procuram comida quando têm fome? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta.
porque é que as pessoas temem o desconhecido? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever: quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Tiago quer chegar a tempo. portanto Tiago apressa-se.
Pedro fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Pedro fá-lo sem pensar.
Tiago olhava para o outro lado. por isso Tiago não viu o sinal. porque é que Tiago não viu o sinal? porque Tiago olhava para o outro lado.
João recebeu um presente. por isso João está contente.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Maria perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Maria está triste.
Ana recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Ana está zangada.
Maria não tem nada para fazer. por isso Maria aborrece-se. porque é que Maria aborrece-se? porque Maria não tem nada para fazer.
Sofia repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Sofia lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que as pessoas dormem? para descansar.

Maria is moe. daarom maakt Maria meer fouten.
waarom vrezen mensen het onbekende? omdat het onbekende niet te voorzien is.
Piet wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Piet zich. waarom haast Piet zich? omdat Piet op tijd wil komen.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Eva doet het elke dag. dus doet Eva het zonder na te denken.
Lotte keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Lotte het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Lotte het teken niet gezien? omdat Lotte de andere kant op keek.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Jan is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Jan verdrietig.
Tim heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Tim boos.
Maria heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Maria zich. waarom verveelt Maria zich? omdat Maria niets te doen heeft.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. waarom? omdat slaap de krachten herstelt.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Max heeft honger. dus zoekt Max eten.
Tim weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Tim bang. waarom is Tim bang? omdat Tim niet weet wat er komt.
Eva wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Eva zich.
waarom ziet een mens het teken niet als hij de andere kant op kijkt? omdat een mens alleen ziet waar hij naar kijkt: als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet.
Jan heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Jan blij. waarom is Jan blij? omdat Jan een cadeau heeft gekregen.
Anna is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Anna verdrietig.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. waarom verveelt hij zich? omdat een mens niets te doen heeft.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Tim heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Tim ze beter.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Anna heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Anna sneller moe.
Max is moe. daarom maakt Max meer fouten.
Anna heeft honger. daarom zoekt Anna eten. waarom zoekt Anna eten? omdat Anna honger heeft.
waarom haast een mens zich als hij op tijd wil komen? omdat er minder tijd over is dan nodig is.
Piet doet het elke dag. daarom doet Piet het zonder na te denken.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Maria keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Maria het teken niet gezien.
Lotte heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Lotte blij.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Piet heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Piet boos.
Max heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Max zich. waarom verveelt Max zich? omdat Max niets te doen heeft.
Maria heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Maria ze beter.
waarom eet een mens? om geen honger te hebben.
Lotte is moe. daarom maakt Lotte meer fouten. waarom maakt Lotte meer fouten? omdat Lotte moe is.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Jan weet niet wat er komt. dus is Jan bang.
Tim wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Tim zich.
Maria doet het elke dag. daarom doet Maria het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Maria het zonder na te denken? omdat Maria het elke dag doet.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. waarom? omdat een cadeau laat zien dat iemand aan hem denkt.
Jan is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Jan verdrietig.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Lotte heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Lotte boos.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Max heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Max sneller moe.
waarom maakt een mens meer fouten als hij moe is? omdat vermoeidheid de aandacht verzwakt: als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten.
Jan heeft honger. daarom zoekt Jan eten. waarom zoekt Jan eten? omdat Jan honger heeft.
Anna weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Anna bang.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. waarom doet hij het zonder na te denken? omdat een mens iets elke dag doet.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Tim keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Tim het teken niet gezien.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Anna heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Anna blij.
Eva is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Eva verdrietig. waarom is Eva verdrietig? omdat Eva iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
waarom vervelen mensen zich als ze niets te doen hebben? omdat tijd zonder bezigheid lang lijkt: als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich.
Max heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Max ze beter.
Anna heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Anna sneller moe. waarom wordt Anna sneller moe? omdat Anna weinig heeft geslapen.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Maria is moe. dus maakt Maria meer fouten.
Lotte heeft honger. daarom zoekt Lotte eten.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Piet wil op tijd komen. dus haast Piet zich.
Max doet het elke dag. daarom doet Max het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Max het zonder na te denken? omdat Max het elke dag doet.
Maria keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Maria het teken niet gezien.
waarom zijn mensen verdrietig als ze iets dierbaars kwijtraken? omdat hij mist wat hem dierbaar was.
Piet heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Piet boos. waarom is Piet boos? omdat Piet een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Eva heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Eva zich.
Lotte heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Lotte ze beter. waarom onthoudt Lotte ze beter? omdat Lotte de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
mensen leren. waarom leren mensen? om meer te kunnen.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. waarom? omdat het lichaam vraagt wat het mist.
Jan weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Jan bang.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Lotte wil op tijd komen. dus haast Lotte zich.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Max heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Max blij.
Tim is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Tim verdrietig. waarom is Tim verdrietig? omdat Tim iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
Eva heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Eva boos.
waarom onthoudt een mens woorden beter als hij ze vaak herhaalt? omdat herhaling het geheugen versterkt: als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter.
Jan heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Jan sneller moe. waarom wordt Jan sneller moe? omdat Jan weinig heeft geslapen.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Tim is moe. dus maakt Tim meer fouten.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Anna heeft honger. dus zoekt Anna eten.
Eva weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Eva bang. waarom is Eva bang? omdat Eva niet weet wat er komt.
waarom doen mensen zonder na te denken wat ze elke dag doen? omdat herhaling een handeling tot gewoonte maakt: als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken.
Max keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Max het teken niet gezien.
Anna heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Anna blij. waarom is Anna blij? omdat Anna een cadeau heeft gekregen.
waarom is een mens boos als hij een onterechte opmerking krijgt? omdat een mens verwacht eerlijk behandeld te worden.
Piet heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Piet zich.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Maria heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Maria ze beter.
Lotte heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Lotte sneller moe.

Anna jest zmęczona. dlatego Anna popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Anna popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Anna jest zmęczona.
Ewa jest głodna. dlatego Ewa szuka jedzenia.
Zofia nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Zofia się boi. dlaczego Zofia się boi? ponieważ Zofia nie wie, co będzie.
dlaczego człowiek robi bez namysłu to, co robi codziennie? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem.
dlaczego człowiek nie widzi znaku, kiedy patrzy w inną stronę? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy: kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Piotr dostał prezent. więc Piotr się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Adam stracił coś bliskiego. więc Adam jest smutny.
Jan dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Jan się złości.
Marek nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Marek się nudzi. dlaczego Marek się nudzi? ponieważ Marek nie ma nic do roboty.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Anna wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. więc Anna lepiej je pamięta.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Zofia mało spała. więc Zofia szybciej się męczy.
Jan jest zmęczony. dlatego Jan popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Jan popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Jan jest zmęczony.
Adam jest głodny. dlatego Adam szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Maria nie wie, co będzie. więc Maria się boi.
Anna chce zdążyć. dlatego Anna się spieszy.
Maria robi to codziennie. dlatego Maria robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Maria robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Maria robi to codziennie.
Zofia patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Zofia nie zobaczyła znaku.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. dlaczego jest smutny? ponieważ człowiek traci coś bliskiego.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. dlaczego? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Marek wiele razy powtórzył słowa. więc Marek lepiej je pamięta.
Piotr mało spał. dlatego Piotr szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Piotr szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Piotr mało spał.
dlaczego człowiek popełnia więcej błędów, kiedy jest zmęczony? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę: kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Piotr jest głodny. więc Piotr szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Adam nie wie, co będzie. więc Adam się boi.
Jan chce zdążyć. dlatego Jan się spieszy.
Marek robi to codziennie. dlatego Marek robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Marek robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Marek robi to codziennie.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Anna patrzyła w inną stronę. więc Anna nie zobaczyła znaku.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Zofia dostała prezent. więc Zofia się cieszy.
Maria straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Maria jest smutna.
Ewa dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Ewa się złości. dlaczego Ewa się złości? ponieważ Ewa dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie szybciej się męczą, kiedy mało śpią? bo sen przywraca siły.
dlaczego człowiek się uczy? żeby umieć więcej.
Zofia jest zmęczona. dlatego Zofia popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. dlaczego boi się? ponieważ człowiek nie wie, co będzie.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. dlaczego? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Marek patrzył w inną stronę. więc Marek nie zobaczył znaku.
Piotr dostał prezent. dlatego Piotr się cieszy. dlaczego Piotr się cieszy? ponieważ Piotr dostał prezent.
Marek stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Marek jest smutny.
Adam dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Adam się złości. dlaczego Adam się złości? ponieważ Adam dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Ewa nie ma nic do roboty. więc Ewa się nudzi.
Anna wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Anna lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Anna lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Anna wiele razy powtórzyła słowa.
Ewa mało spała. dlatego Ewa szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Anna jest zmęczona. więc Anna popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Zofia jest głodna. więc Zofia szuka jedzenia.
Maria nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Maria się boi.
Ewa chce zdążyć. dlatego Ewa się spieszy. dlaczego Ewa się spieszy? ponieważ Ewa chce zdążyć.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku.
dlaczego ludzie cieszą się z prezentów? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie są smutni, kiedy tracą coś bliskiego? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie: kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Jan dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Jan się złości.
Piotr nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Piotr się nudzi.
Jan wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Jan lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Jan lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Jan wiele razy powtórzył słowa.
Adam mało spał. dlatego Adam szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Marek jest zmęczony. więc Marek popełnia więcej błędów.
Piotr jest głodny. dlatego Piotr szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Piotr szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Piotr jest głodny.
Marek nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Marek się boi.
Adam chce zdążyć. dlatego Adam się spieszy. dlaczego Adam się spieszy? ponieważ Adam chce zdążyć.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Ewa robi to codziennie. więc Ewa robi to bez namysłu.
Anna patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Anna nie zobaczyła znaku. dlaczego Anna nie zobaczyła znaku? ponieważ Anna patrzyła w inną stronę.
Ewa dostała prezent. dlatego Ewa się cieszy.
Zofia straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Zofia jest smutna. dlaczego Zofia jest smutna? ponieważ Zofia straciła coś bliskiego.
dlaczego człowiek nudzi się, kiedy nie ma nic do roboty? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi.
dlaczego człowiek lepiej pamięta słowa, kiedy wiele razy je powtarza? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć: kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Piotr mało spał. więc Piotr szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów.
dlaczego ludzie szukają jedzenia, kiedy są głodni? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje.
dlaczego ludzie boją się nieznanego? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć: kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Jan chce zdążyć. więc Jan się spieszy.
Piotr robi to codziennie. dlatego Piotr robi to bez namysłu.
Jan patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Jan nie zobaczył znaku. dlaczego Jan nie zobaczył znaku? ponieważ Jan patrzył w inną stronę.
Adam dostał prezent. dlatego Adam się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Maria straciła coś bliskiego. więc Maria jest smutna.
Anna dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Anna się złości.
Maria nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Maria się nudzi. dlaczego Maria się nudzi? ponieważ Maria nie ma nic do roboty.
Zofia wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Zofia lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie śpią? żeby odpocząć.

когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Борис устал. значит Борис ошибается чаще.
почему человек боится, когда не знает, что будет? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть.
Анна хочет успеть. поэтому Анна спешит. почему Анна спешит? потому что Анна хочет успеть.
Олег смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Олег не увидел знака.
почему, когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого.
Вера получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Вера злится.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Мария много раз повторила слова. значит Мария помнит их лучше.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. почему он ошибается чаще? потому что человек устал.
Анна голодна. поэтому Анна ищет еду.
Иван хочет успеть. поэтому Иван спешит. почему Иван спешит? потому что Иван хочет успеть.
почему люди не видят знака, когда смотрят в другую сторону? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит: когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака.
Ольга получила подарок. поэтому Ольга радуется. почему Ольга радуется? потому что Ольга получила подарок.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Анна получила несправедливое замечание. значит Анна злится.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Борис много раз повторил слова. значит Борис помнит их лучше.
люди спят. зачем люди спят? чтобы отдохнуть.
Иван голоден. поэтому Иван ищет еду.
почему человек спешит, когда хочет успеть? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно: когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит.
Ольга делает это каждый день. поэтому Ольга делает это не думая.
Борис получил подарок. поэтому Борис радуется. почему Борис радуется? потому что Борис получил подарок.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Олег получил несправедливое замечание. значит Олег злится.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. почему он помнит их лучше? потому что человек много раз повторяет слова.
Анна мало спала. поэтому Анна устаёт быстрее.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. почему? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает.
Мария не знает, что будет. поэтому Мария боится. почему Мария боится? потому что Мария не знает, что будет.
Борис делает это каждый день. поэтому Борис делает это не думая.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Иван получил подарок. значит Иван радуется.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Вера сидит без дела. значит Вера скучает.
Иван мало спал. поэтому Иван устаёт быстрее.
Мария устала. поэтому Мария ошибается чаще.
Олег не знает, что будет. поэтому Олег боится. почему Олег боится? потому что Олег не знает, что будет.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Пётр делает это каждый день. значит Пётр делает это не думая.
Вера смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Вера не увидела знака. почему Вера не увидела знака? потому что Вера смотрела в другую сторону.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Ольга потеряла дорогую ей вещь. значит Ольга грустит.
Пётр сидит без дела. поэтому Пётр скучает. почему Пётр скучает? потому что Пётр сидит без дела.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. почему? потому что сон восстанавливает силы.
Олег устал. поэтому Олег ошибается чаще.
почему, когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть.
Вера хочет успеть. поэтому Вера спешит.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Мария смотрела в другую сторону. значит Мария не увидела знака.
Пётр потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Пётр грустит.
почему люди скучают без дела? потому что время без занятия тянется долго.
Мария много раз повторила слова. поэтому Мария помнит их лучше.
почему люди ошибаются чаще, когда устали? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание: когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще.
Ольга голодна. поэтому Ольга ищет еду. почему Ольга ищет еду? потому что Ольга голодна.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Анна хочет успеть. значит Анна спешит.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Борис смотрел в другую сторону. значит Борис не увидел знака.
почему человек грустит, когда теряет дорогую ему вещь? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого.
Анна получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Анна злится. почему Анна злится? потому что Анна получила несправедливое замечание.
Олег много раз повторил слова. поэтому Олег помнит их лучше.
зачем люди учатся? чтобы уметь больше.
Борис голоден. поэтому Борис ищет еду. почему Борис ищет еду? потому что Борис голоден.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Олег хочет успеть. значит Олег спешит.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. почему он не видит знака? потому что человек смотрит в другую сторону.
Анна получила подарок. поэтому Анна радуется.
Иван получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Иван злится. почему Иван злится? потому что Иван получил несправедливое замечание.
почему люди лучше помнят то, что повторяют? потому что повторение укрепляет память: когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше.
Ольга мало спала. поэтому Ольга устаёт быстрее. почему Ольга устаёт быстрее? потому что Ольга мало спала.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Иван голоден. значит Иван ищет еду.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Вера делает это каждый день. значит Вера делает это не думая.
Иван получил подарок. поэтому Иван радуется.
почему человек злится, когда получает несправедливое замечание? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо: когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится.
Ольга сидит без дела. поэтому Ольга скучает.
Борис мало спал. поэтому Борис устаёт быстрее. почему Борис устаёт быстрее? потому что Борис мало спал.
Вера устала. поэтому Вера ошибается чаще. почему Вера ошибается чаще? потому что Вера устала.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Ольга не знает, что будет. значит Ольга боится.
Пётр делает это каждый день. поэтому Пётр делает это не думая. почему Пётр делает это не думая? потому что Пётр делает это каждый день.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. почему? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят.
Мария потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Мария грустит. почему Мария грустит? потому что Мария потеряла дорогую ей вещь.
Борис сидит без дела. поэтому Борис скучает.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Иван мало спал. значит Иван устаёт быстрее.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Мария устала. значит Мария ошибается чаще.
Пётр не знает, что будет. поэтому Пётр боится.
почему люди делают не думая то, что делают каждый день? потому что повторение делает действие привычным.
Мария смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Мария не увидела знака.
Олег потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Олег грустит. почему Олег грустит? потому что Олег потерял дорогую ему вещь.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Пётр сидит без дела. значит Пётр скучает.
Вера много раз повторила слова. поэтому Вера помнит их лучше. почему Вера помнит их лучше? потому что Вера много раз повторила слова.

when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. mark is tired. so mark makes more mistakes.
why is a person afraid when they do not know what will happen? because the unknown cannot be foreseen.
anna wants to be in time. therefore anna hurries. why does anna hurry? because anna wants to be in time.
john looked the other way. therefore john did not see the sign.
why, when a person loses something dear, is that person sad? because they miss what was dear to them.
jane got an unfair remark. therefore jane is angry.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. mary repeated the words many times. so mary remembers them better.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. why does that person make more mistakes? because a person is tired.
anna is hungry. therefore anna looks for food.
ivan wants to be in time. therefore ivan hurries. why does ivan hurry? because ivan wants to be in time.
why do people not see the sign when they look the other way? because a person sees only what they look at: when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign.
kate got a gift. therefore kate is glad. why is kate glad? because kate got a gift.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. anna got an unfair remark. so anna is angry.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. mark repeated the words many times. so mark remembers them better.
people sleep. why do people sleep? in order to rest.
ivan is hungry. therefore ivan looks for food.
why does a person hurry when they want to be in time? because less time is left than is needed: when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries.
kate does it every day. therefore kate does it without thinking.
mark got a gift. therefore mark is glad. why is mark glad? because mark got a gift.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. john got an unfair remark. so john is angry.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. why does that person remember them better? because a person repeats words many times.
anna slept little. therefore anna gets tired faster.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. why? because the body asks for what it lacks.
mary does not know what will happen. therefore mary is afraid. why is mary afraid? because mary does not know what will happen.
mark does it every day. therefore mark does it without thinking.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. ivan got a gift. so ivan is glad.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. jane has nothing to do. so jane is bored.
ivan slept little. therefore ivan gets tired faster.
mary is tired. therefore mary makes more mistakes.
john does not know what will happen. therefore john is afraid. why is john afraid? because john does not know what will happen.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. peter does it every day. so peter does it without thinking.
jane looked the other way. therefore jane did not see the sign. why did jane not see the sign? because jane looked the other way.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. kate lost something dear. so kate is sad.
peter has nothing to do. therefore peter is bored. why is peter bored? because peter has nothing to do.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. why? because sleep restores strength.
john is tired. therefore john makes more mistakes.
why, when a person does not know what will happen, is that person afraid? because the unknown cannot be foreseen.
jane wants to be in time. therefore jane hurries.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. mary looked the other way. so mary did not see the sign.
peter lost something dear. therefore peter is sad.
why are people bored when they have nothing to do? because time without an occupation seems long.
mary repeated the words many times. therefore mary remembers them better.
why do people make more mistakes when they are tired? because tiredness weakens attention: when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes.
kate is hungry. therefore kate looks for food. why does kate look for food? because kate is hungry.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. anna wants to be in time. so anna hurries.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. mark looked the other way. so mark did not see the sign.
why is a person sad when they lose something dear? because they miss what was dear to them.
anna got an unfair remark. therefore anna is angry. why is anna angry? because anna got an unfair remark.
john repeated the words many times. therefore john remembers them better.
why do people study? in order to be able to do more.
mark is hungry. therefore mark looks for food. why does mark look for food? because mark is hungry.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. john wants to be in time. so john hurries.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. why does that person not see the sign? because a person looks the other way.
anna got a gift. therefore anna is glad.
ivan got an unfair remark. therefore ivan is angry. why is ivan angry? because ivan got an unfair remark.
why do people remember better what they repeat? because repetition strengthens memory: when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better.
kate slept little. therefore kate gets tired faster. why does kate get tired faster? because kate slept little.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. ivan is hungry. so ivan looks for food.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. jane does it every day. so jane does it without thinking.
ivan got a gift. therefore ivan is glad.
why is a person angry when they get an unfair remark? because a person expects to be treated fairly: when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry.
kate has nothing to do. therefore kate is bored.
mark slept little. therefore mark gets tired faster. why does mark get tired faster? because mark slept little.
jane is tired. therefore jane makes more mistakes. why does jane make more mistakes? because jane is tired.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. kate does not know what will happen. so kate is afraid.
peter does it every day. therefore peter does it without thinking. why does peter do it without thinking? because peter does it every day.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. why? because a gift shows that someone remembers them.
mary lost something dear. therefore mary is sad. why is mary sad? because mary lost something dear.
mark has nothing to do. therefore mark is bored.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. ivan slept little. so ivan gets tired faster.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. mary is tired. so mary makes more mistakes.
peter does not know what will happen. therefore peter is afraid.
why do people do without thinking what they do every day? because repetition makes an action a habit.
mary looked the other way. therefore mary did not see the sign.
john lost something dear. therefore john is sad. why is john sad? because john lost something dear.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. peter has nothing to do. so peter is bored.
jane repeated the words many times. therefore jane remembers them better. why does jane remember them better? because jane repeated the words many times.

Paul ist müde. deshalb macht Paul mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. warum? weil man das Unbekannte nicht vorhersehen kann.
Eva will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Eva sich. warum beeilt Eva sich? weil Eva rechtzeitig kommen will.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Eva hat weggeschaut. also hat Eva das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Jonas hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Jonas traurig. warum ist Jonas traurig? weil Jonas etwas Liebes verloren hat.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Paul hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Paul.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde.
Max ist müde. deshalb macht Max mehr Fehler. warum macht Max mehr Fehler? weil Max müde ist.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Max weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Max Angst.
warum macht ein Mensch ohne nachzudenken, was er jeden Tag macht? weil Wiederholung eine Handlung zur Gewohnheit macht.
Maria hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Maria das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Maria das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Maria weggeschaut hat.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Anna hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Anna traurig.
Paul hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Paul. warum langweilt sich Paul? weil Paul nichts zu tun hat.
warum wird ein Mensch schneller müde, wenn er wenig schläft? weil Schlaf die Kräfte wiederherstellt: wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Eva ist müde. also macht Eva mehr Fehler.
Jonas weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Jonas Angst. warum hat Jonas Angst? weil Jonas nicht weiß, was kommt.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Paul macht es jeden Tag. also macht Paul es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich.
Anna hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Anna traurig. warum ist Anna traurig? weil Anna etwas Liebes verloren hat.
Felix hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Felix.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Felix hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Felix schneller müde.
Maria ist müde. deshalb macht Maria mehr Fehler. warum macht Maria mehr Fehler? weil Maria müde ist.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Anna weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Anna Angst.
Paul macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Paul es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Paul es ohne nachzudenken? weil Paul es jeden Tag macht.
warum freut sich ein Mensch, wenn er ein Geschenk bekommt? weil ein Geschenk zeigt, dass jemand an ihn denkt: wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich.
Lena hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Lena traurig.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Lena hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Lena.
Max hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Max schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen.
Anna weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Anna Angst. warum hat Anna Angst? weil Anna nicht weiß, was kommt.
Felix macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Felix es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Felix hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Felix.
warum ärgern sich Menschen über ungerechte Bemerkungen? weil ein Mensch erwartet, gerecht behandelt zu werden.
Eva hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Eva.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Maria hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Maria schneller müde.
warum sucht ein Mensch Essen, wenn er hungrig ist? weil der Körper verlangt, was ihm fehlt: wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen.
Lena weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Lena Angst.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Lena macht es jeden Tag. also macht Lena es ohne nachzudenken.
Max hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Max.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Jonas hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Jonas.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. warum merkt er sie sich besser? weil ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt.
Maria hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Maria schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Felix ist hungrig. also sucht Felix Essen.
warum beeilen sich Menschen, wenn sie rechtzeitig kommen wollen? weil weniger Zeit bleibt als nötig ist.
Eva macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Eva es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Maria hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Maria.
Jonas hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Jonas.
warum merken sich Menschen besser, was sie wiederholen? weil Wiederholung das Gedächtnis stärkt: wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser.
Lena hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Lena schneller müde. warum wird Lena schneller müde? weil Lena wenig geschlafen hat.
Max ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Max Essen.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Jonas will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Jonas sich.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. warum sieht er das Zeichen nicht? weil ein Mensch wegschaut.
Maria hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Maria.
Felix hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Felix. warum ärgert sich Felix? weil Felix eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
Paul hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Paul sie sich besser.
wozu essen Menschen? um nicht hungrig zu sein.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Maria ist hungrig. also sucht Maria Essen.
Jonas will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Jonas sich.
warum sehen Menschen das Zeichen nicht, wenn sie wegschauen? weil ein Mensch nur sieht, wohin er schaut: wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht.
Lena hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Lena. warum freut sich Lena? weil Lena ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
Anna hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Anna.
Max hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Max sie sich besser. warum merkt Max sie sich besser? weil Max die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. warum macht er mehr Fehler? weil ein Mensch müde ist.
Maria ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Maria Essen.
Felix will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Felix sich. warum beeilt Felix sich? weil Felix rechtzeitig kommen will.
Paul hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Paul das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. warum? weil ihm fehlt, was ihm lieb war.
Eva hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Eva. warum ärgert sich Eva? weil Eva eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Eva hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Eva sie sich besser.
warum machen Menschen mehr Fehler, wenn sie müde sind? weil Müdigkeit die Aufmerksamkeit schwächt: wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler.
Lena ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Lena Essen. warum sucht Lena Essen? weil Lena hungrig ist.
Anna will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Anna sich.
Max hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Max das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Max das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Max weggeschaut hat.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Max hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Max traurig.
warum langweilt sich ein Mensch, wenn er nichts zu tun hat? weil Zeit ohne Beschäftigung lang wird.
Maria hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Maria sie sich besser. warum merkt Maria sie sich besser? weil Maria die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.

quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Hugo est fatigué. donc Hugo fait plus d'erreurs.
pourquoi une personne a-t-elle peur quand elle ne sait pas ce qui va arriver ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu.
Anne veut arriver à temps. donc Anne se dépêche. pourquoi Anne se dépêche ? parce qu'Anne veut arriver à temps.
Jules regardait ailleurs. donc Jules n'a pas vu le signe.
pourquoi, quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque.
Claire a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Claire est en colère.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Marie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Marie les retient mieux.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi elle fait plus d'erreurs ? parce qu'une personne est fatiguée.
Anne a faim. donc Anne cherche à manger.
Louis veut arriver à temps. donc Louis se dépêche. pourquoi Louis se dépêche ? parce que Louis veut arriver à temps.
pourquoi les gens ne voient-ils pas le signe quand ils regardent ailleurs ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde: quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe.
Julie a reçu un cadeau. donc Julie est contente. pourquoi Julie est contente ? parce que Julie a reçu un cadeau.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Anne a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Anne est en colère.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Hugo a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Hugo les retient mieux.
les gens dorment. pourquoi les gens dorment ? pour se reposer.
Louis a faim. donc Louis cherche à manger.
pourquoi une personne se dépêche-t-elle quand elle veut arriver à temps ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut: quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche.
Julie le fait chaque jour. donc Julie le fait sans réfléchir.
Hugo a reçu un cadeau. donc Hugo est content. pourquoi Hugo est content ? parce que Hugo a reçu un cadeau.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Jules a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Jules est en colère.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. pourquoi elle les retient mieux ? parce qu'une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois.
Anne a peu dormi. donc Anne se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. pourquoi ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque.
Marie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Marie a peur. pourquoi Marie a peur ? parce que Marie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
Hugo le fait chaque jour. donc Hugo le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Louis a reçu un cadeau. donc Louis est content.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Claire n'a rien à faire. donc Claire s'ennuie.
Louis a peu dormi. donc Louis se fatigue plus vite.
Marie est fatiguée. donc Marie fait plus d'erreurs.
Jules ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Jules a peur. pourquoi Jules a peur ? parce que Jules ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Paul le fait chaque jour. donc Paul le fait sans réfléchir.
Claire regardait ailleurs. donc Claire n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Claire n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Claire regardait ailleurs.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Julie a perdu une chose chère. donc Julie est triste.
Paul n'a rien à faire. donc Paul s'ennuie. pourquoi Paul s'ennuie ? parce que Paul n'a rien à faire.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces.
Jules est fatigué. donc Jules fait plus d'erreurs.
pourquoi, quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu.
Claire veut arriver à temps. donc Claire se dépêche.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Marie regardait ailleurs. donc Marie n'a pas vu le signe.
Paul a perdu une chose chère. donc Paul est triste.
pourquoi les gens s'ennuient-ils quand ils n'ont rien à faire ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long.
Marie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Marie les retient mieux.
pourquoi les gens font-ils plus d'erreurs quand ils sont fatigués ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention: quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs.
Julie a faim. donc Julie cherche à manger. pourquoi Julie cherche à manger ? parce que Julie a faim.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Anne veut arriver à temps. donc Anne se dépêche.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Hugo regardait ailleurs. donc Hugo n'a pas vu le signe.
pourquoi une personne est-elle triste quand elle perd une chose chère ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque.
Anne a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Anne est en colère. pourquoi Anne est en colère ? parce qu'Anne a reçu une remarque injuste.
Jules a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Jules les retient mieux.
pourquoi les gens apprennent ? pour savoir faire plus.
Hugo a faim. donc Hugo cherche à manger. pourquoi Hugo cherche à manger ? parce que Hugo a faim.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Jules veut arriver à temps. donc Jules se dépêche.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. pourquoi elle ne voit pas le signe ? parce qu'une personne regarde ailleurs.
Anne a reçu un cadeau. donc Anne est contente.
Louis a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Louis est en colère. pourquoi Louis est en colère ? parce que Louis a reçu une remarque injuste.
pourquoi les gens retiennent-ils mieux ce qu'ils répètent ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire: quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux.
Julie a peu dormi. donc Julie se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Julie se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Julie a peu dormi.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Louis a faim. donc Louis cherche à manger.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Claire le fait chaque jour. donc Claire le fait sans réfléchir.
Louis a reçu un cadeau. donc Louis est content.
pourquoi une personne est-elle en colère quand elle reçoit une remarque injuste ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice: quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère.
Julie n'a rien à faire. donc Julie s'ennuie.
Hugo a peu dormi. donc Hugo se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Hugo se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Hugo a peu dormi.
Claire est fatiguée. donc Claire fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Claire fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Claire est fatiguée.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Julie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Julie a peur.
Paul le fait chaque jour. donc Paul le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Paul le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Paul le fait chaque jour.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. pourquoi ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle.
Marie a perdu une chose chère. donc Marie est triste. pourquoi Marie est triste ? parce que Marie a perdu une chose chère.
Hugo n'a rien à faire. donc Hugo s'ennuie.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Louis a peu dormi. donc Louis se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Marie est fatiguée. donc Marie fait plus d'erreurs.
Paul ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Paul a peur.
pourquoi les gens font-ils sans réfléchir ce qu'ils font chaque jour ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel.
Marie regardait ailleurs. donc Marie n'a pas vu le signe.
Jules a perdu une chose chère. donc Jules est triste. pourquoi Jules est triste ? parce que Jules a perdu une chose chère.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Paul n'a rien à faire. donc Paul s'ennuie.
Claire a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Claire les retient mieux. pourquoi Claire les retient mieux ? parce que Claire a répété les mots plusieurs fois.

cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Carlos está cansado. así que Carlos comete más errores.
¿por qué una persona tiene miedo cuando no sabe qué va a pasar? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever.
Ana quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Ana se apresura. ¿por qué Ana se apresura? porque Ana quiere llegar a tiempo.
Diego miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Diego no vio la señal.
¿por qué, cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido.
Elena recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Elena está enfadada.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. María repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que María las recuerda mejor.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. ¿por qué comete más errores? porque una persona está cansada.
Ana tiene hambre. por eso Ana busca comida.
Luis quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Luis se apresura. ¿por qué Luis se apresura? porque Luis quiere llegar a tiempo.
¿por qué la gente no ve la señal cuando mira hacia otro lado? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira: cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal.
Lucía recibió un regalo. por eso Lucía está contenta. ¿por qué Lucía está contenta? porque Lucía recibió un regalo.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Ana recibió un comentario injusto. así que Ana está enfadada.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Carlos repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Carlos las recuerda mejor.
la gente duerme. ¿por qué la gente duerme? para descansar.
Luis tiene hambre. por eso Luis busca comida.
¿por qué una persona se apresura cuando quiere llegar a tiempo? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta: cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura.
Lucía lo hace cada día. por eso Lucía lo hace sin pensar.
Carlos recibió un regalo. por eso Carlos está contento. ¿por qué Carlos está contento? porque Carlos recibió un regalo.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Diego recibió un comentario injusto. así que Diego está enfadado.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué las recuerda mejor? porque una persona repite palabras muchas veces.
Ana durmió poco. por eso Ana se cansa antes.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. ¿por qué? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta.
María no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso María tiene miedo. ¿por qué María tiene miedo? porque María no sabe qué va a pasar.
Carlos lo hace cada día. por eso Carlos lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Luis recibió un regalo. así que Luis está contento.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Elena no tiene nada que hacer. así que Elena se aburre.
Luis durmió poco. por eso Luis se cansa antes.
María está cansada. por eso María comete más errores.
Diego no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Diego tiene miedo. ¿por qué Diego tiene miedo? porque Diego no sabe qué va a pasar.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Pablo lo hace cada día. así que Pablo lo hace sin pensar.
Elena miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Elena no vio la señal. ¿por qué Elena no vio la señal? porque Elena miraba hacia otro lado.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Lucía perdió algo querido. así que Lucía está triste.
Pablo no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Pablo se aburre. ¿por qué Pablo se aburre? porque Pablo no tiene nada que hacer.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. ¿por qué? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas.
Diego está cansado. por eso Diego comete más errores.
¿por qué, cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever.
Elena quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Elena se apresura.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. María miraba hacia otro lado. así que María no vio la señal.
Pablo perdió algo querido. por eso Pablo está triste.
¿por qué la gente se aburre cuando no tiene nada que hacer? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo.
María repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso María las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué la gente comete más errores cuando está cansada? porque el cansancio debilita la atención: cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores.
Lucía tiene hambre. por eso Lucía busca comida. ¿por qué Lucía busca comida? porque Lucía tiene hambre.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Ana quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Ana se apresura.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Carlos miraba hacia otro lado. así que Carlos no vio la señal.
¿por qué una persona está triste cuando pierde algo querido? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido.
Ana recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Ana está enfadada. ¿por qué Ana está enfadada? porque Ana recibió un comentario injusto.
Diego repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Diego las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué la gente estudia? para saber hacer más.
Carlos tiene hambre. por eso Carlos busca comida. ¿por qué Carlos busca comida? porque Carlos tiene hambre.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Diego quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Diego se apresura.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. ¿por qué no ve la señal? porque una persona mira hacia otro lado.
Ana recibió un regalo. por eso Ana está contenta.
Luis recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Luis está enfadado. ¿por qué Luis está enfadado? porque Luis recibió un comentario injusto.
¿por qué la gente recuerda mejor lo que repite? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria: cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor.
Lucía durmió poco. por eso Lucía se cansa antes. ¿por qué Lucía se cansa antes? porque Lucía durmió poco.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Luis tiene hambre. así que Luis busca comida.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Elena lo hace cada día. así que Elena lo hace sin pensar.
Luis recibió un regalo. por eso Luis está contento.
¿por qué una persona está enfadada cuando recibe un comentario injusto? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia: cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada.
Lucía no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Lucía se aburre.
Carlos durmió poco. por eso Carlos se cansa antes. ¿por qué Carlos se cansa antes? porque Carlos durmió poco.
Elena está cansada. por eso Elena comete más errores. ¿por qué Elena comete más errores? porque Elena está cansada.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Lucía no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Lucía tiene miedo.
Pablo lo hace cada día. por eso Pablo lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Pablo lo hace sin pensar? porque Pablo lo hace cada día.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. ¿por qué? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella.
María perdió algo querido. por eso María está triste. ¿por qué María está triste? porque María perdió algo querido.
Carlos no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Carlos se aburre.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Luis durmió poco. así que Luis se cansa antes.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. María está cansada. así que María comete más errores.
Pablo no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Pablo tiene miedo.
¿por qué la gente hace sin pensar lo que hace cada día? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre.
María miraba hacia otro lado. por eso María no vio la señal.
Diego perdió algo querido. por eso Diego está triste. ¿por qué Diego está triste? porque Diego perdió algo querido.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Pablo no tiene nada que hacer. así que Pablo se aburre.
Elena repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Elena las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Elena las recuerda mejor? porque Elena repitió las palabras muchas veces.

quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Matteo è stanco. quindi Matteo fa più errori.
perché una persona ha paura quando non sa che cosa succederà? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere.
Anna vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Anna si affretta. perché Anna si affretta? perché Anna vuole arrivare in tempo.
Paolo guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Paolo non ha visto il segnale.
perché, quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste? perché le manca ciò che le era caro.
Chiara ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Chiara è arrabbiata.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Maria ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Maria le ricorda meglio.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. perché fa più errori? perché una persona è stanca.
Anna ha fame. perciò Anna cerca del cibo.
Luca vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Luca si affretta. perché Luca si affretta? perché Luca vuole arrivare in tempo.
perché le persone non vedono il segnale quando guardano dall'altra parte? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda: quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale.
Giulia ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Giulia è contenta. perché Giulia è contenta? perché Giulia ha ricevuto un regalo.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Anna ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Anna è arrabbiata.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Matteo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Matteo le ricorda meglio.
le persone dormono. perché le persone dormono? per riposare.
Luca ha fame. perciò Luca cerca del cibo.
perché una persona si affretta quando vuole arrivare in tempo? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve: quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta.
Giulia lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Giulia lo fa senza pensare.
Matteo ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Matteo è contento. perché Matteo è contento? perché Matteo ha ricevuto un regalo.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Paolo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Paolo è arrabbiato.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. perché le ricorda meglio? perché una persona ripete parole molte volte.
Anna ha dormito poco. perciò Anna si stanca prima.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. perché? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca.
Maria non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Maria ha paura. perché Maria ha paura? perché Maria non sa che cosa succederà.
Matteo lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Matteo lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Luca ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Luca è contento.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Chiara non ha niente da fare. quindi Chiara si annoia.
Luca ha dormito poco. perciò Luca si stanca prima.
Maria è stanca. perciò Maria fa più errori.
Paolo non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Paolo ha paura. perché Paolo ha paura? perché Paolo non sa che cosa succederà.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Marco lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Marco lo fa senza pensare.
Chiara guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Chiara non ha visto il segnale. perché Chiara non ha visto il segnale? perché Chiara guardava dall'altra parte.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Giulia ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Giulia è triste.
Marco non ha niente da fare. perciò Marco si annoia. perché Marco si annoia? perché Marco non ha niente da fare.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. perché? perché il sonno ridà le forze.
Paolo è stanco. perciò Paolo fa più errori.
perché, quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere.
Chiara vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Chiara si affretta.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Maria guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Maria non ha visto il segnale.
Marco ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Marco è triste.
perché le persone si annoiano quando non hanno niente da fare? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo.
Maria ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Maria le ricorda meglio.
perché le persone fanno più errori quando sono stanche? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione: quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori.
Giulia ha fame. perciò Giulia cerca del cibo. perché Giulia cerca del cibo? perché Giulia ha fame.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Anna vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Anna si affretta.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Matteo guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Matteo non ha visto il segnale.
perché una persona è triste quando perde una cosa cara? perché le manca ciò che le era caro.
Anna ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Anna è arrabbiata. perché Anna è arrabbiata? perché Anna ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
Paolo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Paolo le ricorda meglio.
perché le persone studiano? per saper fare di più.
Matteo ha fame. perciò Matteo cerca del cibo. perché Matteo cerca del cibo? perché Matteo ha fame.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Paolo vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Paolo si affretta.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. perché non vede il segnale? perché una persona guarda dall'altra parte.
Anna ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Anna è contenta.
Luca ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Luca è arrabbiato. perché Luca è arrabbiato? perché Luca ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
perché le persone ricordano meglio ciò che ripetono? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria: quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio.
Giulia ha dormito poco. perciò Giulia si stanca prima. perché Giulia si stanca prima? perché Giulia ha dormito poco.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Luca ha fame. quindi Luca cerca del cibo.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Chiara lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Chiara lo fa senza pensare.
Luca ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Luca è contento.
perché una persona è arrabbiata quando riceve un rimprovero ingiusto? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia: quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata.
Giulia non ha niente da fare. perciò Giulia si annoia.
Matteo ha dormito poco. perciò Matteo si stanca prima. perché Matteo si stanca prima? perché Matteo ha dormito poco.
Chiara è stanca. perciò Chiara fa più errori. perché Chiara fa più errori? perché Chiara è stanca.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Giulia non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Giulia ha paura.
Marco lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Marco lo fa senza pensare. perché Marco lo fa senza pensare? perché Marco lo fa ogni giorno.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. perché? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei.
Maria ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Maria è triste. perché Maria è triste? perché Maria ha perso una cosa cara.
Matteo non ha niente da fare. perciò Matteo si annoia.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Luca ha dormito poco. quindi Luca si stanca prima.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Maria è stanca. quindi Maria fa più errori.
Marco non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Marco ha paura.
perché le persone fanno senza pensare ciò che fanno ogni giorno? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale.
Maria guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Maria non ha visto il segnale.
Paolo ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Paolo è triste. perché Paolo è triste? perché Paolo ha perso una cosa cara.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Marco non ha niente da fare. quindi Marco si annoia.
Chiara ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Chiara le ricorda meglio. perché Chiara le ricorda meglio? perché Chiara ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.

quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. João está cansado. portanto João comete mais erros.
porque é que uma pessoa tem medo quando não sabe o que vai acontecer? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever.
Ana quer chegar a tempo. por isso Ana apressa-se. porque é que Ana apressa-se? porque Ana quer chegar a tempo.
Rui olhava para o outro lado. por isso Rui não viu o sinal.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido.
Sofia recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Sofia está zangada.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Maria repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Maria lembra-se melhor delas.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. porque é que comete mais erros? porque uma pessoa está cansada.
Ana tem fome. por isso Ana procura comida.
Tiago quer chegar a tempo. por isso Tiago apressa-se. porque é que Tiago apressa-se? porque Tiago quer chegar a tempo.
porque é que as pessoas não veem o sinal quando olham para o outro lado? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha: quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal.
Rita recebeu um presente. por isso Rita está contente. porque é que Rita está contente? porque Rita recebeu um presente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Ana recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Ana está zangada.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. João repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto João lembra-se melhor delas.
as pessoas dormem. porque é que as pessoas dormem? para descansar.
Tiago tem fome. por isso Tiago procura comida.
porque é que uma pessoa se apressa quando quer chegar a tempo? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso: quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se.
Rita fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Rita fá-lo sem pensar.
João recebeu um presente. por isso João está contente. porque é que João está contente? porque João recebeu um presente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Rui recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Rui está zangado.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que lembra-se melhor delas? porque uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes.
Ana dormiu pouco. por isso Ana cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. porquê? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta.
Maria não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Maria tem medo. porque é que Maria tem medo? porque Maria não sabe o que vai acontecer.
João fá-lo todos os dias. por isso João fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Tiago recebeu um presente. portanto Tiago está contente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Sofia não tem nada para fazer. portanto Sofia aborrece-se.
Tiago dormiu pouco. por isso Tiago cansa-se mais depressa.
Maria está cansada. por isso Maria comete mais erros.
Rui não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Rui tem medo. porque é que Rui tem medo? porque Rui não sabe o que vai acontecer.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Pedro fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Pedro fá-lo sem pensar.
Sofia olhava para o outro lado. por isso Sofia não viu o sinal. porque é que Sofia não viu o sinal? porque Sofia olhava para o outro lado.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Rita perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Rita está triste.
Pedro não tem nada para fazer. por isso Pedro aborrece-se. porque é que Pedro aborrece-se? porque Pedro não tem nada para fazer.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. porquê? porque o sono repõe as forças.
Rui está cansado. por isso Rui comete mais erros.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever.
Sofia quer chegar a tempo. por isso Sofia apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Maria olhava para o outro lado. portanto Maria não viu o sinal.
Pedro perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Pedro está triste.
porque é que as pessoas se aborrecem quando não têm nada para fazer? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo.
Maria repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Maria lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que as pessoas cometem mais erros quando estão cansadas? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção: quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros.
Rita tem fome. por isso Rita procura comida. porque é que Rita procura comida? porque Rita tem fome.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Ana quer chegar a tempo. portanto Ana apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. João olhava para o outro lado. portanto João não viu o sinal.
porque é que uma pessoa está triste quando perde uma coisa querida? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido.
Ana recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Ana está zangada. porque é que Ana está zangada? porque Ana recebeu um comentário injusto.
Rui repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Rui lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que as pessoas estudam? para saber fazer mais.
João tem fome. por isso João procura comida. porque é que João procura comida? porque João tem fome.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Rui quer chegar a tempo. portanto Rui apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. porque é que não vê o sinal? porque uma pessoa olha para o outro lado.
Ana recebeu um presente. por isso Ana está contente.
Tiago recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Tiago está zangado. porque é que Tiago está zangado? porque Tiago recebeu um comentário injusto.
porque é que as pessoas se lembram melhor do que repetem? porque a repetição reforça a memória: quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas.
Rita dormiu pouco. por isso Rita cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Rita cansa-se mais depressa? porque Rita dormiu pouco.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Tiago tem fome. portanto Tiago procura comida.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Sofia fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Sofia fá-lo sem pensar.
Tiago recebeu um presente. por isso Tiago está contente.
porque é que uma pessoa está zangada quando recebe um comentário injusto? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça: quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada.
Rita não tem nada para fazer. por isso Rita aborrece-se.
João dormiu pouco. por isso João cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que João cansa-se mais depressa? porque João dormiu pouco.
Sofia está cansada. por isso Sofia comete mais erros. porque é que Sofia comete mais erros? porque Sofia está cansada.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Rita não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Rita tem medo.
Pedro fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Pedro fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Pedro fá-lo sem pensar? porque Pedro fá-lo todos os dias.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. porquê? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela.
Maria perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Maria está triste. porque é que Maria está triste? porque Maria perdeu uma coisa querida.
João não tem nada para fazer. por isso João aborrece-se.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Tiago dormiu pouco. portanto Tiago cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Maria está cansada. portanto Maria comete mais erros.
Pedro não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Pedro tem medo.
porque é que as pessoas fazem sem pensar o que fazem todos os dias? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual.
Maria olhava para o outro lado. por isso Maria não viu o sinal.
Rui perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Rui está triste. porque é que Rui está triste? porque Rui perdeu uma coisa querida.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Pedro não tem nada para fazer. portanto Pedro aborrece-se.
Sofia repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Sofia lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Sofia lembra-se melhor delas? porque Sofia repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.

Piet is moe. daarom maakt Piet meer fouten.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. waarom? omdat het onbekende niet te voorzien is.
Eva wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Eva zich. waarom haast Eva zich? omdat Eva op tijd wil komen.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Eva keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Eva het teken niet gezien.
Jan is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Jan verdrietig. waarom is Jan verdrietig? omdat Jan iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Piet heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Piet zich.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe.
Max is moe. daarom maakt Max meer fouten. waarom maakt Max meer fouten? omdat Max moe is.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Max weet niet wat er komt. dus is Max bang.
waarom doet een mens zonder na te denken wat hij elke dag doet? omdat herhaling een handeling tot gewoonte maakt.
Maria keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Maria het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Maria het teken niet gezien? omdat Maria de andere kant op keek.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Anna is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Anna verdrietig.
Piet heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Piet zich. waarom verveelt Piet zich? omdat Piet niets te doen heeft.
waarom wordt een mens sneller moe als hij weinig slaapt? omdat slaap de krachten herstelt: als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Eva is moe. dus maakt Eva meer fouten.
Jan weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Jan bang. waarom is Jan bang? omdat Jan niet weet wat er komt.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Piet doet het elke dag. dus doet Piet het zonder na te denken.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij.
Anna is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Anna verdrietig. waarom is Anna verdrietig? omdat Anna iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
Tim heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Tim zich.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Tim heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Tim sneller moe.
Maria is moe. daarom maakt Maria meer fouten. waarom maakt Maria meer fouten? omdat Maria moe is.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Anna weet niet wat er komt. dus is Anna bang.
Piet doet het elke dag. daarom doet Piet het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Piet het zonder na te denken? omdat Piet het elke dag doet.
waarom is een mens blij als hij een cadeau krijgt? omdat een cadeau laat zien dat iemand aan hem denkt: als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij.
Lotte is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Lotte verdrietig.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Lotte heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Lotte zich.
Max heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Max sneller moe.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten.
Anna weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Anna bang. waarom is Anna bang? omdat Anna niet weet wat er komt.
Tim doet het elke dag. daarom doet Tim het zonder na te denken.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Tim heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Tim blij.
waarom worden mensen boos om onterechte opmerkingen? omdat een mens verwacht eerlijk behandeld te worden.
Eva heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Eva zich.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Maria heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Maria sneller moe.
waarom zoekt een mens eten als hij honger heeft? omdat het lichaam vraagt wat het mist: als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten.
Lotte weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Lotte bang.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Lotte doet het elke dag. dus doet Lotte het zonder na te denken.
Max heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Max blij.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Jan heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Jan boos.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. waarom onthoudt hij ze beter? omdat een mens woorden vaak herhaalt.
Maria heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Maria sneller moe.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Tim heeft honger. dus zoekt Tim eten.
waarom haasten mensen zich als ze op tijd willen komen? omdat er minder tijd over is dan nodig is.
Eva doet het elke dag. daarom doet Eva het zonder na te denken.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Maria heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Maria blij.
Jan heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Jan boos.
waarom onthouden mensen beter wat ze herhalen? omdat herhaling het geheugen versterkt: als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter.
Lotte heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Lotte sneller moe. waarom wordt Lotte sneller moe? omdat Lotte weinig heeft geslapen.
Max heeft honger. daarom zoekt Max eten.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Jan wil op tijd komen. dus haast Jan zich.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. waarom ziet hij het teken niet? omdat een mens de andere kant op kijkt.
Maria heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Maria blij.
Tim heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Tim boos. waarom is Tim boos? omdat Tim een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
Piet heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Piet ze beter.
waarom eten mensen? om geen honger te hebben.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Maria heeft honger. dus zoekt Maria eten.
Jan wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Jan zich.
waarom zien mensen het teken niet als ze de andere kant op kijken? omdat een mens alleen ziet waar hij naar kijkt: als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet.
Lotte heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Lotte blij. waarom is Lotte blij? omdat Lotte een cadeau heeft gekregen.
Anna heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Anna boos.
Max heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Max ze beter. waarom onthoudt Max ze beter? omdat Max de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. waarom maakt hij meer fouten? omdat een mens moe is.
Maria heeft honger. daarom zoekt Maria eten.
Tim wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Tim zich. waarom haast Tim zich? omdat Tim op tijd wil komen.
Piet keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Piet het teken niet gezien.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. waarom? omdat hij mist wat hem dierbaar was.
Eva heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Eva boos. waarom is Eva boos? omdat Eva een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Eva heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Eva ze beter.
waarom maken mensen meer fouten als ze moe zijn? omdat vermoeidheid de aandacht verzwakt: als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten.
Lotte heeft honger. daarom zoekt Lotte eten. waarom zoekt Lotte eten? omdat Lotte honger heeft.
Anna wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Anna zich.
Max keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Max het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Max het teken niet gezien? omdat Max de andere kant op keek.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Max is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Max verdrietig.
waarom verveelt een mens zich als hij niets te doen heeft? omdat tijd zonder bezigheid lang lijkt.
Maria heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Maria ze beter. waarom onthoudt Maria ze beter? omdat Maria de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.

kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Adam jest zmęczony. więc Adam popełnia więcej błędów.
dlaczego człowiek boi się, kiedy nie wie, co będzie? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć.
Anna chce zdążyć. dlatego Anna się spieszy. dlaczego Anna się spieszy? ponieważ Anna chce zdążyć.
Marek patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Marek nie zobaczył znaku.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie.
Zofia dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Zofia się złości.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Maria wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. więc Maria lepiej je pamięta.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ człowiek jest zmęczony.
Anna jest głodna. dlatego Anna szuka jedzenia.
Jan chce zdążyć. dlatego Jan się spieszy. dlaczego Jan się spieszy? ponieważ Jan chce zdążyć.
dlaczego ludzie nie widzą znaku, kiedy patrzą w inną stronę? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy: kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku.
Ewa dostała prezent. dlatego Ewa się cieszy. dlaczego Ewa się cieszy? ponieważ Ewa dostała prezent.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Anna dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Anna się złości.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Adam wiele razy powtórzył słowa. więc Adam lepiej je pamięta.
ludzie śpią. dlaczego ludzie śpią? żeby odpocząć.
Jan jest głodny. dlatego Jan szuka jedzenia.
dlaczego człowiek się spieszy, kiedy chce zdążyć? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba: kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się.
Ewa robi to codziennie. dlatego Ewa robi to bez namysłu.
Adam dostał prezent. dlatego Adam się cieszy. dlaczego Adam się cieszy? ponieważ Adam dostał prezent.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Marek dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Marek się złości.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa.
Anna mało spała. dlatego Anna szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. dlaczego? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje.
Maria nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Maria się boi. dlaczego Maria się boi? ponieważ Maria nie wie, co będzie.
Adam robi to codziennie. dlatego Adam robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Jan dostał prezent. więc Jan się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Zofia nie ma nic do roboty. więc Zofia się nudzi.
Jan mało spał. dlatego Jan szybciej się męczy.
Maria jest zmęczona. dlatego Maria popełnia więcej błędów.
Marek nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Marek się boi. dlaczego Marek się boi? ponieważ Marek nie wie, co będzie.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Piotr robi to codziennie. więc Piotr robi to bez namysłu.
Zofia patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Zofia nie zobaczyła znaku. dlaczego Zofia nie zobaczyła znaku? ponieważ Zofia patrzyła w inną stronę.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Ewa straciła coś bliskiego. więc Ewa jest smutna.
Piotr nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Piotr się nudzi. dlaczego Piotr się nudzi? ponieważ Piotr nie ma nic do roboty.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. dlaczego? bo sen przywraca siły.
Marek jest zmęczony. dlatego Marek popełnia więcej błędów.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć.
Zofia chce zdążyć. dlatego Zofia się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Maria patrzyła w inną stronę. więc Maria nie zobaczyła znaku.
Piotr stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Piotr jest smutny.
dlaczego ludzie nudzą się, kiedy nie mają nic do roboty? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi.
Maria wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Maria lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie popełniają więcej błędów, kiedy są zmęczeni? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę: kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów.
Ewa jest głodna. dlatego Ewa szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Ewa szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Ewa jest głodna.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Anna chce zdążyć. więc Anna się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Adam patrzył w inną stronę. więc Adam nie zobaczył znaku.
dlaczego człowiek jest smutny, kiedy traci coś bliskiego? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie.
Anna dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Anna się złości. dlaczego Anna się złości? ponieważ Anna dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
Marek wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Marek lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie się uczą? żeby umieć więcej.
Adam jest głodny. dlatego Adam szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Adam szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Adam jest głodny.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Marek chce zdążyć. więc Marek się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. dlaczego nie widzi znaku? ponieważ człowiek patrzy w inną stronę.
Anna dostała prezent. dlatego Anna się cieszy.
Jan dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Jan się złości. dlaczego Jan się złości? ponieważ Jan dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
dlaczego ludzie lepiej pamiętają to, co powtarzają? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć: kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta.
Ewa mało spała. dlatego Ewa szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Ewa szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Ewa mało spała.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Jan jest głodny. więc Jan szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Zofia robi to codziennie. więc Zofia robi to bez namysłu.
Jan dostał prezent. dlatego Jan się cieszy.
dlaczego człowiek złości się, kiedy dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie: kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się.
Ewa nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Ewa się nudzi.
Adam mało spał. dlatego Adam szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Adam szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Adam mało spał.
Zofia jest zmęczona. dlatego Zofia popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Zofia popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Zofia jest zmęczona.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Ewa nie wie, co będzie. więc Ewa się boi.
Piotr robi to codziennie. dlatego Piotr robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Piotr robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Piotr robi to codziennie.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. dlaczego? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta.
Maria straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Maria jest smutna. dlaczego Maria jest smutna? ponieważ Maria straciła coś bliskiego.
Adam nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Adam się nudzi.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Jan mało spał. więc Jan szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Maria jest zmęczona. więc Maria popełnia więcej błędów.
Piotr nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Piotr się boi.
dlaczego ludzie robią bez namysłu to, co robią codziennie? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem.
Maria patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Maria nie zobaczyła znaku.
Marek stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Marek jest smutny. dlaczego Marek jest smutny? ponieważ Marek stracił coś bliskiego.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Piotr nie ma nic do roboty. więc Piotr się nudzi.
Zofia wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Zofia lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Zofia lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Zofia wiele razy powtórzyła słowa.

Иван голоден. поэтому Иван ищет еду. почему Иван ищет еду? потому что Иван голоден.
Олег хочет успеть. поэтому Олег спешит.
Олег смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Олег не увидел знака. почему Олег не увидел знака? потому что Олег смотрел в другую сторону.
Борис потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Борис грустит.
Борис сидит без дела. поэтому Борис скучает. почему Борис скучает? потому что Борис сидит без дела.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Анна мало спала. значит Анна устаёт быстрее.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Олег голоден. значит Олег ищет еду.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Борис хочет успеть. значит Борис спешит.
Пётр смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Пётр не увидел знака.
Пётр потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Пётр грустит. почему Пётр грустит? потому что Пётр потерял дорогую ему вещь.
Иван сидит без дела. поэтому Иван скучает.
Иван мало спал. поэтому Иван устаёт быстрее. почему Иван устаёт быстрее? потому что Иван мало спал.
почему человек ищет еду, когда голоден? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает: когда человек голоден, он ищет еду.
почему люди спешат, когда хотят успеть? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно: когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит.
почему, когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Пётр потерял дорогую ему вещь. значит Пётр грустит.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Иван сидит без дела. значит Иван скучает.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Олег мало спал. значит Олег устаёт быстрее.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. почему он спешит? потому что человек хочет успеть.
почему человек не видит знака, когда смотрит в другую сторону? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит.
почему люди грустят, когда теряют дорогие им вещи? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. почему? потому что время без занятия тянется долго.
почему человек устаёт быстрее, когда мало спит? потому что сон восстанавливает силы: когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее.
Мария устала. поэтому Мария ошибается чаще. почему Мария ошибается чаще? потому что Мария устала.
Ольга не знает, что будет. поэтому Ольга боится.
Ольга делает это каждый день. поэтому Ольга делает это не думая. почему Ольга делает это не думая? потому что Ольга делает это каждый день.
Вера получила подарок. поэтому Вера радуется.
Вера получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Вера злится. почему Вера злится? потому что Вера получила несправедливое замечание.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Ольга устала. значит Ольга ошибается чаще.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Вера не знает, что будет. значит Вера боится.
Анна делает это каждый день. поэтому Анна делает это не думая.
Анна получила подарок. поэтому Анна радуется. почему Анна радуется? потому что Анна получила подарок.
Мария получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Мария злится.
Мария много раз повторила слова. поэтому Мария помнит их лучше. почему Мария помнит их лучше? потому что Мария много раз повторила слова.
Олег устал. поэтому Олег ошибается чаще. почему Олег ошибается чаще? потому что Олег устал.
Борис не знает, что будет. поэтому Борис боится.
Борис делает это каждый день. поэтому Борис делает это не думая. почему Борис делает это не думая? потому что Борис делает это каждый день.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Анна получила подарок. значит Анна радуется.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Мария получила несправедливое замечание. значит Мария злится.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Ольга много раз повторила слова. значит Ольга помнит их лучше.
Пётр устал. поэтому Пётр ошибается чаще.
Пётр не знает, что будет. поэтому Пётр боится. почему Пётр боится? потому что Пётр не знает, что будет.
Иван делает это каждый день. поэтому Иван делает это не думая.
Иван получил подарок. поэтому Иван радуется. почему Иван радуется? потому что Иван получил подарок.
Олег получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Олег злится.
Олег много раз повторил слова. поэтому Олег помнит их лучше. почему Олег помнит их лучше? потому что Олег много раз повторил слова.
почему, когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Пётр не знает, что будет. значит Пётр боится.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Иван делает это каждый день. значит Иван делает это не думая.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Олег получил подарок. значит Олег радуется.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Борис получил несправедливое замечание. значит Борис злится.
Пётр много раз повторил слова. поэтому Пётр помнит их лучше.
почему человек ошибается чаще, когда устал? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание.
почему люди боятся неизвестного? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. почему? потому что повторение делает действие привычным.
почему человек радуется, когда получает подарок? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят: когда человек получает подарок, он радуется.
почему люди злятся на несправедливые замечания? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо: когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится.
почему, когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше? потому что повторение укрепляет память.
люди учатся. зачем люди учатся? чтобы уметь больше.
Вера голодна. поэтому Вера ищет еду.
Вера хочет успеть. поэтому Вера спешит. почему Вера спешит? потому что Вера хочет успеть.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. почему он злится? потому что человек получает несправедливое замечание.
почему человек помнит слова лучше, когда много раз их повторяет? потому что повторение укрепляет память.
зачем человек ест? чтобы не быть голодным.
Анна голодна. поэтому Анна ищет еду. почему Анна ищет еду? потому что Анна голодна.
Мария хочет успеть. поэтому Мария спешит.
Мария смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Мария не увидела знака. почему Мария не увидела знака? потому что Мария смотрела в другую сторону.
Ольга потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Ольга грустит.
Ольга сидит без дела. поэтому Ольга скучает. почему Ольга скучает? потому что Ольга сидит без дела.
Вера мало спала. поэтому Вера устаёт быстрее.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Анна голодна. значит Анна ищет еду.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Мария хочет успеть. значит Мария спешит.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Ольга смотрела в другую сторону. значит Ольга не увидела знака.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Вера потеряла дорогую ей вещь. значит Вера грустит.
Анна сидит без дела. поэтому Анна скучает.
Анна мало спала. поэтому Анна устаёт быстрее. почему Анна устаёт быстрее? потому что Анна мало спала.

ivan is hungry. therefore ivan looks for food. why does ivan look for food? because ivan is hungry.
john wants to be in time. therefore john hurries.
john looked the other way. therefore john did not see the sign. why did john not see the sign? because john looked the other way.
mark lost something dear. therefore mark is sad.
mark has nothing to do. therefore mark is bored. why is mark bored? because mark has nothing to do.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. anna slept little. so anna gets tired faster.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. john is hungry. so john looks for food.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. mark wants to be in time. so mark hurries.
peter looked the other way. therefore peter did not see the sign.
peter lost something dear. therefore peter is sad. why is peter sad? because peter lost something dear.
ivan has nothing to do. therefore ivan is bored.
ivan slept little. therefore ivan gets tired faster. why does ivan get tired faster? because ivan slept little.
why does a person look for food when hungry? because the body asks for what it lacks: when a person is hungry, that person looks for food.
why do people hurry when they want to be in time? because less time is left than is needed: when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries.
why, when a person looks the other way, does that person not see the sign? because a person sees only what they look at.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. peter lost something dear. so peter is sad.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. ivan has nothing to do. so ivan is bored.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. john slept little. so john gets tired faster.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. why does that person hurry? because a person wants to be in time.
why does a person not see the sign when looking the other way? because a person sees only what they look at.
why are people sad when they lose something dear? because they miss what was dear to them.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. why? because time without an occupation seems long.
why does a person get tired faster when they sleep little? because sleep restores strength: when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster.
mary is tired. therefore mary makes more mistakes. why does mary make more mistakes? because mary is tired.
kate does not know what will happen. therefore kate is afraid.
kate does it every day. therefore kate does it without thinking. why does kate do it without thinking? because kate does it every day.
jane got a gift. therefore jane is glad.
jane got an unfair remark. therefore jane is angry. why is jane angry? because jane got an unfair remark.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. kate is tired. so kate makes more mistakes.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. jane does not know what will happen. so jane is afraid.
anna does it every day. therefore anna does it without thinking.
anna got a gift. therefore anna is glad. why is anna glad? because anna got a gift.
mary got an unfair remark. therefore mary is angry.
mary repeated the words many times. therefore mary remembers them better. why does mary remember them better? because mary repeated the words many times.
john is tired. therefore john makes more mistakes. why does john make more mistakes? because john is tired.
mark does not know what will happen. therefore mark is afraid.
mark does it every day. therefore mark does it without thinking. why does mark do it without thinking? because mark does it every day.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. anna got a gift. so anna is glad.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. mary got an unfair remark. so mary is angry.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. kate repeated the words many times. so kate remembers them better.
peter is tired. therefore peter makes more mistakes.
peter does not know what will happen. therefore peter is afraid. why is peter afraid? because peter does not know what will happen.
ivan does it every day. therefore ivan does it without thinking.
ivan got a gift. therefore ivan is glad. why is ivan glad? because ivan got a gift.
john got an unfair remark. therefore john is angry.
john repeated the words many times. therefore john remembers them better. why does john remember them better? because john repeated the words many times.
why, when a person is tired, does that person make more mistakes? because tiredness weakens attention.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. peter does not know what will happen. so peter is afraid.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. ivan does it every day. so ivan does it without thinking.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. john got a gift. so john is glad.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. mark got an unfair remark. so mark is angry.
peter repeated the words many times. therefore peter remembers them better.
why does a person make more mistakes when tired? because tiredness weakens attention.
why do people fear the unknown? because the unknown cannot be foreseen.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. why? because repetition makes an action a habit.
why is a person glad when they get a gift? because a gift shows that someone remembers them: when a person gets a gift, that person is glad.
why do people get angry at unfair remarks? because a person expects to be treated fairly: when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry.
why, when a person repeats words many times, does that person remember them better? because repetition strengthens memory.
people study. why do people study? in order to be able to do more.
jane is hungry. therefore jane looks for food.
jane wants to be in time. therefore jane hurries. why does jane hurry? because jane wants to be in time.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. why is that person angry? because a person gets an unfair remark.
why does a person remember words better when they repeat them many times? because repetition strengthens memory.
why does a person eat? in order not to be hungry.
anna is hungry. therefore anna looks for food. why does anna look for food? because anna is hungry.
mary wants to be in time. therefore mary hurries.
mary looked the other way. therefore mary did not see the sign. why did mary not see the sign? because mary looked the other way.
kate lost something dear. therefore kate is sad.
kate has nothing to do. therefore kate is bored. why is kate bored? because kate has nothing to do.
jane slept little. therefore jane gets tired faster.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. anna is hungry. so anna looks for food.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. mary wants to be in time. so mary hurries.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. kate looked the other way. so kate did not see the sign.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. jane lost something dear. so jane is sad.
anna has nothing to do. therefore anna is bored.
anna slept little. therefore anna gets tired faster. why does anna get tired faster? because anna slept little.

Max ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Max Essen. warum sucht Max Essen? weil Max hungrig ist.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Anna will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Anna sich.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Lena hat weggeschaut. also hat Lena das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Maria hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Maria traurig.
Eva hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Eva. warum langweilt sich Eva? weil Eva nichts zu tun hat.
wozu schläft ein Mensch? um sich auszuruhen.
Maria ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Maria Essen. warum sucht Maria Essen? weil Maria hungrig ist.
Lena will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Lena sich.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. warum freut er sich? weil ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. warum? weil ein Mensch erwartet, gerecht behandelt zu werden.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Paul hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Paul sie sich besser.
warum macht ein Mensch mehr Fehler, wenn er müde ist? weil Müdigkeit die Aufmerksamkeit schwächt.
warum hat ein Mensch Angst, wenn er nicht weiß, was kommt? weil man das Unbekannte nicht vorhersehen kann: wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Jonas macht es jeden Tag. also macht Jonas es ohne nachzudenken.
Paul hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Paul.
Jonas hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Jonas. warum ärgert sich Jonas? weil Jonas eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
Felix hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Felix sie sich besser.
Paul ist müde. deshalb macht Paul mehr Fehler. warum macht Paul mehr Fehler? weil Paul müde ist.
Max weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Max Angst.
Felix macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Felix es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Felix es ohne nachzudenken? weil Felix es jeden Tag macht.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Eva hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Eva.
Anna hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Anna. warum ärgert sich Anna? weil Anna eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
Eva hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Eva sie sich besser.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Lena ist müde. also macht Lena mehr Fehler.
Maria weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Maria Angst.
Eva macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Eva es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Eva es ohne nachzudenken? weil Eva es jeden Tag macht.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig.
warum langweilen sich Menschen, wenn sie nichts zu tun haben? weil Zeit ohne Beschäftigung lang wird.
warum werden Menschen schneller müde, wenn sie wenig schlafen? weil Schlaf die Kräfte wiederherstellt: wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. warum sucht er Essen? weil ein Mensch hungrig ist.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. warum? weil weniger Zeit bleibt als nötig ist.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Paul hat weggeschaut. also hat Paul das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Felix hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Felix traurig.
Jonas hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Jonas.
Max hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Max schneller müde. warum wird Max schneller müde? weil Max wenig geschlafen hat.
Paul ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Paul Essen.
Jonas will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Jonas sich. warum beeilt Jonas sich? weil Jonas rechtzeitig kommen will.
Felix hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Felix das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Maria hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Maria traurig.
Anna hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Anna.
Maria hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Maria schneller müde. warum wird Maria schneller müde? weil Maria wenig geschlafen hat.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Eva ist hungrig. also sucht Eva Essen.
Anna will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Anna sich. warum beeilt Anna sich? weil Anna rechtzeitig kommen will.
Eva hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Eva das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Lena hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Lena traurig. warum ist Lena traurig? weil Lena etwas Liebes verloren hat.
warum merkt sich ein Mensch Wörter besser, wenn er sie oft wiederholt? weil Wiederholung das Gedächtnis stärkt.
Menschen essen. wozu essen Menschen? um nicht hungrig zu sein.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst.
warum machen Menschen ohne nachzudenken, was sie jeden Tag machen? weil Wiederholung eine Handlung zur Gewohnheit macht.
warum freuen sich Menschen über Geschenke? weil ein Geschenk zeigt, dass jemand an ihn denkt: wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Max hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Max.
Paul hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Paul sie sich besser. warum merkt Paul sie sich besser? weil Paul die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Paul ist müde. also macht Paul mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Felix weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Felix Angst.
Jonas macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Jonas es ohne nachzudenken.
Max hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Max. warum freut sich Max? weil Max ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Anna hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Anna.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Lena hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Lena sie sich besser.
Felix ist müde. deshalb macht Felix mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Maria weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Maria Angst.
Anna macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Anna es ohne nachzudenken.
Maria hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Maria. warum freut sich Maria? weil Maria ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
Lena hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Lena.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. warum wird er schneller müde? weil ein Mensch wenig schläft.
Eva ist müde. deshalb macht Eva mehr Fehler.
Lena weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Lena Angst. warum hat Lena Angst? weil Lena nicht weiß, was kommt.
warum sieht ein Mensch das Zeichen nicht, wenn er wegschaut? weil ein Mensch nur sieht, wohin er schaut.
warum ist ein Mensch traurig, wenn er etwas Liebes verliert? weil ihm fehlt, was ihm lieb war: wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Jonas hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Jonas.
Paul hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Paul schneller müde.
warum suchen Menschen Essen, wenn sie hungrig sind? weil der Körper verlangt, was ihm fehlt: wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Max will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Max sich.
Paul hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Paul das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Paul das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Paul weggeschaut hat.
Max hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Max traurig.
Felix hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Felix. warum langweilt sich Felix? weil Felix nichts zu tun hat.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Eva hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Eva schneller müde.

Louis a faim. donc Louis cherche à manger. pourquoi Louis cherche à manger ? parce que Louis a faim.
Jules veut arriver à temps. donc Jules se dépêche.
Jules regardait ailleurs. donc Jules n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Jules n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Jules regardait ailleurs.
Hugo a perdu une chose chère. donc Hugo est triste.
Hugo n'a rien à faire. donc Hugo s'ennuie. pourquoi Hugo s'ennuie ? parce que Hugo n'a rien à faire.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Anne a peu dormi. donc Anne se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Jules a faim. donc Jules cherche à manger.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Hugo veut arriver à temps. donc Hugo se dépêche.
Paul regardait ailleurs. donc Paul n'a pas vu le signe.
Paul a perdu une chose chère. donc Paul est triste. pourquoi Paul est triste ? parce que Paul a perdu une chose chère.
Louis n'a rien à faire. donc Louis s'ennuie.
Louis a peu dormi. donc Louis se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Louis se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Louis a peu dormi.
pourquoi une personne cherche-t-elle à manger quand elle a faim ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque: quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger.
pourquoi les gens se dépêchent-ils quand ils veulent arriver à temps ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut: quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche.
pourquoi, quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Paul a perdu une chose chère. donc Paul est triste.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Louis n'a rien à faire. donc Louis s'ennuie.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Jules a peu dormi. donc Jules se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. pourquoi elle se dépêche ? parce qu'une personne veut arriver à temps.
pourquoi une personne ne voit-elle pas le signe quand elle regarde ailleurs ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde.
pourquoi les gens sont-ils tristes quand ils perdent une chose chère ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. pourquoi ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long.
pourquoi une personne se fatigue-t-elle plus vite quand elle dort peu ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces: quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite.
Marie est fatiguée. donc Marie fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Marie fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Marie est fatiguée.
Julie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Julie a peur.
Julie le fait chaque jour. donc Julie le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Julie le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Julie le fait chaque jour.
Claire a reçu un cadeau. donc Claire est contente.
Claire a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Claire est en colère. pourquoi Claire est en colère ? parce que Claire a reçu une remarque injuste.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Julie est fatiguée. donc Julie fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Claire ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Claire a peur.
Anne le fait chaque jour. donc Anne le fait sans réfléchir.
Anne a reçu un cadeau. donc Anne est contente. pourquoi Anne est contente ? parce qu'Anne a reçu un cadeau.
Marie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Marie est en colère.
Marie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Marie les retient mieux. pourquoi Marie les retient mieux ? parce que Marie a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
Jules est fatigué. donc Jules fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Jules fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Jules est fatigué.
Hugo ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Hugo a peur.
Hugo le fait chaque jour. donc Hugo le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Hugo le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Hugo le fait chaque jour.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Anne a reçu un cadeau. donc Anne est contente.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Marie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Marie est en colère.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Julie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Julie les retient mieux.
Paul est fatigué. donc Paul fait plus d'erreurs.
Paul ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Paul a peur. pourquoi Paul a peur ? parce que Paul ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
Louis le fait chaque jour. donc Louis le fait sans réfléchir.
Louis a reçu un cadeau. donc Louis est content. pourquoi Louis est content ? parce que Louis a reçu un cadeau.
Jules a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Jules est en colère.
Jules a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Jules les retient mieux. pourquoi Jules les retient mieux ? parce que Jules a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
pourquoi, quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Paul ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Paul a peur.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Louis le fait chaque jour. donc Louis le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Jules a reçu un cadeau. donc Jules est content.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Hugo a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Hugo est en colère.
Paul a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Paul les retient mieux.
pourquoi une personne fait-elle plus d'erreurs quand elle est fatiguée ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention.
pourquoi les gens craignent-ils l'inconnu ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel.
pourquoi une personne est-elle contente quand elle reçoit un cadeau ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle: quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente.
pourquoi les gens se fâchent-ils contre les remarques injustes ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice: quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère.
pourquoi, quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire.
les gens apprennent. pourquoi les gens apprennent ? pour savoir faire plus.
Claire a faim. donc Claire cherche à manger.
Claire veut arriver à temps. donc Claire se dépêche. pourquoi Claire se dépêche ? parce que Claire veut arriver à temps.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. pourquoi elle est en colère ? parce qu'une personne reçoit une remarque injuste.
pourquoi une personne retient-elle mieux les mots quand elle les répète plusieurs fois ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire.
pourquoi une personne mange ? pour ne pas avoir faim.
Anne a faim. donc Anne cherche à manger. pourquoi Anne cherche à manger ? parce qu'Anne a faim.
Marie veut arriver à temps. donc Marie se dépêche.
Marie regardait ailleurs. donc Marie n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Marie n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Marie regardait ailleurs.
Julie a perdu une chose chère. donc Julie est triste.
Julie n'a rien à faire. donc Julie s'ennuie. pourquoi Julie s'ennuie ? parce que Julie n'a rien à faire.
Claire a peu dormi. donc Claire se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Anne a faim. donc Anne cherche à manger.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Marie veut arriver à temps. donc Marie se dépêche.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Julie regardait ailleurs. donc Julie n'a pas vu le signe.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Claire a perdu une chose chère. donc Claire est triste.
Anne n'a rien à faire. donc Anne s'ennuie.
Anne a peu dormi. donc Anne se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Anne se fatigue plus vite ? parce qu'Anne a peu dormi.

Luis tiene hambre. por eso Luis busca comida. ¿por qué Luis busca comida? porque Luis tiene hambre.
Diego quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Diego se apresura.
Diego miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Diego no vio la señal. ¿por qué Diego no vio la señal? porque Diego miraba hacia otro lado.
Carlos perdió algo querido. por eso Carlos está triste.
Carlos no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Carlos se aburre. ¿por qué Carlos se aburre? porque Carlos no tiene nada que hacer.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Ana durmió poco. así que Ana se cansa antes.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Diego tiene hambre. así que Diego busca comida.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Carlos quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Carlos se apresura.
Pablo miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Pablo no vio la señal.
Pablo perdió algo querido. por eso Pablo está triste. ¿por qué Pablo está triste? porque Pablo perdió algo querido.
Luis no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Luis se aburre.
Luis durmió poco. por eso Luis se cansa antes. ¿por qué Luis se cansa antes? porque Luis durmió poco.
¿por qué una persona busca comida cuando tiene hambre? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta: cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida.
¿por qué la gente se apresura cuando quiere llegar a tiempo? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta: cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura.
¿por qué, cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Pablo perdió algo querido. así que Pablo está triste.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Luis no tiene nada que hacer. así que Luis se aburre.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Diego durmió poco. así que Diego se cansa antes.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. ¿por qué se apresura? porque una persona quiere llegar a tiempo.
¿por qué una persona no ve la señal cuando mira hacia otro lado? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira.
¿por qué la gente está triste cuando pierde algo querido? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. ¿por qué? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo.
¿por qué una persona se cansa antes cuando duerme poco? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas: cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes.
María está cansada. por eso María comete más errores. ¿por qué María comete más errores? porque María está cansada.
Lucía no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Lucía tiene miedo.
Lucía lo hace cada día. por eso Lucía lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Lucía lo hace sin pensar? porque Lucía lo hace cada día.
Elena recibió un regalo. por eso Elena está contenta.
Elena recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Elena está enfadada. ¿por qué Elena está enfadada? porque Elena recibió un comentario injusto.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Lucía está cansada. así que Lucía comete más errores.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Elena no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Elena tiene miedo.
Ana lo hace cada día. por eso Ana lo hace sin pensar.
Ana recibió un regalo. por eso Ana está contenta. ¿por qué Ana está contenta? porque Ana recibió un regalo.
María recibió un comentario injusto. por eso María está enfadada.
María repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso María las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué María las recuerda mejor? porque María repitió las palabras muchas veces.
Diego está cansado. por eso Diego comete más errores. ¿por qué Diego comete más errores? porque Diego está cansado.
Carlos no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Carlos tiene miedo.
Carlos lo hace cada día. por eso Carlos lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Carlos lo hace sin pensar? porque Carlos lo hace cada día.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Ana recibió un regalo. así que Ana está contenta.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. María recibió un comentario injusto. así que María está enfadada.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Lucía repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Lucía las recuerda mejor.
Pablo está cansado. por eso Pablo comete más errores.
Pablo no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Pablo tiene miedo. ¿por qué Pablo tiene miedo? porque Pablo no sabe qué va a pasar.
Luis lo hace cada día. por eso Luis lo hace sin pensar.
Luis recibió un regalo. por eso Luis está contento. ¿por qué Luis está contento? porque Luis recibió un regalo.
Diego recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Diego está enfadado.
Diego repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Diego las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Diego las recuerda mejor? porque Diego repitió las palabras muchas veces.
¿por qué, cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores? porque el cansancio debilita la atención.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Pablo no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Pablo tiene miedo.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Luis lo hace cada día. así que Luis lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Diego recibió un regalo. así que Diego está contento.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Carlos recibió un comentario injusto. así que Carlos está enfadado.
Pablo repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Pablo las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué una persona comete más errores cuando está cansada? porque el cansancio debilita la atención.
¿por qué la gente teme lo desconocido? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre.
¿por qué una persona está contenta cuando recibe un regalo? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella: cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta.
¿por qué la gente se enfada ante los comentarios injustos? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia: cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada.
¿por qué, cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria.
la gente estudia. ¿por qué la gente estudia? para saber hacer más.
Elena tiene hambre. por eso Elena busca comida.
Elena quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Elena se apresura. ¿por qué Elena se apresura? porque Elena quiere llegar a tiempo.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. ¿por qué está enfadada? porque una persona recibe un comentario injusto.
¿por qué una persona recuerda mejor las palabras cuando las repite muchas veces? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria.
¿por qué una persona come? para no tener hambre.
Ana tiene hambre. por eso Ana busca comida. ¿por qué Ana busca comida? porque Ana tiene hambre.
María quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso María se apresura.
María miraba hacia otro lado. por eso María no vio la señal. ¿por qué María no vio la señal? porque María miraba hacia otro lado.
Lucía perdió algo querido. por eso Lucía está triste.
Lucía no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Lucía se aburre. ¿por qué Lucía se aburre? porque Lucía no tiene nada que hacer.
Elena durmió poco. por eso Elena se cansa antes.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Ana tiene hambre. así que Ana busca comida.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. María quiere llegar a tiempo. así que María se apresura.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Lucía miraba hacia otro lado. así que Lucía no vio la señal.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Elena perdió algo querido. así que Elena está triste.
Ana no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Ana se aburre.
Ana durmió poco. por eso Ana se cansa antes. ¿por qué Ana se cansa antes? porque Ana durmió poco.

Luca ha fame. perciò Luca cerca del cibo. perché Luca cerca del cibo? perché Luca ha fame.
Paolo vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Paolo si affretta.
Paolo guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Paolo non ha visto il segnale. perché Paolo non ha visto il segnale? perché Paolo guardava dall'altra parte.
Matteo ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Matteo è triste.
Matteo non ha niente da fare. perciò Matteo si annoia. perché Matteo si annoia? perché Matteo non ha niente da fare.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Anna ha dormito poco. quindi Anna si stanca prima.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Paolo ha fame. quindi Paolo cerca del cibo.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Matteo vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Matteo si affretta.
Marco guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Marco non ha visto il segnale.
Marco ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Marco è triste. perché Marco è triste? perché Marco ha perso una cosa cara.
Luca non ha niente da fare. perciò Luca si annoia.
Luca ha dormito poco. perciò Luca si stanca prima. perché Luca si stanca prima? perché Luca ha dormito poco.
perché una persona cerca del cibo quando ha fame? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca: quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo.
perché le persone si affrettano quando vogliono arrivare in tempo? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve: quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta.
perché, quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Marco ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Marco è triste.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Luca non ha niente da fare. quindi Luca si annoia.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Paolo ha dormito poco. quindi Paolo si stanca prima.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. perché si affretta? perché una persona vuole arrivare in tempo.
perché una persona non vede il segnale quando guarda dall'altra parte? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda.
perché le persone sono tristi quando perdono una cosa cara? perché le manca ciò che le era caro.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. perché? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo.
perché una persona si stanca prima quando dorme poco? perché il sonno ridà le forze: quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima.
Maria è stanca. perciò Maria fa più errori. perché Maria fa più errori? perché Maria è stanca.
Giulia non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Giulia ha paura.
Giulia lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Giulia lo fa senza pensare. perché Giulia lo fa senza pensare? perché Giulia lo fa ogni giorno.
Chiara ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Chiara è contenta.
Chiara ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Chiara è arrabbiata. perché Chiara è arrabbiata? perché Chiara ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Giulia è stanca. quindi Giulia fa più errori.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Chiara non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Chiara ha paura.
Anna lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Anna lo fa senza pensare.
Anna ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Anna è contenta. perché Anna è contenta? perché Anna ha ricevuto un regalo.
Maria ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Maria è arrabbiata.
Maria ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Maria le ricorda meglio. perché Maria le ricorda meglio? perché Maria ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
Paolo è stanco. perciò Paolo fa più errori. perché Paolo fa più errori? perché Paolo è stanco.
Matteo non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Matteo ha paura.
Matteo lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Matteo lo fa senza pensare. perché Matteo lo fa senza pensare? perché Matteo lo fa ogni giorno.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Anna ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Anna è contenta.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Maria ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Maria è arrabbiata.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Giulia ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Giulia le ricorda meglio.
Marco è stanco. perciò Marco fa più errori.
Marco non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Marco ha paura. perché Marco ha paura? perché Marco non sa che cosa succederà.
Luca lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Luca lo fa senza pensare.
Luca ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Luca è contento. perché Luca è contento? perché Luca ha ricevuto un regalo.
Paolo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Paolo è arrabbiato.
Paolo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Paolo le ricorda meglio. perché Paolo le ricorda meglio? perché Paolo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
perché, quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Marco non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Marco ha paura.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Luca lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Luca lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Paolo ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Paolo è contento.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Matteo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Matteo è arrabbiato.
Marco ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Marco le ricorda meglio.
perché una persona fa più errori quando è stanca? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione.
perché le persone temono l'ignoto? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. perché? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale.
perché una persona è contenta quando riceve un regalo? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei: quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta.
perché le persone si arrabbiano per i rimproveri ingiusti? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia: quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata.
perché, quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria.
le persone studiano. perché le persone studiano? per saper fare di più.
Chiara ha fame. perciò Chiara cerca del cibo.
Chiara vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Chiara si affretta. perché Chiara si affretta? perché Chiara vuole arrivare in tempo.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. perché è arrabbiata? perché una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto.
perché una persona ricorda meglio le parole quando le ripete molte volte? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria.
perché una persona mangia? per non avere fame.
Anna ha fame. perciò Anna cerca del cibo. perché Anna cerca del cibo? perché Anna ha fame.
Maria vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Maria si affretta.
Maria guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Maria non ha visto il segnale. perché Maria non ha visto il segnale? perché Maria guardava dall'altra parte.
Giulia ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Giulia è triste.
Giulia non ha niente da fare. perciò Giulia si annoia. perché Giulia si annoia? perché Giulia non ha niente da fare.
Chiara ha dormito poco. perciò Chiara si stanca prima.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Anna ha fame. quindi Anna cerca del cibo.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Maria vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Maria si affretta.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Giulia guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Giulia non ha visto il segnale.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Chiara ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Chiara è triste.
Anna non ha niente da fare. perciò Anna si annoia.
Anna ha dormito poco. perciò Anna si stanca prima. perché Anna si stanca prima? perché Anna ha dormito poco.

Tiago tem fome. por isso Tiago procura comida. porque é que Tiago procura comida? porque Tiago tem fome.
Rui quer chegar a tempo. por isso Rui apressa-se.
Rui olhava para o outro lado. por isso Rui não viu o sinal. porque é que Rui não viu o sinal? porque Rui olhava para o outro lado.
João perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso João está triste.
João não tem nada para fazer. por isso João aborrece-se. porque é que João aborrece-se? porque João não tem nada para fazer.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Ana dormiu pouco. portanto Ana cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Rui tem fome. portanto Rui procura comida.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. João quer chegar a tempo. portanto João apressa-se.
Pedro olhava para o outro lado. por isso Pedro não viu o sinal.
Pedro perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Pedro está triste. porque é que Pedro está triste? porque Pedro perdeu uma coisa querida.
Tiago não tem nada para fazer. por isso Tiago aborrece-se.
Tiago dormiu pouco. por isso Tiago cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Tiago cansa-se mais depressa? porque Tiago dormiu pouco.
porque é que uma pessoa procura comida quando tem fome? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta: quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida.
porque é que as pessoas se apressam quando querem chegar a tempo? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso: quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Pedro perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Pedro está triste.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Tiago não tem nada para fazer. portanto Tiago aborrece-se.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Rui dormiu pouco. portanto Rui cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. porque é que apressa-se? porque uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo.
porque é que uma pessoa não vê o sinal quando olha para o outro lado? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha.
porque é que as pessoas ficam tristes quando perdem uma coisa querida? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. porquê? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo.
porque é que uma pessoa se cansa mais depressa quando dorme pouco? porque o sono repõe as forças: quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa.
Maria está cansada. por isso Maria comete mais erros. porque é que Maria comete mais erros? porque Maria está cansada.
Rita não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Rita tem medo.
Rita fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Rita fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Rita fá-lo sem pensar? porque Rita fá-lo todos os dias.
Sofia recebeu um presente. por isso Sofia está contente.
Sofia recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Sofia está zangada. porque é que Sofia está zangada? porque Sofia recebeu um comentário injusto.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Rita está cansada. portanto Rita comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Sofia não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Sofia tem medo.
Ana fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Ana fá-lo sem pensar.
Ana recebeu um presente. por isso Ana está contente. porque é que Ana está contente? porque Ana recebeu um presente.
Maria recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Maria está zangada.
Maria repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Maria lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Maria lembra-se melhor delas? porque Maria repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
Rui está cansado. por isso Rui comete mais erros. porque é que Rui comete mais erros? porque Rui está cansado.
João não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso João tem medo.
João fá-lo todos os dias. por isso João fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que João fá-lo sem pensar? porque João fá-lo todos os dias.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Ana recebeu um presente. portanto Ana está contente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Maria recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Maria está zangada.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Rita repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Rita lembra-se melhor delas.
Pedro está cansado. por isso Pedro comete mais erros.
Pedro não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Pedro tem medo. porque é que Pedro tem medo? porque Pedro não sabe o que vai acontecer.
Tiago fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Tiago fá-lo sem pensar.
Tiago recebeu um presente. por isso Tiago está contente. porque é que Tiago está contente? porque Tiago recebeu um presente.
Rui recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Rui está zangado.
Rui repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Rui lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Rui lembra-se melhor delas? porque Rui repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Pedro não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Pedro tem medo.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Tiago fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Tiago fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Rui recebeu um presente. portanto Rui está contente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. João recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto João está zangado.
Pedro repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Pedro lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que uma pessoa comete mais erros quando está cansada? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção.
porque é que as pessoas temem o desconhecido? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. porquê? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual.
porque é que uma pessoa está contente quando recebe um presente? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela: quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente.
porque é que as pessoas se zangam com comentários injustos? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça: quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas? porque a repetição reforça a memória.
as pessoas estudam. porque é que as pessoas estudam? para saber fazer mais.
Sofia tem fome. por isso Sofia procura comida.
Sofia quer chegar a tempo. por isso Sofia apressa-se. porque é que Sofia apressa-se? porque Sofia quer chegar a tempo.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. porque é que está zangada? porque uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto.
porque é que uma pessoa se lembra melhor das palavras quando as repete muitas vezes? porque a repetição reforça a memória.
porque é que uma pessoa come? para não ter fome.
Ana tem fome. por isso Ana procura comida. porque é que Ana procura comida? porque Ana tem fome.
Maria quer chegar a tempo. por isso Maria apressa-se.
Maria olhava para o outro lado. por isso Maria não viu o sinal. porque é que Maria não viu o sinal? porque Maria olhava para o outro lado.
Rita perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Rita está triste.
Rita não tem nada para fazer. por isso Rita aborrece-se. porque é que Rita aborrece-se? porque Rita não tem nada para fazer.
Sofia dormiu pouco. por isso Sofia cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Ana tem fome. portanto Ana procura comida.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Maria quer chegar a tempo. portanto Maria apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Rita olhava para o outro lado. portanto Rita não viu o sinal.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Sofia perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Sofia está triste.
Ana não tem nada para fazer. por isso Ana aborrece-se.
Ana dormiu pouco. por isso Ana cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Ana cansa-se mais depressa? porque Ana dormiu pouco.

Max heeft honger. daarom zoekt Max eten. waarom zoekt Max eten? omdat Max honger heeft.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Anna wil op tijd komen. dus haast Anna zich.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Lotte keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Lotte het teken niet gezien.
Maria is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Maria verdrietig.
Eva heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Eva zich. waarom verveelt Eva zich? omdat Eva niets te doen heeft.
waarom slaapt een mens? om uit te rusten.
Maria heeft honger. daarom zoekt Maria eten. waarom zoekt Maria eten? omdat Maria honger heeft.
Lotte wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Lotte zich.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. waarom is hij blij? omdat een mens een cadeau krijgt.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. waarom? omdat een mens verwacht eerlijk behandeld te worden.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Piet heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Piet ze beter.
waarom maakt een mens meer fouten als hij moe is? omdat vermoeidheid de aandacht verzwakt.
waarom is een mens bang als hij niet weet wat er komt? omdat het onbekende niet te voorzien is: als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Jan doet het elke dag. dus doet Jan het zonder na te denken.
Piet heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Piet blij.
Jan heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Jan boos. waarom is Jan boos? omdat Jan een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
Tim heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Tim ze beter.
Piet is moe. daarom maakt Piet meer fouten. waarom maakt Piet meer fouten? omdat Piet moe is.
Max weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Max bang.
Tim doet het elke dag. daarom doet Tim het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Tim het zonder na te denken? omdat Tim het elke dag doet.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Eva heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Eva blij.
Anna heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Anna boos. waarom is Anna boos? omdat Anna een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
Eva heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Eva ze beter.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Lotte is moe. dus maakt Lotte meer fouten.
Maria weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Maria bang.
Eva doet het elke dag. daarom doet Eva het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Eva het zonder na te denken? omdat Eva het elke dag doet.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig.
waarom vervelen mensen zich als ze niets te doen hebben? omdat tijd zonder bezigheid lang lijkt.
waarom worden mensen sneller moe als ze weinig slapen? omdat slaap de krachten herstelt: als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. waarom zoekt hij eten? omdat een mens honger heeft.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. waarom? omdat er minder tijd over is dan nodig is.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Piet keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Piet het teken niet gezien.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Tim is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Tim verdrietig.
Jan heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Jan zich.
Max heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Max sneller moe. waarom wordt Max sneller moe? omdat Max weinig heeft geslapen.
Piet heeft honger. daarom zoekt Piet eten.
Jan wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Jan zich. waarom haast Jan zich? omdat Jan op tijd wil komen.
Tim keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Tim het teken niet gezien.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Maria is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Maria verdrietig.
Anna heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Anna zich.
Maria heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Maria sneller moe. waarom wordt Maria sneller moe? omdat Maria weinig heeft geslapen.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Eva heeft honger. dus zoekt Eva eten.
Anna wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Anna zich. waarom haast Anna zich? omdat Anna op tijd wil komen.
Eva keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Eva het teken niet gezien.
Lotte is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Lotte verdrietig. waarom is Lotte verdrietig? omdat Lotte iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
waarom onthoudt een mens woorden beter als hij ze vaak herhaalt? omdat herhaling het geheugen versterkt.
mensen eten. waarom eten mensen? om geen honger te hebben.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang.
waarom doen mensen zonder na te denken wat ze elke dag doen? omdat herhaling een handeling tot gewoonte maakt.
waarom zijn mensen blij met cadeaus? omdat een cadeau laat zien dat iemand aan hem denkt: als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Max heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Max boos.
Piet heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Piet ze beter. waarom onthoudt Piet ze beter? omdat Piet de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Piet is moe. dus maakt Piet meer fouten.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Tim weet niet wat er komt. dus is Tim bang.
Jan doet het elke dag. daarom doet Jan het zonder na te denken.
Max heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Max blij. waarom is Max blij? omdat Max een cadeau heeft gekregen.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Anna heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Anna boos.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Lotte heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Lotte ze beter.
Tim is moe. daarom maakt Tim meer fouten.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Maria weet niet wat er komt. dus is Maria bang.
Anna doet het elke dag. daarom doet Anna het zonder na te denken.
Maria heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Maria blij. waarom is Maria blij? omdat Maria een cadeau heeft gekregen.
Lotte heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Lotte boos.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. waarom wordt hij sneller moe? omdat een mens weinig slaapt.
Eva is moe. daarom maakt Eva meer fouten.
Lotte weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Lotte bang. waarom is Lotte bang? omdat Lotte niet weet wat er komt.
waarom ziet een mens het teken niet als hij de andere kant op kijkt? omdat een mens alleen ziet waar hij naar kijkt.
waarom is een mens verdrietig als hij iets dierbaars kwijtraakt? omdat hij mist wat hem dierbaar was: als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Jan heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Jan zich.
Piet heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Piet sneller moe.
waarom zoeken mensen eten als ze honger hebben? omdat het lichaam vraagt wat het mist: als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Max wil op tijd komen. dus haast Max zich.
Piet keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Piet het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Piet het teken niet gezien? omdat Piet de andere kant op keek.
Max is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Max verdrietig.
Tim heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Tim zich. waarom verveelt Tim zich? omdat Tim niets te doen heeft.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Eva heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Eva sneller moe.

Jan jest głodny. dlatego Jan szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Jan szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Jan jest głodny.
Marek chce zdążyć. dlatego Marek się spieszy.
Marek patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Marek nie zobaczył znaku. dlaczego Marek nie zobaczył znaku? ponieważ Marek patrzył w inną stronę.
Adam stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Adam jest smutny.
Adam nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Adam się nudzi. dlaczego Adam się nudzi? ponieważ Adam nie ma nic do roboty.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Anna mało spała. więc Anna szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Marek jest głodny. więc Marek szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Adam chce zdążyć. więc Adam się spieszy.
Piotr patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Piotr nie zobaczył znaku.
Piotr stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Piotr jest smutny. dlaczego Piotr jest smutny? ponieważ Piotr stracił coś bliskiego.
Jan nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Jan się nudzi.
Jan mało spał. dlatego Jan szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Jan szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Jan mało spał.
dlaczego człowiek szuka jedzenia, kiedy jest głodny? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje: kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia.
dlaczego ludzie się spieszą, kiedy chcą zdążyć? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba: kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Piotr stracił coś bliskiego. więc Piotr jest smutny.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Jan nie ma nic do roboty. więc Jan się nudzi.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Marek mało spał. więc Marek szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. dlaczego spieszy się? ponieważ człowiek chce zdążyć.
dlaczego człowiek nie widzi znaku, kiedy patrzy w inną stronę? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy.
dlaczego ludzie są smutni, kiedy tracą coś bliskiego? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. dlaczego? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi.
dlaczego człowiek szybciej się męczy, kiedy mało śpi? bo sen przywraca siły: kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy.
Maria jest zmęczona. dlatego Maria popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Maria popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Maria jest zmęczona.
Ewa nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Ewa się boi.
Ewa robi to codziennie. dlatego Ewa robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Ewa robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Ewa robi to codziennie.
Zofia dostała prezent. dlatego Zofia się cieszy.
Zofia dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Zofia się złości. dlaczego Zofia się złości? ponieważ Zofia dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Ewa jest zmęczona. więc Ewa popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Zofia nie wie, co będzie. więc Zofia się boi.
Anna robi to codziennie. dlatego Anna robi to bez namysłu.
Anna dostała prezent. dlatego Anna się cieszy. dlaczego Anna się cieszy? ponieważ Anna dostała prezent.
Maria dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Maria się złości.
Maria wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Maria lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Maria lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Maria wiele razy powtórzyła słowa.
Marek jest zmęczony. dlatego Marek popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Marek popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Marek jest zmęczony.
Adam nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Adam się boi.
Adam robi to codziennie. dlatego Adam robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Adam robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Adam robi to codziennie.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Anna dostała prezent. więc Anna się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Maria dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Maria się złości.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Ewa wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. więc Ewa lepiej je pamięta.
Piotr jest zmęczony. dlatego Piotr popełnia więcej błędów.
Piotr nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Piotr się boi. dlaczego Piotr się boi? ponieważ Piotr nie wie, co będzie.
Jan robi to codziennie. dlatego Jan robi to bez namysłu.
Jan dostał prezent. dlatego Jan się cieszy. dlaczego Jan się cieszy? ponieważ Jan dostał prezent.
Marek dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Marek się złości.
Marek wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Marek lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Marek lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Marek wiele razy powtórzył słowa.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Piotr nie wie, co będzie. więc Piotr się boi.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Jan robi to codziennie. więc Jan robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Marek dostał prezent. więc Marek się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Adam dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Adam się złości.
Piotr wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Piotr lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego człowiek popełnia więcej błędów, kiedy jest zmęczony? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę.
dlaczego ludzie boją się nieznanego? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem.
dlaczego człowiek cieszy się, kiedy dostaje prezent? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta: kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się.
dlaczego ludzie złoszczą się na niesprawiedliwe uwagi? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie: kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć.
ludzie się uczą. dlaczego ludzie się uczą? żeby umieć więcej.
Zofia jest głodna. dlatego Zofia szuka jedzenia.
Zofia chce zdążyć. dlatego Zofia się spieszy. dlaczego Zofia się spieszy? ponieważ Zofia chce zdążyć.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. dlaczego złości się? ponieważ człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
dlaczego człowiek lepiej pamięta słowa, kiedy wiele razy je powtarza? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć.
dlaczego człowiek je? żeby nie być głodnym.
Anna jest głodna. dlatego Anna szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Anna szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Anna jest głodna.
Maria chce zdążyć. dlatego Maria się spieszy.
Maria patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Maria nie zobaczyła znaku. dlaczego Maria nie zobaczyła znaku? ponieważ Maria patrzyła w inną stronę.
Ewa straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Ewa jest smutna.
Ewa nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Ewa się nudzi. dlaczego Ewa się nudzi? ponieważ Ewa nie ma nic do roboty.
Zofia mało spała. dlatego Zofia szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Anna jest głodna. więc Anna szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Maria chce zdążyć. więc Maria się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Ewa patrzyła w inną stronę. więc Ewa nie zobaczyła znaku.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Zofia straciła coś bliskiego. więc Zofia jest smutna.
Anna nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Anna się nudzi.
Anna mało spała. dlatego Anna szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Anna szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Anna mało spała.

когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Вера устала. значит Вера ошибается чаще.
Пётр хочет успеть. поэтому Пётр спешит.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. почему он радуется? потому что человек получает подарок.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Ольга получила несправедливое замечание. значит Ольга злится.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Борис мало спал. значит Борис устаёт быстрее.
Мария голодна. поэтому Мария ищет еду.
Иван делает это каждый день. поэтому Иван делает это не думая. почему Иван делает это не думая? потому что Иван делает это каждый день.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. почему? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого.
Анна сидит без дела. поэтому Анна скучает. почему Анна скучает? потому что Анна сидит без дела.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Пётр устал. значит Пётр ошибается чаще.
Ольга не знает, что будет. поэтому Ольга боится. почему Ольга боится? потому что Ольга не знает, что будет.
Борис смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Борис не увидел знака.
почему, когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо.
Ольга много раз повторила слова. поэтому Ольга помнит их лучше.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Борис голоден. значит Борис ищет еду.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Мария получила подарок. значит Мария радуется.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Олег сидит без дела. значит Олег скучает.
Вера мало спала. поэтому Вера устаёт быстрее. почему Вера устаёт быстрее? потому что Вера мало спала.
Иван не знает, что будет. поэтому Иван боится.
почему люди не видят знака, когда смотрят в другую сторону? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит.
Анна потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Анна грустит.
Пётр много раз повторил слова. поэтому Пётр помнит их лучше. почему Пётр помнит их лучше? потому что Пётр много раз повторил слова.
Ольга устала. поэтому Ольга ошибается чаще.
Олег хочет успеть. поэтому Олег спешит. почему Олег спешит? потому что Олег хочет успеть.
почему люди радуются подаркам? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят: когда человек получает подарок, он радуется.
Мария получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Мария злится. почему Мария злится? потому что Мария получила несправедливое замечание.
Олег мало спал. поэтому Олег устаёт быстрее.
Вера голодна. поэтому Вера ищет еду. почему Вера ищет еду? потому что Вера голодна.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Анна делает это каждый день. значит Анна делает это не думая.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Иван потерял дорогую ему вещь. значит Иван грустит.
Вера сидит без дела. поэтому Вера скучает.
Пётр устал. поэтому Пётр ошибается чаще. почему Пётр ошибается чаще? потому что Пётр устал.
почему человек спешит, когда хочет успеть? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Вера смотрела в другую сторону. значит Вера не увидела знака.
Пётр получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Пётр злится.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. почему он устаёт быстрее? потому что человек мало спит.
Олег голоден. поэтому Олег ищет еду.
почему человек делает не думая то, что делает каждый день? потому что повторение делает действие привычным: когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая.
Мария получила подарок. поэтому Мария радуется.
Иван сидит без дела. поэтому Иван скучает. почему Иван скучает? потому что Иван сидит без дела.
зачем люди едят? чтобы не быть голодным.
Борис не знает, что будет. поэтому Борис боится. почему Борис боится? потому что Борис не знает, что будет.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Пётр смотрел в другую сторону. значит Пётр не увидел знака.
Ольга потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Ольга грустит. почему Ольга грустит? потому что Ольга потеряла дорогую ей вещь.
Борис много раз повторил слова. поэтому Борис помнит их лучше.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. почему он ищет еду? потому что человек голоден.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Ольга хочет успеть. значит Ольга спешит.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Борис получил подарок. значит Борис радуется.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Мария мало спала. значит Мария устаёт быстрее.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. почему? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть.
Анна делает это каждый день. поэтому Анна делает это не думая. почему Анна делает это не думая? потому что Анна делает это каждый день.
Иван потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Иван грустит.
почему люди лучше помнят то, что повторяют? потому что повторение укрепляет память.
Борис устал. поэтому Борис ошибается чаще.
почему, когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно.
Ольга смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Ольга не увидела знака.
Олег получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Олег злится. почему Олег злится? потому что Олег получил несправедливое замечание.
почему люди устают быстрее, когда мало спят? потому что сон восстанавливает силы: когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Мария голодна. значит Мария ищет еду.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Олег делает это каждый день. значит Олег делает это не думая.
Вера получила подарок. поэтому Вера радуется. почему Вера радуется? потому что Вера получила подарок.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Анна сидит без дела. значит Анна скучает.
почему люди ошибаются чаще, когда устали? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание.
Анна не знает, что будет. поэтому Анна боится.
Пётр смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Пётр не увидел знака. почему Пётр не увидел знака? потому что Пётр смотрел в другую сторону.
почему человек злится, когда получает несправедливое замечание? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Вера много раз повторила слова. значит Вера помнит их лучше.
почему люди ищут еду, когда голодны? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает: когда человек голоден, он ищет еду.
Мария хочет успеть. поэтому Мария спешит. почему Мария спешит? потому что Мария хочет успеть.
Олег получил подарок. поэтому Олег радуется.
почему человек скучает, когда сидит без дела? потому что время без занятия тянется долго: когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает.
Мария мало спала. поэтому Мария устаёт быстрее.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Иван не знает, что будет. значит Иван боится.
Вера делает это каждый день. поэтому Вера делает это не думая.
Борис потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Борис грустит. почему Борис грустит? потому что Борис потерял дорогую ему вещь.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Пётр много раз повторил слова. значит Пётр помнит их лучше.

when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. jane is tired. so jane makes more mistakes.
peter wants to be in time. therefore peter hurries.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. why is that person glad? because a person gets a gift.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. kate got an unfair remark. so kate is angry.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. mark slept little. so mark gets tired faster.
mary is hungry. therefore mary looks for food.
ivan does it every day. therefore ivan does it without thinking. why does ivan do it without thinking? because ivan does it every day.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. why? because they miss what was dear to them.
anna has nothing to do. therefore anna is bored. why is anna bored? because anna has nothing to do.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. peter is tired. so peter makes more mistakes.
kate does not know what will happen. therefore kate is afraid. why is kate afraid? because kate does not know what will happen.
mark looked the other way. therefore mark did not see the sign.
why, when a person gets an unfair remark, is that person angry? because a person expects to be treated fairly.
kate repeated the words many times. therefore kate remembers them better.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. mark is hungry. so mark looks for food.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. mary got a gift. so mary is glad.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. john has nothing to do. so john is bored.
jane slept little. therefore jane gets tired faster. why does jane get tired faster? because jane slept little.
ivan does not know what will happen. therefore ivan is afraid.
why do people not see the sign when they look the other way? because a person sees only what they look at.
anna lost something dear. therefore anna is sad.
peter repeated the words many times. therefore peter remembers them better. why does peter remember them better? because peter repeated the words many times.
kate is tired. therefore kate makes more mistakes.
john wants to be in time. therefore john hurries. why does john hurry? because john wants to be in time.
why are people glad to get gifts? because a gift shows that someone remembers them: when a person gets a gift, that person is glad.
mary got an unfair remark. therefore mary is angry. why is mary angry? because mary got an unfair remark.
john slept little. therefore john gets tired faster.
jane is hungry. therefore jane looks for food. why does jane look for food? because jane is hungry.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. anna does it every day. so anna does it without thinking.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. ivan lost something dear. so ivan is sad.
jane has nothing to do. therefore jane is bored.
peter is tired. therefore peter makes more mistakes. why does peter make more mistakes? because peter is tired.
why does a person hurry when they want to be in time? because less time is left than is needed.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. jane looked the other way. so jane did not see the sign.
peter got an unfair remark. therefore peter is angry.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. why does that person get tired faster? because a person sleeps little.
john is hungry. therefore john looks for food.
why does a person do without thinking what they do every day? because repetition makes an action a habit: when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking.
mary got a gift. therefore mary is glad.
ivan has nothing to do. therefore ivan is bored. why is ivan bored? because ivan has nothing to do.
why do people eat? in order not to be hungry.
mark does not know what will happen. therefore mark is afraid. why is mark afraid? because mark does not know what will happen.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. peter looked the other way. so peter did not see the sign.
kate lost something dear. therefore kate is sad. why is kate sad? because kate lost something dear.
mark repeated the words many times. therefore mark remembers them better.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. why does that person look for food? because a person is hungry.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. kate wants to be in time. so kate hurries.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. mark got a gift. so mark is glad.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. mary slept little. so mary gets tired faster.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. why? because the unknown cannot be foreseen.
anna does it every day. therefore anna does it without thinking. why does anna do it without thinking? because anna does it every day.
ivan lost something dear. therefore ivan is sad.
why do people remember better what they repeat? because repetition strengthens memory.
mark is tired. therefore mark makes more mistakes.
why, when a person wants to be in time, does that person hurry? because less time is left than is needed.
kate looked the other way. therefore kate did not see the sign.
john got an unfair remark. therefore john is angry. why is john angry? because john got an unfair remark.
why do people get tired faster when they sleep little? because sleep restores strength: when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. mary is hungry. so mary looks for food.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. john does it every day. so john does it without thinking.
jane got a gift. therefore jane is glad. why is jane glad? because jane got a gift.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. anna has nothing to do. so anna is bored.
why do people make more mistakes when they are tired? because tiredness weakens attention.
anna does not know what will happen. therefore anna is afraid.
peter looked the other way. therefore peter did not see the sign. why did peter not see the sign? because peter looked the other way.
why is a person angry when they get an unfair remark? because a person expects to be treated fairly.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. jane repeated the words many times. so jane remembers them better.
why do people look for food when they are hungry? because the body asks for what it lacks: when a person is hungry, that person looks for food.
mary wants to be in time. therefore mary hurries. why does mary hurry? because mary wants to be in time.
john got a gift. therefore john is glad.
why is a person bored when they have nothing to do? because time without an occupation seems long: when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored.
mary slept little. therefore mary gets tired faster.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. ivan does not know what will happen. so ivan is afraid.
jane does it every day. therefore jane does it without thinking.
mark lost something dear. therefore mark is sad. why is mark sad? because mark lost something dear.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. peter repeated the words many times. so peter remembers them better.

Anna ist müde. deshalb macht Anna mehr Fehler.
Max will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Max sich.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Paul hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Paul.
Lena hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Lena. warum ärgert sich Lena? weil Lena eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Lena hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Lena schneller müde.
warum fürchten Menschen das Unbekannte? weil man das Unbekannte nicht vorhersehen kann: wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst.
Lena macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Lena es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Eva hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Eva traurig.
Jonas hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Jonas sie sich besser.
Eva ist müde. deshalb macht Eva mehr Fehler. warum macht Eva mehr Fehler? weil Eva müde ist.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Maria will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Maria sich.
Paul hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Paul. warum freut sich Paul? weil Paul ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. warum? weil Zeit ohne Beschäftigung lang wird.
Eva hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Eva schneller müde.
Paul weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Paul Angst.
warum sehen Menschen das Zeichen nicht, wenn sie wegschauen? weil ein Mensch nur sieht, wohin er schaut.
Maria hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Maria traurig. warum ist Maria traurig? weil Maria etwas Liebes verloren hat.
Felix hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Felix sie sich besser. warum merkt Felix sie sich besser? weil Felix die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
warum sucht ein Mensch Essen, wenn er hungrig ist? weil der Körper verlangt, was ihm fehlt.
Maria will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Maria sich.
Felix hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Felix.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Max hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Max.
wozu schlafen Menschen? um sich auszuruhen.
Max weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Max Angst. warum hat Max Angst? weil Max nicht weiß, was kommt.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Jonas hat weggeschaut. also hat Jonas das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich.
Anna hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Anna sie sich besser.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Paul ist hungrig. also sucht Paul Essen.
Lena will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Lena sich. warum beeilt Lena sich? weil Lena rechtzeitig kommen will.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Lena hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Lena.
Jonas hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Jonas. warum langweilt sich Jonas? weil Jonas nichts zu tun hat.
wozu lernt ein Mensch? um mehr zu können.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Eva weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Eva Angst.
Jonas hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Jonas das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
warum ärgert sich ein Mensch, wenn er eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt? weil ein Mensch erwartet, gerecht behandelt zu werden: wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich.
Eva hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Eva sie sich besser. warum merkt Eva sie sich besser? weil Eva die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
Paul ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Paul Essen. warum sucht Paul Essen? weil Paul hungrig ist.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. warum? weil Wiederholung eine Handlung zur Gewohnheit macht.
Eva hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Eva.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Anna hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Anna.
warum machen Menschen mehr Fehler, wenn sie müde sind? weil Müdigkeit die Aufmerksamkeit schwächt.
Maria weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Maria Angst. warum hat Maria Angst? weil Maria nicht weiß, was kommt.
Felix hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Felix das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Felix das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Felix weggeschaut hat.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Felix hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Felix.
warum wird ein Mensch schneller müde, wenn er wenig schläft? weil Schlaf die Kräfte wiederherstellt.
Felix ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Felix Essen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Max macht es jeden Tag. also macht Max es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. warum ist er traurig? weil ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert.
Anna hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Anna. warum langweilt sich Anna? weil Anna nichts zu tun hat.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Jonas ist müde. also macht Jonas mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich.
Anna hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Anna das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
Max hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Max.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Paul hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Paul schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Lena ist hungrig. also sucht Lena Essen.
Jonas macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Jonas es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Jonas es ohne nachzudenken? weil Jonas es jeden Tag macht.
warum sind Menschen traurig, wenn sie etwas Liebes verlieren? weil ihm fehlt, was ihm lieb war: wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig.
Lena hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Lena.
Jonas ist müde. deshalb macht Jonas mehr Fehler.
warum beeilt sich ein Mensch, wenn er rechtzeitig kommen will? weil weniger Zeit bleibt als nötig ist: wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich.
Eva hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Eva das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Eva das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Eva weggeschaut hat.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Maria hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Maria.
Paul hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Paul schneller müde. warum wird Paul schneller müde? weil Paul wenig geschlafen hat.
Eva ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Eva Essen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Anna macht es jeden Tag. also macht Anna es ohne nachzudenken.
Paul hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Paul traurig.
warum merken sich Menschen besser, was sie wiederholen? weil Wiederholung das Gedächtnis stärkt.
Felix ist müde. deshalb macht Felix mehr Fehler. warum macht Felix mehr Fehler? weil Felix müde ist.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Felix will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Felix sich.
warum freut sich ein Mensch, wenn er ein Geschenk bekommt? weil ein Geschenk zeigt, dass jemand an ihn denkt.
Maria hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Maria.
Felix hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Felix schneller müde.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. warum hat er Angst? weil ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt.
Anna macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Anna es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Anna es ohne nachzudenken? weil Anna es jeden Tag macht.
Max hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Max traurig. warum ist Max traurig? weil Max etwas Liebes verloren hat.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Jonas hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Jonas sie sich besser.

quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Claire est fatiguée. donc Claire fait plus d'erreurs.
Paul veut arriver à temps. donc Paul se dépêche.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. pourquoi elle est contente ? parce qu'une personne reçoit un cadeau.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Julie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Julie est en colère.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Hugo a peu dormi. donc Hugo se fatigue plus vite.
Marie a faim. donc Marie cherche à manger.
Louis le fait chaque jour. donc Louis le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Louis le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Louis le fait chaque jour.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. pourquoi ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque.
Anne n'a rien à faire. donc Anne s'ennuie. pourquoi Anne s'ennuie ? parce qu'Anne n'a rien à faire.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Paul est fatigué. donc Paul fait plus d'erreurs.
Julie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Julie a peur. pourquoi Julie a peur ? parce que Julie ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
Hugo regardait ailleurs. donc Hugo n'a pas vu le signe.
pourquoi, quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice.
Julie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Julie les retient mieux.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Hugo a faim. donc Hugo cherche à manger.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Marie a reçu un cadeau. donc Marie est contente.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Jules n'a rien à faire. donc Jules s'ennuie.
Claire a peu dormi. donc Claire se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Claire se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Claire a peu dormi.
Louis ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Louis a peur.
pourquoi les gens ne voient-ils pas le signe quand ils regardent ailleurs ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde.
Anne a perdu une chose chère. donc Anne est triste.
Paul a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Paul les retient mieux. pourquoi Paul les retient mieux ? parce que Paul a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
Julie est fatiguée. donc Julie fait plus d'erreurs.
Jules veut arriver à temps. donc Jules se dépêche. pourquoi Jules se dépêche ? parce que Jules veut arriver à temps.
pourquoi les gens sont-ils contents de recevoir des cadeaux ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle: quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente.
Marie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Marie est en colère. pourquoi Marie est en colère ? parce que Marie a reçu une remarque injuste.
Jules a peu dormi. donc Jules se fatigue plus vite.
Claire a faim. donc Claire cherche à manger. pourquoi Claire cherche à manger ? parce que Claire a faim.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Anne le fait chaque jour. donc Anne le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Louis a perdu une chose chère. donc Louis est triste.
Claire n'a rien à faire. donc Claire s'ennuie.
Paul est fatigué. donc Paul fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Paul fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Paul est fatigué.
pourquoi une personne se dépêche-t-elle quand elle veut arriver à temps ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Claire regardait ailleurs. donc Claire n'a pas vu le signe.
Paul a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Paul est en colère.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi elle se fatigue plus vite ? parce qu'une personne dort peu.
Jules a faim. donc Jules cherche à manger.
pourquoi une personne fait-elle sans réfléchir ce qu'elle fait chaque jour ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel: quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir.
Marie a reçu un cadeau. donc Marie est contente.
Louis n'a rien à faire. donc Louis s'ennuie. pourquoi Louis s'ennuie ? parce que Louis n'a rien à faire.
pourquoi les gens mangent ? pour ne pas avoir faim.
Hugo ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Hugo a peur. pourquoi Hugo a peur ? parce que Hugo ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Paul regardait ailleurs. donc Paul n'a pas vu le signe.
Julie a perdu une chose chère. donc Julie est triste. pourquoi Julie est triste ? parce que Julie a perdu une chose chère.
Hugo a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Hugo les retient mieux.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. pourquoi elle cherche à manger ? parce qu'une personne a faim.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Julie veut arriver à temps. donc Julie se dépêche.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Hugo a reçu un cadeau. donc Hugo est content.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Marie a peu dormi. donc Marie se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. pourquoi ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu.
Anne le fait chaque jour. donc Anne le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Anne le fait sans réfléchir ? parce qu'Anne le fait chaque jour.
Louis a perdu une chose chère. donc Louis est triste.
pourquoi les gens retiennent-ils mieux ce qu'ils répètent ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire.
Hugo est fatigué. donc Hugo fait plus d'erreurs.
pourquoi, quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut.
Julie regardait ailleurs. donc Julie n'a pas vu le signe.
Jules a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Jules est en colère. pourquoi Jules est en colère ? parce que Jules a reçu une remarque injuste.
pourquoi les gens se fatiguent-ils plus vite quand ils dorment peu ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces: quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Marie a faim. donc Marie cherche à manger.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Jules le fait chaque jour. donc Jules le fait sans réfléchir.
Claire a reçu un cadeau. donc Claire est contente. pourquoi Claire est contente ? parce que Claire a reçu un cadeau.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Anne n'a rien à faire. donc Anne s'ennuie.
pourquoi les gens font-ils plus d'erreurs quand ils sont fatigués ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention.
Anne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Anne a peur.
Paul regardait ailleurs. donc Paul n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Paul n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Paul regardait ailleurs.
pourquoi une personne est-elle en colère quand elle reçoit une remarque injuste ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Claire a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Claire les retient mieux.
pourquoi les gens cherchent-ils à manger quand ils ont faim ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque: quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger.
Marie veut arriver à temps. donc Marie se dépêche. pourquoi Marie se dépêche ? parce que Marie veut arriver à temps.
Jules a reçu un cadeau. donc Jules est content.
pourquoi une personne s'ennuie-t-elle quand elle n'a rien à faire ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long: quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie.
Marie a peu dormi. donc Marie se fatigue plus vite.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Louis ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Louis a peur.
Claire le fait chaque jour. donc Claire le fait sans réfléchir.
Hugo a perdu une chose chère. donc Hugo est triste. pourquoi Hugo est triste ? parce que Hugo a perdu une chose chère.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Paul a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Paul les retient mieux.

cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Elena está cansada. así que Elena comete más errores.
Pablo quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Pablo se apresura.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. ¿por qué está contenta? porque una persona recibe un regalo.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Lucía recibió un comentario injusto. así que Lucía está enfadada.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Carlos durmió poco. así que Carlos se cansa antes.
María tiene hambre. por eso María busca comida.
Luis lo hace cada día. por eso Luis lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Luis lo hace sin pensar? porque Luis lo hace cada día.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. ¿por qué? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido.
Ana no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Ana se aburre. ¿por qué Ana se aburre? porque Ana no tiene nada que hacer.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Pablo está cansado. así que Pablo comete más errores.
Lucía no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Lucía tiene miedo. ¿por qué Lucía tiene miedo? porque Lucía no sabe qué va a pasar.
Carlos miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Carlos no vio la señal.
¿por qué, cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia.
Lucía repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Lucía las recuerda mejor.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Carlos tiene hambre. así que Carlos busca comida.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. María recibió un regalo. así que María está contenta.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Diego no tiene nada que hacer. así que Diego se aburre.
Elena durmió poco. por eso Elena se cansa antes. ¿por qué Elena se cansa antes? porque Elena durmió poco.
Luis no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Luis tiene miedo.
¿por qué la gente no ve la señal cuando mira hacia otro lado? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira.
Ana perdió algo querido. por eso Ana está triste.
Pablo repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Pablo las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Pablo las recuerda mejor? porque Pablo repitió las palabras muchas veces.
Lucía está cansada. por eso Lucía comete más errores.
Diego quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Diego se apresura. ¿por qué Diego se apresura? porque Diego quiere llegar a tiempo.
¿por qué la gente se alegra de recibir regalos? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella: cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta.
María recibió un comentario injusto. por eso María está enfadada. ¿por qué María está enfadada? porque María recibió un comentario injusto.
Diego durmió poco. por eso Diego se cansa antes.
Elena tiene hambre. por eso Elena busca comida. ¿por qué Elena busca comida? porque Elena tiene hambre.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Ana lo hace cada día. así que Ana lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Luis perdió algo querido. así que Luis está triste.
Elena no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Elena se aburre.
Pablo está cansado. por eso Pablo comete más errores. ¿por qué Pablo comete más errores? porque Pablo está cansado.
¿por qué una persona se apresura cuando quiere llegar a tiempo? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Elena miraba hacia otro lado. así que Elena no vio la señal.
Pablo recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Pablo está enfadado.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. ¿por qué se cansa antes? porque una persona duerme poco.
Diego tiene hambre. por eso Diego busca comida.
¿por qué una persona hace sin pensar lo que hace cada día? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre: cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar.
María recibió un regalo. por eso María está contenta.
Luis no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Luis se aburre. ¿por qué Luis se aburre? porque Luis no tiene nada que hacer.
¿por qué la gente come? para no tener hambre.
Carlos no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Carlos tiene miedo. ¿por qué Carlos tiene miedo? porque Carlos no sabe qué va a pasar.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Pablo miraba hacia otro lado. así que Pablo no vio la señal.
Lucía perdió algo querido. por eso Lucía está triste. ¿por qué Lucía está triste? porque Lucía perdió algo querido.
Carlos repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Carlos las recuerda mejor.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. ¿por qué busca comida? porque una persona tiene hambre.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Lucía quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Lucía se apresura.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Carlos recibió un regalo. así que Carlos está contento.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. María durmió poco. así que María se cansa antes.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. ¿por qué? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever.
Ana lo hace cada día. por eso Ana lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Ana lo hace sin pensar? porque Ana lo hace cada día.
Luis perdió algo querido. por eso Luis está triste.
¿por qué la gente recuerda mejor lo que repite? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria.
Carlos está cansado. por eso Carlos comete más errores.
¿por qué, cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta.
Lucía miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Lucía no vio la señal.
Diego recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Diego está enfadado. ¿por qué Diego está enfadado? porque Diego recibió un comentario injusto.
¿por qué la gente se cansa antes cuando duerme poco? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas: cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. María tiene hambre. así que María busca comida.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Diego lo hace cada día. así que Diego lo hace sin pensar.
Elena recibió un regalo. por eso Elena está contenta. ¿por qué Elena está contenta? porque Elena recibió un regalo.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Ana no tiene nada que hacer. así que Ana se aburre.
¿por qué la gente comete más errores cuando está cansada? porque el cansancio debilita la atención.
Ana no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Ana tiene miedo.
Pablo miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Pablo no vio la señal. ¿por qué Pablo no vio la señal? porque Pablo miraba hacia otro lado.
¿por qué una persona está enfadada cuando recibe un comentario injusto? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Elena repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Elena las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué la gente busca comida cuando tiene hambre? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta: cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida.
María quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso María se apresura. ¿por qué María se apresura? porque María quiere llegar a tiempo.
Diego recibió un regalo. por eso Diego está contento.
¿por qué una persona se aburre cuando no tiene nada que hacer? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo: cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre.
María durmió poco. por eso María se cansa antes.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Luis no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Luis tiene miedo.
Elena lo hace cada día. por eso Elena lo hace sin pensar.
Carlos perdió algo querido. por eso Carlos está triste. ¿por qué Carlos está triste? porque Carlos perdió algo querido.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Pablo repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Pablo las recuerda mejor.

quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Chiara è stanca. quindi Chiara fa più errori.
Marco vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Marco si affretta.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. perché è contenta? perché una persona riceve un regalo.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Giulia ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Giulia è arrabbiata.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Matteo ha dormito poco. quindi Matteo si stanca prima.
Maria ha fame. perciò Maria cerca del cibo.
Luca lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Luca lo fa senza pensare. perché Luca lo fa senza pensare? perché Luca lo fa ogni giorno.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. perché? perché le manca ciò che le era caro.
Anna non ha niente da fare. perciò Anna si annoia. perché Anna si annoia? perché Anna non ha niente da fare.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Marco è stanco. quindi Marco fa più errori.
Giulia non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Giulia ha paura. perché Giulia ha paura? perché Giulia non sa che cosa succederà.
Matteo guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Matteo non ha visto il segnale.
perché, quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia.
Giulia ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Giulia le ricorda meglio.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Matteo ha fame. quindi Matteo cerca del cibo.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Maria ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Maria è contenta.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Paolo non ha niente da fare. quindi Paolo si annoia.
Chiara ha dormito poco. perciò Chiara si stanca prima. perché Chiara si stanca prima? perché Chiara ha dormito poco.
Luca non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Luca ha paura.
perché le persone non vedono il segnale quando guardano dall'altra parte? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda.
Anna ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Anna è triste.
Marco ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Marco le ricorda meglio. perché Marco le ricorda meglio? perché Marco ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
Giulia è stanca. perciò Giulia fa più errori.
Paolo vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Paolo si affretta. perché Paolo si affretta? perché Paolo vuole arrivare in tempo.
perché le persone sono contente di ricevere regali? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei: quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta.
Maria ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Maria è arrabbiata. perché Maria è arrabbiata? perché Maria ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
Paolo ha dormito poco. perciò Paolo si stanca prima.
Chiara ha fame. perciò Chiara cerca del cibo. perché Chiara cerca del cibo? perché Chiara ha fame.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Anna lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Anna lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Luca ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Luca è triste.
Chiara non ha niente da fare. perciò Chiara si annoia.
Marco è stanco. perciò Marco fa più errori. perché Marco fa più errori? perché Marco è stanco.
perché una persona si affretta quando vuole arrivare in tempo? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Chiara guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Chiara non ha visto il segnale.
Marco ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Marco è arrabbiato.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. perché si stanca prima? perché una persona dorme poco.
Paolo ha fame. perciò Paolo cerca del cibo.
perché una persona fa senza pensare ciò che fa ogni giorno? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale: quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare.
Maria ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Maria è contenta.
Luca non ha niente da fare. perciò Luca si annoia. perché Luca si annoia? perché Luca non ha niente da fare.
perché le persone mangiano? per non avere fame.
Matteo non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Matteo ha paura. perché Matteo ha paura? perché Matteo non sa che cosa succederà.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Marco guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Marco non ha visto il segnale.
Giulia ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Giulia è triste. perché Giulia è triste? perché Giulia ha perso una cosa cara.
Matteo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Matteo le ricorda meglio.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. perché cerca del cibo? perché una persona ha fame.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Giulia vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Giulia si affretta.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Matteo ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Matteo è contento.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Maria ha dormito poco. quindi Maria si stanca prima.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. perché? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere.
Anna lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Anna lo fa senza pensare. perché Anna lo fa senza pensare? perché Anna lo fa ogni giorno.
Luca ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Luca è triste.
perché le persone ricordano meglio ciò che ripetono? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria.
Matteo è stanco. perciò Matteo fa più errori.
perché, quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve.
Giulia guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Giulia non ha visto il segnale.
Paolo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Paolo è arrabbiato. perché Paolo è arrabbiato? perché Paolo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
perché le persone si stancano prima quando dormono poco? perché il sonno ridà le forze: quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Maria ha fame. quindi Maria cerca del cibo.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Paolo lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Paolo lo fa senza pensare.
Chiara ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Chiara è contenta. perché Chiara è contenta? perché Chiara ha ricevuto un regalo.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Anna non ha niente da fare. quindi Anna si annoia.
perché le persone fanno più errori quando sono stanche? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione.
Anna non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Anna ha paura.
Marco guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Marco non ha visto il segnale. perché Marco non ha visto il segnale? perché Marco guardava dall'altra parte.
perché una persona è arrabbiata quando riceve un rimprovero ingiusto? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Chiara ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Chiara le ricorda meglio.
perché le persone cercano del cibo quando hanno fame? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca: quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo.
Maria vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Maria si affretta. perché Maria si affretta? perché Maria vuole arrivare in tempo.
Paolo ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Paolo è contento.
perché una persona si annoia quando non ha niente da fare? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo: quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia.
Maria ha dormito poco. perciò Maria si stanca prima.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Luca non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Luca ha paura.
Chiara lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Chiara lo fa senza pensare.
Matteo ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Matteo è triste. perché Matteo è triste? perché Matteo ha perso una cosa cara.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Marco ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Marco le ricorda meglio.

quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Sofia está cansada. portanto Sofia comete mais erros.
Pedro quer chegar a tempo. por isso Pedro apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. porque é que está contente? porque uma pessoa recebe um presente.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Rita recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Rita está zangada.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. João dormiu pouco. portanto João cansa-se mais depressa.
Maria tem fome. por isso Maria procura comida.
Tiago fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Tiago fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Tiago fá-lo sem pensar? porque Tiago fá-lo todos os dias.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. porquê? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido.
Ana não tem nada para fazer. por isso Ana aborrece-se. porque é que Ana aborrece-se? porque Ana não tem nada para fazer.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Pedro está cansado. portanto Pedro comete mais erros.
Rita não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Rita tem medo. porque é que Rita tem medo? porque Rita não sabe o que vai acontecer.
João olhava para o outro lado. por isso João não viu o sinal.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça.
Rita repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Rita lembra-se melhor delas.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. João tem fome. portanto João procura comida.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Maria recebeu um presente. portanto Maria está contente.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Rui não tem nada para fazer. portanto Rui aborrece-se.
Sofia dormiu pouco. por isso Sofia cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Sofia cansa-se mais depressa? porque Sofia dormiu pouco.
Tiago não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Tiago tem medo.
porque é que as pessoas não veem o sinal quando olham para o outro lado? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha.
Ana perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Ana está triste.
Pedro repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Pedro lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Pedro lembra-se melhor delas? porque Pedro repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
Rita está cansada. por isso Rita comete mais erros.
Rui quer chegar a tempo. por isso Rui apressa-se. porque é que Rui apressa-se? porque Rui quer chegar a tempo.
porque é que as pessoas ficam contentes com presentes? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela: quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente.
Maria recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Maria está zangada. porque é que Maria está zangada? porque Maria recebeu um comentário injusto.
Rui dormiu pouco. por isso Rui cansa-se mais depressa.
Sofia tem fome. por isso Sofia procura comida. porque é que Sofia procura comida? porque Sofia tem fome.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Ana fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Ana fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Tiago perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Tiago está triste.
Sofia não tem nada para fazer. por isso Sofia aborrece-se.
Pedro está cansado. por isso Pedro comete mais erros. porque é que Pedro comete mais erros? porque Pedro está cansado.
porque é que uma pessoa se apressa quando quer chegar a tempo? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Sofia olhava para o outro lado. portanto Sofia não viu o sinal.
Pedro recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Pedro está zangado.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que cansa-se mais depressa? porque uma pessoa dorme pouco.
Rui tem fome. por isso Rui procura comida.
porque é que uma pessoa faz sem pensar o que faz todos os dias? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual: quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar.
Maria recebeu um presente. por isso Maria está contente.
Tiago não tem nada para fazer. por isso Tiago aborrece-se. porque é que Tiago aborrece-se? porque Tiago não tem nada para fazer.
porque é que as pessoas comem? para não ter fome.
João não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso João tem medo. porque é que João tem medo? porque João não sabe o que vai acontecer.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Pedro olhava para o outro lado. portanto Pedro não viu o sinal.
Rita perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Rita está triste. porque é que Rita está triste? porque Rita perdeu uma coisa querida.
João repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso João lembra-se melhor delas.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. porque é que procura comida? porque uma pessoa tem fome.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Rita quer chegar a tempo. portanto Rita apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. João recebeu um presente. portanto João está contente.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Maria dormiu pouco. portanto Maria cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. porquê? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever.
Ana fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Ana fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Ana fá-lo sem pensar? porque Ana fá-lo todos os dias.
Tiago perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Tiago está triste.
porque é que as pessoas se lembram melhor do que repetem? porque a repetição reforça a memória.
João está cansado. por isso João comete mais erros.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso.
Rita olhava para o outro lado. por isso Rita não viu o sinal.
Rui recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Rui está zangado. porque é que Rui está zangado? porque Rui recebeu um comentário injusto.
porque é que as pessoas se cansam mais depressa quando dormem pouco? porque o sono repõe as forças: quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Maria tem fome. portanto Maria procura comida.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Rui fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Rui fá-lo sem pensar.
Sofia recebeu um presente. por isso Sofia está contente. porque é que Sofia está contente? porque Sofia recebeu um presente.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Ana não tem nada para fazer. portanto Ana aborrece-se.
porque é que as pessoas cometem mais erros quando estão cansadas? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção.
Ana não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Ana tem medo.
Pedro olhava para o outro lado. por isso Pedro não viu o sinal. porque é que Pedro não viu o sinal? porque Pedro olhava para o outro lado.
porque é que uma pessoa está zangada quando recebe um comentário injusto? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Sofia repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Sofia lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que as pessoas procuram comida quando têm fome? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta: quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida.
Maria quer chegar a tempo. por isso Maria apressa-se. porque é que Maria apressa-se? porque Maria quer chegar a tempo.
Rui recebeu um presente. por isso Rui está contente.
porque é que uma pessoa se aborrece quando não tem nada para fazer? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo: quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se.
Maria dormiu pouco. por isso Maria cansa-se mais depressa.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Tiago não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Tiago tem medo.
Sofia fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Sofia fá-lo sem pensar.
João perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso João está triste. porque é que João está triste? porque João perdeu uma coisa querida.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Pedro repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Pedro lembra-se melhor delas.

Anna is moe. daarom maakt Anna meer fouten.
Max wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Max zich.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Piet heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Piet blij.
Lotte heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Lotte boos. waarom is Lotte boos? omdat Lotte een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Lotte heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Lotte sneller moe.
waarom vrezen mensen het onbekende? omdat het onbekende niet te voorzien is: als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang.
Lotte doet het elke dag. daarom doet Lotte het zonder na te denken.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Eva is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Eva verdrietig.
Jan heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Jan ze beter.
Eva is moe. daarom maakt Eva meer fouten. waarom maakt Eva meer fouten? omdat Eva moe is.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Maria wil op tijd komen. dus haast Maria zich.
Piet heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Piet blij. waarom is Piet blij? omdat Piet een cadeau heeft gekregen.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. waarom? omdat tijd zonder bezigheid lang lijkt.
Eva heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Eva sneller moe.
Piet weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Piet bang.
waarom zien mensen het teken niet als ze de andere kant op kijken? omdat een mens alleen ziet waar hij naar kijkt.
Maria is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Maria verdrietig. waarom is Maria verdrietig? omdat Maria iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
Tim heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Tim ze beter. waarom onthoudt Tim ze beter? omdat Tim de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
waarom zoekt een mens eten als hij honger heeft? omdat het lichaam vraagt wat het mist.
Maria wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Maria zich.
Tim heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Tim blij.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Max heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Max zich.
waarom slapen mensen? om uit te rusten.
Max weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Max bang. waarom is Max bang? omdat Max niet weet wat er komt.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Jan keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Jan het teken niet gezien.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos.
Anna heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Anna ze beter.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Piet heeft honger. dus zoekt Piet eten.
Lotte wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Lotte zich. waarom haast Lotte zich? omdat Lotte op tijd wil komen.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Lotte heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Lotte blij.
Jan heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Jan zich. waarom verveelt Jan zich? omdat Jan niets te doen heeft.
waarom leert een mens? om meer te kunnen.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Eva weet niet wat er komt. dus is Eva bang.
Jan keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Jan het teken niet gezien.
waarom is een mens boos als hij een onterechte opmerking krijgt? omdat een mens verwacht eerlijk behandeld te worden: als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos.
Eva heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Eva ze beter. waarom onthoudt Eva ze beter? omdat Eva de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
Piet heeft honger. daarom zoekt Piet eten. waarom zoekt Piet eten? omdat Piet honger heeft.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. waarom? omdat herhaling een handeling tot gewoonte maakt.
Eva heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Eva blij.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Anna heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Anna zich.
waarom maken mensen meer fouten als ze moe zijn? omdat vermoeidheid de aandacht verzwakt.
Maria weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Maria bang. waarom is Maria bang? omdat Maria niet weet wat er komt.
Tim keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Tim het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Tim het teken niet gezien? omdat Tim de andere kant op keek.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Tim heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Tim boos.
waarom wordt een mens sneller moe als hij weinig slaapt? omdat slaap de krachten herstelt.
Tim heeft honger. daarom zoekt Tim eten.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Max doet het elke dag. dus doet Max het zonder na te denken.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. waarom is hij verdrietig? omdat een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt.
Anna heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Anna zich. waarom verveelt Anna zich? omdat Anna niets te doen heeft.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Jan is moe. dus maakt Jan meer fouten.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich.
Anna keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Anna het teken niet gezien.
Max heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Max boos.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Piet heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Piet sneller moe.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Lotte heeft honger. dus zoekt Lotte eten.
Jan doet het elke dag. daarom doet Jan het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Jan het zonder na te denken? omdat Jan het elke dag doet.
waarom zijn mensen verdrietig als ze iets dierbaars kwijtraken? omdat hij mist wat hem dierbaar was: als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig.
Lotte heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Lotte zich.
Jan is moe. daarom maakt Jan meer fouten.
waarom haast een mens zich als hij op tijd wil komen? omdat er minder tijd over is dan nodig is: als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich.
Eva keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Eva het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Eva het teken niet gezien? omdat Eva de andere kant op keek.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Maria heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Maria boos.
Piet heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Piet sneller moe. waarom wordt Piet sneller moe? omdat Piet weinig heeft geslapen.
Eva heeft honger. daarom zoekt Eva eten.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Anna doet het elke dag. dus doet Anna het zonder na te denken.
Piet is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Piet verdrietig.
waarom onthouden mensen beter wat ze herhalen? omdat herhaling het geheugen versterkt.
Tim is moe. daarom maakt Tim meer fouten. waarom maakt Tim meer fouten? omdat Tim moe is.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Tim wil op tijd komen. dus haast Tim zich.
waarom is een mens blij als hij een cadeau krijgt? omdat een cadeau laat zien dat iemand aan hem denkt.
Maria heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Maria boos.
Tim heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Tim sneller moe.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. waarom is hij bang? omdat een mens niet weet wat er komt.
Anna doet het elke dag. daarom doet Anna het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Anna het zonder na te denken? omdat Anna het elke dag doet.
Max is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Max verdrietig. waarom is Max verdrietig? omdat Max iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Jan heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Jan ze beter.

kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Zofia jest zmęczona. więc Zofia popełnia więcej błędów.
Piotr chce zdążyć. dlatego Piotr się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. dlaczego cieszy się? ponieważ człowiek dostaje prezent.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Ewa dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Ewa się złości.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Adam mało spał. więc Adam szybciej się męczy.
Maria jest głodna. dlatego Maria szuka jedzenia.
Jan robi to codziennie. dlatego Jan robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Jan robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Jan robi to codziennie.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. dlaczego? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie.
Anna nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Anna się nudzi. dlaczego Anna się nudzi? ponieważ Anna nie ma nic do roboty.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Piotr jest zmęczony. więc Piotr popełnia więcej błędów.
Ewa nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Ewa się boi. dlaczego Ewa się boi? ponieważ Ewa nie wie, co będzie.
Adam patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Adam nie zobaczył znaku.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie.
Ewa wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Ewa lepiej je pamięta.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Adam jest głodny. więc Adam szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Maria dostała prezent. więc Maria się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Marek nie ma nic do roboty. więc Marek się nudzi.
Zofia mało spała. dlatego Zofia szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Zofia szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Zofia mało spała.
Jan nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Jan się boi.
dlaczego ludzie nie widzą znaku, kiedy patrzą w inną stronę? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy.
Anna straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Anna jest smutna.
Piotr wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Piotr lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Piotr lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Piotr wiele razy powtórzył słowa.
Ewa jest zmęczona. dlatego Ewa popełnia więcej błędów.
Marek chce zdążyć. dlatego Marek się spieszy. dlaczego Marek się spieszy? ponieważ Marek chce zdążyć.
dlaczego ludzie cieszą się z prezentów? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta: kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się.
Maria dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Maria się złości. dlaczego Maria się złości? ponieważ Maria dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
Marek mało spał. dlatego Marek szybciej się męczy.
Zofia jest głodna. dlatego Zofia szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Zofia szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Zofia jest głodna.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Anna robi to codziennie. więc Anna robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Jan stracił coś bliskiego. więc Jan jest smutny.
Zofia nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Zofia się nudzi.
Piotr jest zmęczony. dlatego Piotr popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Piotr popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Piotr jest zmęczony.
dlaczego człowiek się spieszy, kiedy chce zdążyć? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Zofia patrzyła w inną stronę. więc Zofia nie zobaczyła znaku.
Piotr dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Piotr się złości.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. dlaczego szybciej się męczy? ponieważ człowiek mało śpi.
Marek jest głodny. dlatego Marek szuka jedzenia.
dlaczego człowiek robi bez namysłu to, co robi codziennie? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem: kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu.
Maria dostała prezent. dlatego Maria się cieszy.
Jan nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Jan się nudzi. dlaczego Jan się nudzi? ponieważ Jan nie ma nic do roboty.
dlaczego ludzie jedzą? żeby nie być głodnym.
Adam nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Adam się boi. dlaczego Adam się boi? ponieważ Adam nie wie, co będzie.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Piotr patrzył w inną stronę. więc Piotr nie zobaczył znaku.
Ewa straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Ewa jest smutna. dlaczego Ewa jest smutna? ponieważ Ewa straciła coś bliskiego.
Adam wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Adam lepiej je pamięta.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. dlaczego szuka jedzenia? ponieważ człowiek jest głodny.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Ewa chce zdążyć. więc Ewa się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Adam dostał prezent. więc Adam się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Maria mało spała. więc Maria szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. dlaczego? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć.
Anna robi to codziennie. dlatego Anna robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Anna robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Anna robi to codziennie.
Jan stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Jan jest smutny.
dlaczego ludzie lepiej pamiętają to, co powtarzają? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć.
Adam jest zmęczony. dlatego Adam popełnia więcej błędów.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba.
Ewa patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Ewa nie zobaczyła znaku.
Marek dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Marek się złości. dlaczego Marek się złości? ponieważ Marek dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
dlaczego ludzie szybciej się męczą, kiedy mało śpią? bo sen przywraca siły: kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Maria jest głodna. więc Maria szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Marek robi to codziennie. więc Marek robi to bez namysłu.
Zofia dostała prezent. dlatego Zofia się cieszy. dlaczego Zofia się cieszy? ponieważ Zofia dostała prezent.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Anna nie ma nic do roboty. więc Anna się nudzi.
dlaczego ludzie popełniają więcej błędów, kiedy są zmęczeni? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę.
Anna nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Anna się boi.
Piotr patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Piotr nie zobaczył znaku. dlaczego Piotr nie zobaczył znaku? ponieważ Piotr patrzył w inną stronę.
dlaczego człowiek złości się, kiedy dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Zofia wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. więc Zofia lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie szukają jedzenia, kiedy są głodni? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje: kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia.
Maria chce zdążyć. dlatego Maria się spieszy. dlaczego Maria się spieszy? ponieważ Maria chce zdążyć.
Marek dostał prezent. dlatego Marek się cieszy.
dlaczego człowiek nudzi się, kiedy nie ma nic do roboty? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi: kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się.
Maria mało spała. dlatego Maria szybciej się męczy.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Jan nie wie, co będzie. więc Jan się boi.
Zofia robi to codziennie. dlatego Zofia robi to bez namysłu.
Adam stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Adam jest smutny. dlaczego Adam jest smutny? ponieważ Adam stracił coś bliskiego.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Piotr wiele razy powtórzył słowa. więc Piotr lepiej je pamięta.

когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится.
Вера делает это каждый день. поэтому Вера делает это не думая. почему Вера делает это не думая? потому что Вера делает это каждый день.
Вера потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Вера грустит.
Ольга много раз повторила слова. поэтому Ольга помнит их лучше. почему Ольга помнит их лучше? потому что Ольга много раз повторила слова.
когда человек голоден, он ищет еду. Ольга голодна. значит Ольга ищет еду.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Мария делает это каждый день. значит Мария делает это не думая.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Анна потеряла дорогую ей вещь. значит Анна грустит.
Борис много раз повторил слова. поэтому Борис помнит их лучше. почему Борис помнит их лучше? потому что Борис много раз повторил слова.
Пётр голоден. поэтому Пётр ищет еду.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. Борис делает это каждый день. значит Борис делает это не думая.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит. Олег потерял дорогую ему вещь. значит Олег грустит.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. Иван много раз повторил слова. значит Иван помнит их лучше.
почему человек ищет еду, когда голоден? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает.
когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая. почему он делает это не думая? потому что человек делает что-то каждый день.
когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит.
Вера сидит без дела. поэтому Вера скучает. почему Вера скучает? потому что Вера сидит без дела.
Анна устала. поэтому Анна ошибается чаще.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Вера хочет успеть. значит Вера спешит.
когда человек получает подарок, он радуется. Ольга получила подарок. значит Ольга радуется.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Мария сидит без дела. значит Мария скучает.
Иван устал. поэтому Иван ошибается чаще.
Пётр хочет успеть. поэтому Пётр спешит. почему Пётр спешит? потому что Пётр хочет успеть.
Пётр получил подарок. поэтому Пётр радуется.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. Борис сидит без дела. значит Борис скучает.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. почему? потому что усталость ослабляет внимание.
почему люди спешат, когда хотят успеть? потому что времени остаётся меньше, чем нужно.
почему человек радуется, когда получает подарок? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят.
когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает. почему он скучает? потому что человек сидит без дела.
зачем человек спит? чтобы отдохнуть.
Анна не знает, что будет. поэтому Анна боится. почему Анна боится? потому что Анна не знает, что будет.
Анна смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Анна не увидела знака.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Вера получила несправедливое замечание. значит Вера злится.
когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее. Ольга мало спала. значит Ольга устаёт быстрее.
Иван не знает, что будет. поэтому Иван боится. почему Иван боится? потому что Иван не знает, что будет.
Иван смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Иван не увидел знака.
Пётр получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Пётр злится. почему Пётр злится? потому что Пётр получил несправедливое замечание.
Пётр мало спал. поэтому Пётр устаёт быстрее.
почему человек боится, когда не знает, что будет? потому что неизвестное нельзя предусмотреть: когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. почему? потому что человек видит только то, на что смотрит.
почему люди злятся на несправедливые замечания? потому что человек ждёт, что с ним поступят справедливо.
почему человек устаёт быстрее, когда мало спит? потому что сон восстанавливает силы.
Мария голодна. поэтому Мария ищет еду. почему Мария ищет еду? потому что Мария голодна.
Мария делает это каждый день. поэтому Мария делает это не думая.
Анна потеряла дорогую ей вещь. поэтому Анна грустит. почему Анна грустит? потому что Анна потеряла дорогую ей вещь.
Анна много раз повторила слова. поэтому Анна помнит их лучше.
Олег голоден. поэтому Олег ищет еду. почему Олег ищет еду? потому что Олег голоден.
Олег делает это каждый день. поэтому Олег делает это не думая.
Иван потерял дорогую ему вещь. поэтому Иван грустит. почему Иван грустит? потому что Иван потерял дорогую ему вещь.
Иван много раз повторил слова. поэтому Иван помнит их лучше.
почему, когда человек голоден, он ищет еду? потому что тело требует того, чего ему не хватает.
почему люди делают не думая то, что делают каждый день? потому что повторение делает действие привычным: когда человек делает что-то каждый день, он делает это не думая.
почему человек грустит, когда теряет дорогую ему вещь? потому что ему не хватает того, что было дорого: когда человек теряет дорогую ему вещь, он грустит.
когда человек много раз повторяет слова, он помнит их лучше. почему? потому что повторение укрепляет память.
Ольга устала. поэтому Ольга ошибается чаще. почему Ольга ошибается чаще? потому что Ольга устала.
Ольга хочет успеть. поэтому Ольга спешит.
Мария получила подарок. поэтому Мария радуется. почему Мария радуется? потому что Мария получила подарок.
Мария сидит без дела. поэтому Мария скучает.
Борис устал. поэтому Борис ошибается чаще. почему Борис ошибается чаще? потому что Борис устал.
Борис хочет успеть. поэтому Борис спешит.
Олег получил подарок. поэтому Олег радуется. почему Олег радуется? потому что Олег получил подарок.
Олег сидит без дела. поэтому Олег скучает.
когда человек устал, он ошибается чаще. Иван устал. значит Иван ошибается чаще.
когда человек хочет успеть, он спешит. Пётр хочет успеть. значит Пётр спешит.
почему, когда человек получает подарок, он радуется? потому что подарок показывает, что о нём помнят.
почему люди скучают без дела? потому что время без занятия тянется долго: когда человек сидит без дела, он скучает.
люди едят. зачем люди едят? чтобы не быть голодным.
Вера не знает, что будет. поэтому Вера боится.
Ольга смотрела в другую сторону. поэтому Ольга не увидела знака. почему Ольга не увидела знака? потому что Ольга смотрела в другую сторону.
Ольга получила несправедливое замечание. поэтому Ольга злится.
Мария мало спала. поэтому Мария устаёт быстрее. почему Мария устаёт быстрее? потому что Мария мало спала.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Анна не знает, что будет. значит Анна боится.
Борис смотрел в другую сторону. поэтому Борис не увидел знака. почему Борис не увидел знака? потому что Борис смотрел в другую сторону.
Борис получил несправедливое замечание. поэтому Борис злится.
Олег мало спал. поэтому Олег устаёт быстрее. почему Олег устаёт быстрее? потому что Олег мало спал.
когда человек не знает, что будет, он боится. Олег не знает, что будет. значит Олег боится.
когда человек смотрит в другую сторону, он не видит знака. Иван смотрел в другую сторону. значит Иван не увидел знака.
когда человек получает несправедливое замечание, он злится. Пётр получил несправедливое замечание. значит Пётр злится.
почему, когда человек мало спит, он устаёт быстрее? потому что сон восстанавливает силы.

when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid.
jane does it every day. therefore jane does it without thinking. why does jane do it without thinking? because jane does it every day.
jane lost something dear. therefore jane is sad.
kate repeated the words many times. therefore kate remembers them better. why does kate remember them better? because kate repeated the words many times.
when a person is hungry, that person looks for food. kate is hungry. so kate looks for food.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. mary does it every day. so mary does it without thinking.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. anna lost something dear. so anna is sad.
mark repeated the words many times. therefore mark remembers them better. why does mark remember them better? because mark repeated the words many times.
peter is hungry. therefore peter looks for food.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. mark does it every day. so mark does it without thinking.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad. john lost something dear. so john is sad.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. ivan repeated the words many times. so ivan remembers them better.
why does a person look for food when hungry? because the body asks for what it lacks.
when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking. why does that person do it without thinking? because a person does something every day.
when a person loses something dear, that person is sad.
jane has nothing to do. therefore jane is bored. why is jane bored? because jane has nothing to do.
anna is tired. therefore anna makes more mistakes.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. jane wants to be in time. so jane hurries.
when a person gets a gift, that person is glad. kate got a gift. so kate is glad.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. mary has nothing to do. so mary is bored.
ivan is tired. therefore ivan makes more mistakes.
peter wants to be in time. therefore peter hurries. why does peter hurry? because peter wants to be in time.
peter got a gift. therefore peter is glad.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. mark has nothing to do. so mark is bored.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. why? because tiredness weakens attention.
why do people hurry when they want to be in time? because less time is left than is needed.
why is a person glad when they get a gift? because a gift shows that someone remembers them.
when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored. why is that person bored? because a person has nothing to do.
why does a person sleep? in order to rest.
anna does not know what will happen. therefore anna is afraid. why is anna afraid? because anna does not know what will happen.
anna looked the other way. therefore anna did not see the sign.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. jane got an unfair remark. so jane is angry.
when a person sleeps little, that person gets tired faster. kate slept little. so kate gets tired faster.
ivan does not know what will happen. therefore ivan is afraid. why is ivan afraid? because ivan does not know what will happen.
ivan looked the other way. therefore ivan did not see the sign.
peter got an unfair remark. therefore peter is angry. why is peter angry? because peter got an unfair remark.
peter slept little. therefore peter gets tired faster.
why is a person afraid when they do not know what will happen? because the unknown cannot be foreseen: when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. why? because a person sees only what they look at.
why do people get angry at unfair remarks? because a person expects to be treated fairly.
why does a person get tired faster when they sleep little? because sleep restores strength.
mary is hungry. therefore mary looks for food. why does mary look for food? because mary is hungry.
mary does it every day. therefore mary does it without thinking.
anna lost something dear. therefore anna is sad. why is anna sad? because anna lost something dear.
anna repeated the words many times. therefore anna remembers them better.
john is hungry. therefore john looks for food. why does john look for food? because john is hungry.
john does it every day. therefore john does it without thinking.
ivan lost something dear. therefore ivan is sad. why is ivan sad? because ivan lost something dear.
ivan repeated the words many times. therefore ivan remembers them better.
why, when a person is hungry, does that person look for food? because the body asks for what it lacks.
why do people do without thinking what they do every day? because repetition makes an action a habit: when a person does something every day, that person does it without thinking.
why is a person sad when they lose something dear? because they miss what was dear to them: when a person loses something dear, that person is sad.
when a person repeats words many times, that person remembers them better. why? because repetition strengthens memory.
kate is tired. therefore kate makes more mistakes. why does kate make more mistakes? because kate is tired.
kate wants to be in time. therefore kate hurries.
mary got a gift. therefore mary is glad. why is mary glad? because mary got a gift.
mary has nothing to do. therefore mary is bored.
mark is tired. therefore mark makes more mistakes. why does mark make more mistakes? because mark is tired.
mark wants to be in time. therefore mark hurries.
john got a gift. therefore john is glad. why is john glad? because john got a gift.
john has nothing to do. therefore john is bored.
when a person is tired, that person makes more mistakes. ivan is tired. so ivan makes more mistakes.
when a person wants to be in time, that person hurries. peter wants to be in time. so peter hurries.
why, when a person gets a gift, is that person glad? because a gift shows that someone remembers them.
why are people bored when they have nothing to do? because time without an occupation seems long: when a person has nothing to do, that person is bored.
people eat. why do people eat? in order not to be hungry.
jane does not know what will happen. therefore jane is afraid.
kate looked the other way. therefore kate did not see the sign. why did kate not see the sign? because kate looked the other way.
kate got an unfair remark. therefore kate is angry.
mary slept little. therefore mary gets tired faster. why does mary get tired faster? because mary slept little.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. anna does not know what will happen. so anna is afraid.
mark looked the other way. therefore mark did not see the sign. why did mark not see the sign? because mark looked the other way.
mark got an unfair remark. therefore mark is angry.
john slept little. therefore john gets tired faster. why does john get tired faster? because john slept little.
when a person does not know what will happen, that person is afraid. john does not know what will happen. so john is afraid.
when a person looks the other way, that person does not see the sign. ivan looked the other way. so ivan did not see the sign.
when a person gets an unfair remark, that person is angry. peter got an unfair remark. so peter is angry.
why, when a person sleeps little, does that person get tired faster? because sleep restores strength.

warum hat ein Mensch Angst, wenn er nicht weiß, was kommt? weil man das Unbekannte nicht vorhersehen kann.
Jonas hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Jonas das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Jonas das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Jonas weggeschaut hat.
Maria hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Maria. warum ärgert sich Maria? weil Maria eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
wozu lernen Menschen? um mehr zu können.
Paul will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Paul sich.
Anna hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Anna.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. warum? weil Wiederholung das Gedächtnis stärkt.
wenn ein Mensch hungrig ist, sucht er Essen. Jonas ist hungrig. also sucht Jonas Essen.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Maria macht es jeden Tag. also macht Maria es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. warum ärgert er sich? weil ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt.
Jonas hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Jonas schneller müde.
Felix weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Felix Angst.
Lena hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Lena das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Felix hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Felix.
Jonas ist müde. deshalb macht Jonas mehr Fehler. warum macht Jonas mehr Fehler? weil Jonas müde ist.
Maria will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Maria sich. warum beeilt Maria sich? weil Maria rechtzeitig kommen will.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Paul hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Paul traurig.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Anna hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Anna sie sich besser.
Anna ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Anna Essen.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. warum? weil ein Mensch nur sieht, wohin er schaut.
Max hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Max. warum ärgert sich Max? weil Max eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen hat.
Eva hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Eva schneller müde. warum wird Eva schneller müde? weil Eva wenig geschlafen hat.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. warum beeilt er sich? weil ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will.
Jonas hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Jonas.
Maria hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Maria.
Lena ist müde. deshalb macht Lena mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken. Felix macht es jeden Tag. also macht Felix es ohne nachzudenken.
wenn ein Mensch etwas Liebes verliert, ist er traurig. Lena hat etwas Liebes verloren. also ist Lena traurig.
warum werden Menschen schneller müde, wenn sie wenig schlafen? weil Schlaf die Kräfte wiederherstellt.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Paul weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Paul Angst.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Anna hat weggeschaut. also hat Anna das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. warum? weil Müdigkeit die Aufmerksamkeit schwächt.
Max will rechtzeitig kommen. deshalb beeilt Max sich. warum beeilt Max sich? weil Max rechtzeitig kommen will.
Eva hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Eva. warum freut sich Eva? weil Eva ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
wenn ein Mensch Wörter oft wiederholt, merkt er sie sich besser. Max hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. also merkt Max sie sich besser.
Jonas ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Jonas Essen.
Maria macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Maria es ohne nachzudenken.
warum ärgern sich Menschen über ungerechte Bemerkungen? weil ein Mensch erwartet, gerecht behandelt zu werden: wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich.
Felix hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Felix schneller müde. warum wird Felix schneller müde? weil Felix wenig geschlafen hat.
wenn ein Mensch nicht weiß, was kommt, hat er Angst. Lena weiß nicht, was kommt. also hat Lena Angst.
warum freuen sich Menschen über Geschenke? weil ein Geschenk zeigt, dass jemand an ihn denkt.
Max hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Max.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Anna ist müde. also macht Anna mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken.
Paul hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Paul traurig. warum ist Paul traurig? weil Paul etwas Liebes verloren hat.
Anna hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Anna sie sich besser. warum merkt Anna sie sich besser? weil Anna die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
Eva ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Eva Essen. warum sucht Eva Essen? weil Eva hungrig ist.
wenn ein Mensch wegschaut, sieht er das Zeichen nicht. Max hat weggeschaut. also hat Max das Zeichen nicht gesehen.
wenn ein Mensch eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommt, ärgert er sich. Eva hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. also ärgert sich Eva.
Menschen schlafen. wozu schlafen Menschen? um sich auszuruhen.
warum beeilen sich Menschen, wenn sie rechtzeitig kommen wollen? weil weniger Zeit bleibt als nötig ist: wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich.
Felix hat ein Geschenk bekommen. deshalb freut sich Felix. warum freut sich Felix? weil Felix ein Geschenk bekommen hat.
Lena hat nichts zu tun. deshalb langweilt sich Lena. warum langweilt sich Lena? weil Lena nichts zu tun hat.
warum suchen Menschen Essen, wenn sie hungrig sind? weil der Körper verlangt, was ihm fehlt.
Max macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Max es ohne nachzudenken.
Eva hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Eva traurig.
wenn ein Mensch wenig schläft, wird er schneller müde. Jonas hat wenig geschlafen. also wird Jonas schneller müde.
Paul weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Paul Angst. warum hat Paul Angst? weil Paul nicht weiß, was kommt.
Anna hat weggeschaut. deshalb hat Anna das Zeichen nicht gesehen. warum hat Anna das Zeichen nicht gesehen? weil Anna weggeschaut hat.
warum langweilt sich ein Mensch, wenn er nichts zu tun hat? weil Zeit ohne Beschäftigung lang wird: wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich.
wenn ein Mensch müde ist, macht er mehr Fehler. Max ist müde. also macht Max mehr Fehler.
wenn ein Mensch rechtzeitig kommen will, beeilt er sich. Eva will rechtzeitig kommen. also beeilt Eva sich.
warum ist ein Mensch traurig, wenn er etwas Liebes verliert? weil ihm fehlt, was ihm lieb war.
Jonas hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Jonas sie sich besser. warum merkt Jonas sie sich besser? weil Jonas die Wörter oft wiederholt hat.
Felix ist hungrig. deshalb sucht Felix Essen. warum sucht Felix Essen? weil Felix hungrig ist.
Lena macht es jeden Tag. deshalb macht Lena es ohne nachzudenken. warum macht Lena es ohne nachzudenken? weil Lena es jeden Tag macht.
Paul hat eine ungerechte Bemerkung bekommen. deshalb ärgert sich Paul.
Anna hat wenig geschlafen. deshalb wird Anna schneller müde.
Eva weiß nicht, was kommt. deshalb hat Eva Angst.
wenn ein Mensch ein Geschenk bekommt, freut er sich. Jonas hat ein Geschenk bekommen. also freut sich Jonas.
wenn ein Mensch nichts zu tun hat, langweilt er sich. Maria hat nichts zu tun. also langweilt sich Maria.
Anna ist müde. deshalb macht Anna mehr Fehler. warum macht Anna mehr Fehler? weil Anna müde ist.
warum macht ein Mensch ohne nachzudenken, was er jeden Tag macht? weil Wiederholung eine Handlung zur Gewohnheit macht: wenn ein Mensch etwas jeden Tag macht, macht er es ohne nachzudenken.
Felix hat etwas Liebes verloren. deshalb ist Felix traurig.
Lena hat die Wörter oft wiederholt. deshalb merkt Lena sie sich besser.

quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur.
Claire le fait chaque jour. donc Claire le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi Claire le fait sans réfléchir ? parce que Claire le fait chaque jour.
Claire a perdu une chose chère. donc Claire est triste.
Julie a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Julie les retient mieux. pourquoi Julie les retient mieux ? parce que Julie a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger. Julie a faim. donc Julie cherche à manger.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Marie le fait chaque jour. donc Marie le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Anne a perdu une chose chère. donc Anne est triste.
Hugo a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Hugo les retient mieux. pourquoi Hugo les retient mieux ? parce que Hugo a répété les mots plusieurs fois.
Paul a faim. donc Paul cherche à manger.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. Hugo le fait chaque jour. donc Hugo le fait sans réfléchir.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste. Jules a perdu une chose chère. donc Jules est triste.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. Louis a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Louis les retient mieux.
pourquoi une personne cherche-t-elle à manger quand elle a faim ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque.
quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir. pourquoi elle le fait sans réfléchir ? parce qu'une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour.
quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste.
Claire n'a rien à faire. donc Claire s'ennuie. pourquoi Claire s'ennuie ? parce que Claire n'a rien à faire.
Anne est fatiguée. donc Anne fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Claire veut arriver à temps. donc Claire se dépêche.
quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente. Julie a reçu un cadeau. donc Julie est contente.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Marie n'a rien à faire. donc Marie s'ennuie.
Louis est fatigué. donc Louis fait plus d'erreurs.
Paul veut arriver à temps. donc Paul se dépêche. pourquoi Paul se dépêche ? parce que Paul veut arriver à temps.
Paul a reçu un cadeau. donc Paul est content.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. Hugo n'a rien à faire. donc Hugo s'ennuie.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi ? parce que la fatigue affaiblit l'attention.
pourquoi les gens se dépêchent-ils quand ils veulent arriver à temps ? parce qu'il reste moins de temps qu'il n'en faut.
pourquoi une personne est-elle contente quand elle reçoit un cadeau ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle.
quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie. pourquoi elle s'ennuie ? parce qu'une personne n'a rien à faire.
pourquoi une personne dort ? pour se reposer.
Anne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Anne a peur. pourquoi Anne a peur ? parce qu'Anne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
Anne regardait ailleurs. donc Anne n'a pas vu le signe.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Claire a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Claire est en colère.
quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite. Julie a peu dormi. donc Julie se fatigue plus vite.
Louis ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Louis a peur. pourquoi Louis a peur ? parce que Louis ne sait pas ce qui va arriver.
Louis regardait ailleurs. donc Louis n'a pas vu le signe.
Paul a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Paul est en colère. pourquoi Paul est en colère ? parce que Paul a reçu une remarque injuste.
Paul a peu dormi. donc Paul se fatigue plus vite.
pourquoi une personne a-t-elle peur quand elle ne sait pas ce qui va arriver ? parce qu'on ne peut pas prévoir l'inconnu: quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. pourquoi ? parce qu'une personne ne voit que ce qu'elle regarde.
pourquoi les gens se fâchent-ils contre les remarques injustes ? parce qu'une personne attend d'être traitée avec justice.
pourquoi une personne se fatigue-t-elle plus vite quand elle dort peu ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces.
Marie a faim. donc Marie cherche à manger. pourquoi Marie cherche à manger ? parce que Marie a faim.
Marie le fait chaque jour. donc Marie le fait sans réfléchir.
Anne a perdu une chose chère. donc Anne est triste. pourquoi Anne est triste ? parce qu'Anne a perdu une chose chère.
Anne a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Anne les retient mieux.
Jules a faim. donc Jules cherche à manger. pourquoi Jules cherche à manger ? parce que Jules a faim.
Jules le fait chaque jour. donc Jules le fait sans réfléchir.
Louis a perdu une chose chère. donc Louis est triste. pourquoi Louis est triste ? parce que Louis a perdu une chose chère.
Louis a répété les mots plusieurs fois. donc Louis les retient mieux.
pourquoi, quand une personne a faim, elle cherche à manger ? parce que le corps demande ce qui lui manque.
pourquoi les gens font-ils sans réfléchir ce qu'ils font chaque jour ? parce que la répétition rend un geste habituel: quand une personne fait quelque chose chaque jour, elle le fait sans réfléchir.
pourquoi une personne est-elle triste quand elle perd une chose chère ? parce que ce qui lui était cher lui manque: quand une personne perd une chose chère, elle est triste.
quand une personne répète des mots plusieurs fois, elle les retient mieux. pourquoi ? parce que la répétition renforce la mémoire.
Julie est fatiguée. donc Julie fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Julie fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Julie est fatiguée.
Julie veut arriver à temps. donc Julie se dépêche.
Marie a reçu un cadeau. donc Marie est contente. pourquoi Marie est contente ? parce que Marie a reçu un cadeau.
Marie n'a rien à faire. donc Marie s'ennuie.
Hugo est fatigué. donc Hugo fait plus d'erreurs. pourquoi Hugo fait plus d'erreurs ? parce que Hugo est fatigué.
Hugo veut arriver à temps. donc Hugo se dépêche.
Jules a reçu un cadeau. donc Jules est content. pourquoi Jules est content ? parce que Jules a reçu un cadeau.
Jules n'a rien à faire. donc Jules s'ennuie.
quand une personne est fatiguée, elle fait plus d'erreurs. Louis est fatigué. donc Louis fait plus d'erreurs.
quand une personne veut arriver à temps, elle se dépêche. Paul veut arriver à temps. donc Paul se dépêche.
pourquoi, quand une personne reçoit un cadeau, elle est contente ? parce qu'un cadeau montre que quelqu'un pense à elle.
pourquoi les gens s'ennuient-ils quand ils n'ont rien à faire ? parce que le temps sans occupation paraît long: quand une personne n'a rien à faire, elle s'ennuie.
les gens mangent. pourquoi les gens mangent ? pour ne pas avoir faim.
Claire ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Claire a peur.
Julie regardait ailleurs. donc Julie n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Julie n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Julie regardait ailleurs.
Julie a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Julie est en colère.
Marie a peu dormi. donc Marie se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Marie se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Marie a peu dormi.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Anne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Anne a peur.
Hugo regardait ailleurs. donc Hugo n'a pas vu le signe. pourquoi Hugo n'a pas vu le signe ? parce que Hugo regardait ailleurs.
Hugo a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Hugo est en colère.
Jules a peu dormi. donc Jules se fatigue plus vite. pourquoi Jules se fatigue plus vite ? parce que Jules a peu dormi.
quand une personne ne sait pas ce qui va arriver, elle a peur. Jules ne sait pas ce qui va arriver. donc Jules a peur.
quand une personne regarde ailleurs, elle ne voit pas le signe. Louis regardait ailleurs. donc Louis n'a pas vu le signe.
quand une personne reçoit une remarque injuste, elle est en colère. Paul a reçu une remarque injuste. donc Paul est en colère.
pourquoi, quand une personne dort peu, elle se fatigue plus vite ? parce que le sommeil rend les forces.

cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo.
Elena lo hace cada día. por eso Elena lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué Elena lo hace sin pensar? porque Elena lo hace cada día.
Elena perdió algo querido. por eso Elena está triste.
Lucía repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Lucía las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Lucía las recuerda mejor? porque Lucía repitió las palabras muchas veces.
cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida. Lucía tiene hambre. así que Lucía busca comida.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. María lo hace cada día. así que María lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Ana perdió algo querido. así que Ana está triste.
Carlos repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Carlos las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué Carlos las recuerda mejor? porque Carlos repitió las palabras muchas veces.
Pablo tiene hambre. por eso Pablo busca comida.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. Carlos lo hace cada día. así que Carlos lo hace sin pensar.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste. Diego perdió algo querido. así que Diego está triste.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. Luis repitió las palabras muchas veces. así que Luis las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué una persona busca comida cuando tiene hambre? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta.
cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar. ¿por qué lo hace sin pensar? porque una persona hace algo cada día.
cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste.
Elena no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Elena se aburre. ¿por qué Elena se aburre? porque Elena no tiene nada que hacer.
Ana está cansada. por eso Ana comete más errores.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Elena quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Elena se apresura.
cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta. Lucía recibió un regalo. así que Lucía está contenta.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. María no tiene nada que hacer. así que María se aburre.
Luis está cansado. por eso Luis comete más errores.
Pablo quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Pablo se apresura. ¿por qué Pablo se apresura? porque Pablo quiere llegar a tiempo.
Pablo recibió un regalo. por eso Pablo está contento.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. Carlos no tiene nada que hacer. así que Carlos se aburre.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. ¿por qué? porque el cansancio debilita la atención.
¿por qué la gente se apresura cuando quiere llegar a tiempo? porque queda menos tiempo del que hace falta.
¿por qué una persona está contenta cuando recibe un regalo? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella.
cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre. ¿por qué se aburre? porque una persona no tiene nada que hacer.
¿por qué una persona duerme? para descansar.
Ana no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Ana tiene miedo. ¿por qué Ana tiene miedo? porque Ana no sabe qué va a pasar.
Ana miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Ana no vio la señal.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Elena recibió un comentario injusto. así que Elena está enfadada.
cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes. Lucía durmió poco. así que Lucía se cansa antes.
Luis no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Luis tiene miedo. ¿por qué Luis tiene miedo? porque Luis no sabe qué va a pasar.
Luis miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Luis no vio la señal.
Pablo recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Pablo está enfadado. ¿por qué Pablo está enfadado? porque Pablo recibió un comentario injusto.
Pablo durmió poco. por eso Pablo se cansa antes.
¿por qué una persona tiene miedo cuando no sabe qué va a pasar? porque lo desconocido no se puede prever: cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. ¿por qué? porque una persona sólo ve aquello que mira.
¿por qué la gente se enfada ante los comentarios injustos? porque una persona espera que la traten con justicia.
¿por qué una persona se cansa antes cuando duerme poco? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas.
María tiene hambre. por eso María busca comida. ¿por qué María busca comida? porque María tiene hambre.
María lo hace cada día. por eso María lo hace sin pensar.
Ana perdió algo querido. por eso Ana está triste. ¿por qué Ana está triste? porque Ana perdió algo querido.
Ana repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Ana las recuerda mejor.
Diego tiene hambre. por eso Diego busca comida. ¿por qué Diego busca comida? porque Diego tiene hambre.
Diego lo hace cada día. por eso Diego lo hace sin pensar.
Luis perdió algo querido. por eso Luis está triste. ¿por qué Luis está triste? porque Luis perdió algo querido.
Luis repitió las palabras muchas veces. por eso Luis las recuerda mejor.
¿por qué, cuando una persona tiene hambre, busca comida? porque el cuerpo pide lo que le falta.
¿por qué la gente hace sin pensar lo que hace cada día? porque la repetición convierte una acción en costumbre: cuando una persona hace algo cada día, lo hace sin pensar.
¿por qué una persona está triste cuando pierde algo querido? porque echa de menos lo que le era querido: cuando una persona pierde algo querido, está triste.
cuando una persona repite palabras muchas veces, las recuerda mejor. ¿por qué? porque la repetición refuerza la memoria.
Lucía está cansada. por eso Lucía comete más errores. ¿por qué Lucía comete más errores? porque Lucía está cansada.
Lucía quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Lucía se apresura.
María recibió un regalo. por eso María está contenta. ¿por qué María está contenta? porque María recibió un regalo.
María no tiene nada que hacer. por eso María se aburre.
Carlos está cansado. por eso Carlos comete más errores. ¿por qué Carlos comete más errores? porque Carlos está cansado.
Carlos quiere llegar a tiempo. por eso Carlos se apresura.
Diego recibió un regalo. por eso Diego está contento. ¿por qué Diego está contento? porque Diego recibió un regalo.
Diego no tiene nada que hacer. por eso Diego se aburre.
cuando una persona está cansada, comete más errores. Luis está cansado. así que Luis comete más errores.
cuando una persona quiere llegar a tiempo, se apresura. Pablo quiere llegar a tiempo. así que Pablo se apresura.
¿por qué, cuando una persona recibe un regalo, está contenta? porque un regalo muestra que alguien piensa en ella.
¿por qué la gente se aburre cuando no tiene nada que hacer? porque el tiempo sin ocupación parece largo: cuando una persona no tiene nada que hacer, se aburre.
la gente come. ¿por qué la gente come? para no tener hambre.
Elena no sabe qué va a pasar. por eso Elena tiene miedo.
Lucía miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Lucía no vio la señal. ¿por qué Lucía no vio la señal? porque Lucía miraba hacia otro lado.
Lucía recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Lucía está enfadada.
María durmió poco. por eso María se cansa antes. ¿por qué María se cansa antes? porque María durmió poco.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Ana no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Ana tiene miedo.
Carlos miraba hacia otro lado. por eso Carlos no vio la señal. ¿por qué Carlos no vio la señal? porque Carlos miraba hacia otro lado.
Carlos recibió un comentario injusto. por eso Carlos está enfadado.
Diego durmió poco. por eso Diego se cansa antes. ¿por qué Diego se cansa antes? porque Diego durmió poco.
cuando una persona no sabe qué va a pasar, tiene miedo. Diego no sabe qué va a pasar. así que Diego tiene miedo.
cuando una persona mira hacia otro lado, no ve la señal. Luis miraba hacia otro lado. así que Luis no vio la señal.
cuando una persona recibe un comentario injusto, está enfadada. Pablo recibió un comentario injusto. así que Pablo está enfadado.
¿por qué, cuando una persona duerme poco, se cansa antes? porque el sueño repone las fuerzas.

quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura.
Chiara lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Chiara lo fa senza pensare. perché Chiara lo fa senza pensare? perché Chiara lo fa ogni giorno.
Chiara ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Chiara è triste.
Giulia ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Giulia le ricorda meglio. perché Giulia le ricorda meglio? perché Giulia ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo. Giulia ha fame. quindi Giulia cerca del cibo.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Maria lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Maria lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Anna ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Anna è triste.
Matteo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Matteo le ricorda meglio. perché Matteo le ricorda meglio? perché Matteo ha ripetuto le parole molte volte.
Marco ha fame. perciò Marco cerca del cibo.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. Matteo lo fa ogni giorno. quindi Matteo lo fa senza pensare.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste. Paolo ha perso una cosa cara. quindi Paolo è triste.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. Luca ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. quindi Luca le ricorda meglio.
perché una persona cerca del cibo quando ha fame? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca.
quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare. perché lo fa senza pensare? perché una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno.
quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste.
Chiara non ha niente da fare. perciò Chiara si annoia. perché Chiara si annoia? perché Chiara non ha niente da fare.
Anna è stanca. perciò Anna fa più errori.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Chiara vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Chiara si affretta.
quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta. Giulia ha ricevuto un regalo. quindi Giulia è contenta.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Maria non ha niente da fare. quindi Maria si annoia.
Luca è stanco. perciò Luca fa più errori.
Marco vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Marco si affretta. perché Marco si affretta? perché Marco vuole arrivare in tempo.
Marco ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Marco è contento.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. Matteo non ha niente da fare. quindi Matteo si annoia.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. perché? perché la stanchezza indebolisce l'attenzione.
perché le persone si affrettano quando vogliono arrivare in tempo? perché resta meno tempo di quanto serve.
perché una persona è contenta quando riceve un regalo? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei.
quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia. perché si annoia? perché una persona non ha niente da fare.
perché una persona dorme? per riposare.
Anna non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Anna ha paura. perché Anna ha paura? perché Anna non sa che cosa succederà.
Anna guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Anna non ha visto il segnale.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Chiara ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Chiara è arrabbiata.
quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima. Giulia ha dormito poco. quindi Giulia si stanca prima.
Luca non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Luca ha paura. perché Luca ha paura? perché Luca non sa che cosa succederà.
Luca guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Luca non ha visto il segnale.
Marco ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Marco è arrabbiato. perché Marco è arrabbiato? perché Marco ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto.
Marco ha dormito poco. perciò Marco si stanca prima.
perché una persona ha paura quando non sa che cosa succederà? perché l'ignoto non si può prevedere: quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. perché? perché una persona vede solo ciò che guarda.
perché le persone si arrabbiano per i rimproveri ingiusti? perché una persona si aspetta di essere trattata con giustizia.
perché una persona si stanca prima quando dorme poco? perché il sonno ridà le forze.
Maria ha fame. perciò Maria cerca del cibo. perché Maria cerca del cibo? perché Maria ha fame.
Maria lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Maria lo fa senza pensare.
Anna ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Anna è triste. perché Anna è triste? perché Anna ha perso una cosa cara.
Anna ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Anna le ricorda meglio.
Paolo ha fame. perciò Paolo cerca del cibo. perché Paolo cerca del cibo? perché Paolo ha fame.
Paolo lo fa ogni giorno. perciò Paolo lo fa senza pensare.
Luca ha perso una cosa cara. perciò Luca è triste. perché Luca è triste? perché Luca ha perso una cosa cara.
Luca ha ripetuto le parole molte volte. perciò Luca le ricorda meglio.
perché, quando una persona ha fame, cerca del cibo? perché il corpo chiede ciò che gli manca.
perché le persone fanno senza pensare ciò che fanno ogni giorno? perché la ripetizione rende un gesto abituale: quando una persona fa qualcosa ogni giorno, lo fa senza pensare.
perché una persona è triste quando perde una cosa cara? perché le manca ciò che le era caro: quando una persona perde una cosa cara, è triste.
quando una persona ripete parole molte volte, le ricorda meglio. perché? perché la ripetizione rafforza la memoria.
Giulia è stanca. perciò Giulia fa più errori. perché Giulia fa più errori? perché Giulia è stanca.
Giulia vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Giulia si affretta.
Maria ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Maria è contenta. perché Maria è contenta? perché Maria ha ricevuto un regalo.
Maria non ha niente da fare. perciò Maria si annoia.
Matteo è stanco. perciò Matteo fa più errori. perché Matteo fa più errori? perché Matteo è stanco.
Matteo vuole arrivare in tempo. perciò Matteo si affretta.
Paolo ha ricevuto un regalo. perciò Paolo è contento. perché Paolo è contento? perché Paolo ha ricevuto un regalo.
Paolo non ha niente da fare. perciò Paolo si annoia.
quando una persona è stanca, fa più errori. Luca è stanco. quindi Luca fa più errori.
quando una persona vuole arrivare in tempo, si affretta. Marco vuole arrivare in tempo. quindi Marco si affretta.
perché, quando una persona riceve un regalo, è contenta? perché un regalo mostra che qualcuno pensa a lei.
perché le persone si annoiano quando non hanno niente da fare? perché il tempo senza occupazione sembra lungo: quando una persona non ha niente da fare, si annoia.
le persone mangiano. perché le persone mangiano? per non avere fame.
Chiara non sa che cosa succederà. perciò Chiara ha paura.
Giulia guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Giulia non ha visto il segnale. perché Giulia non ha visto il segnale? perché Giulia guardava dall'altra parte.
Giulia ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Giulia è arrabbiata.
Maria ha dormito poco. perciò Maria si stanca prima. perché Maria si stanca prima? perché Maria ha dormito poco.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Anna non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Anna ha paura.
Matteo guardava dall'altra parte. perciò Matteo non ha visto il segnale. perché Matteo non ha visto il segnale? perché Matteo guardava dall'altra parte.
Matteo ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. perciò Matteo è arrabbiato.
Paolo ha dormito poco. perciò Paolo si stanca prima. perché Paolo si stanca prima? perché Paolo ha dormito poco.
quando una persona non sa che cosa succederà, ha paura. Paolo non sa che cosa succederà. quindi Paolo ha paura.
quando una persona guarda dall'altra parte, non vede il segnale. Luca guardava dall'altra parte. quindi Luca non ha visto il segnale.
quando una persona riceve un rimprovero ingiusto, è arrabbiata. Marco ha ricevuto un rimprovero ingiusto. quindi Marco è arrabbiato.
perché, quando una persona dorme poco, si stanca prima? perché il sonno ridà le forze.

quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo.
Sofia fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Sofia fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que Sofia fá-lo sem pensar? porque Sofia fá-lo todos os dias.
Sofia perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Sofia está triste.
Rita repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Rita lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que Rita lembra-se melhor delas? porque Rita repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida. Rita tem fome. portanto Rita procura comida.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. Maria fá-lo todos os dias. portanto Maria fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Ana perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Ana está triste.
João repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso João lembra-se melhor delas. porque é que João lembra-se melhor delas? porque João repetiu as palavras muitas vezes.
Pedro tem fome. por isso Pedro procura comida.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. João fá-lo todos os dias. portanto João fá-lo sem pensar.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste. Rui perdeu uma coisa querida. portanto Rui está triste.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. Tiago repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. portanto Tiago lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que uma pessoa procura comida quando tem fome? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta.
quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar. porque é que fá-lo sem pensar? porque uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias.
quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste.
Sofia não tem nada para fazer. por isso Sofia aborrece-se. porque é que Sofia aborrece-se? porque Sofia não tem nada para fazer.
Ana está cansada. por isso Ana comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Sofia quer chegar a tempo. portanto Sofia apressa-se.
quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente. Rita recebeu um presente. portanto Rita está contente.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. Maria não tem nada para fazer. portanto Maria aborrece-se.
Tiago está cansado. por isso Tiago comete mais erros.
Pedro quer chegar a tempo. por isso Pedro apressa-se. porque é que Pedro apressa-se? porque Pedro quer chegar a tempo.
Pedro recebeu um presente. por isso Pedro está contente.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. João não tem nada para fazer. portanto João aborrece-se.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. porquê? porque o cansaço enfraquece a atenção.
porque é que as pessoas se apressam quando querem chegar a tempo? porque resta menos tempo do que é preciso.
porque é que uma pessoa está contente quando recebe um presente? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela.
quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se. porque é que aborrece-se? porque uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer.
porque é que uma pessoa dorme? para descansar.
Ana não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Ana tem medo. porque é que Ana tem medo? porque Ana não sabe o que vai acontecer.
Ana olhava para o outro lado. por isso Ana não viu o sinal.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Sofia recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Sofia está zangada.
quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa. Rita dormiu pouco. portanto Rita cansa-se mais depressa.
Tiago não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Tiago tem medo. porque é que Tiago tem medo? porque Tiago não sabe o que vai acontecer.
Tiago olhava para o outro lado. por isso Tiago não viu o sinal.
Pedro recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Pedro está zangado. porque é que Pedro está zangado? porque Pedro recebeu um comentário injusto.
Pedro dormiu pouco. por isso Pedro cansa-se mais depressa.
porque é que uma pessoa tem medo quando não sabe o que vai acontecer? porque o desconhecido não se pode prever: quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. porquê? porque uma pessoa só vê aquilo para onde olha.
porque é que as pessoas se zangam com comentários injustos? porque uma pessoa espera ser tratada com justiça.
porque é que uma pessoa se cansa mais depressa quando dorme pouco? porque o sono repõe as forças.
Maria tem fome. por isso Maria procura comida. porque é que Maria procura comida? porque Maria tem fome.
Maria fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Maria fá-lo sem pensar.
Ana perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Ana está triste. porque é que Ana está triste? porque Ana perdeu uma coisa querida.
Ana repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Ana lembra-se melhor delas.
Rui tem fome. por isso Rui procura comida. porque é que Rui procura comida? porque Rui tem fome.
Rui fá-lo todos os dias. por isso Rui fá-lo sem pensar.
Tiago perdeu uma coisa querida. por isso Tiago está triste. porque é que Tiago está triste? porque Tiago perdeu uma coisa querida.
Tiago repetiu as palavras muitas vezes. por isso Tiago lembra-se melhor delas.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa tem fome, procura comida? porque o corpo pede o que lhe falta.
porque é que as pessoas fazem sem pensar o que fazem todos os dias? porque a repetição torna um gesto habitual: quando uma pessoa faz algo todos os dias, fá-lo sem pensar.
porque é que uma pessoa está triste quando perde uma coisa querida? porque sente falta do que lhe era querido: quando uma pessoa perde uma coisa querida, está triste.
quando uma pessoa repete palavras muitas vezes, lembra-se melhor delas. porquê? porque a repetição reforça a memória.
Rita está cansada. por isso Rita comete mais erros. porque é que Rita comete mais erros? porque Rita está cansada.
Rita quer chegar a tempo. por isso Rita apressa-se.
Maria recebeu um presente. por isso Maria está contente. porque é que Maria está contente? porque Maria recebeu um presente.
Maria não tem nada para fazer. por isso Maria aborrece-se.
João está cansado. por isso João comete mais erros. porque é que João comete mais erros? porque João está cansado.
João quer chegar a tempo. por isso João apressa-se.
Rui recebeu um presente. por isso Rui está contente. porque é que Rui está contente? porque Rui recebeu um presente.
Rui não tem nada para fazer. por isso Rui aborrece-se.
quando uma pessoa está cansada, comete mais erros. Tiago está cansado. portanto Tiago comete mais erros.
quando uma pessoa quer chegar a tempo, apressa-se. Pedro quer chegar a tempo. portanto Pedro apressa-se.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa recebe um presente, está contente? porque um presente mostra que alguém pensa nela.
porque é que as pessoas se aborrecem quando não têm nada para fazer? porque o tempo sem ocupação parece longo: quando uma pessoa não tem nada para fazer, aborrece-se.
as pessoas comem. porque é que as pessoas comem? para não ter fome.
Sofia não sabe o que vai acontecer. por isso Sofia tem medo.
Rita olhava para o outro lado. por isso Rita não viu o sinal. porque é que Rita não viu o sinal? porque Rita olhava para o outro lado.
Rita recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso Rita está zangada.
Maria dormiu pouco. por isso Maria cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Maria cansa-se mais depressa? porque Maria dormiu pouco.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Ana não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Ana tem medo.
João olhava para o outro lado. por isso João não viu o sinal. porque é que João não viu o sinal? porque João olhava para o outro lado.
João recebeu um comentário injusto. por isso João está zangado.
Rui dormiu pouco. por isso Rui cansa-se mais depressa. porque é que Rui cansa-se mais depressa? porque Rui dormiu pouco.
quando uma pessoa não sabe o que vai acontecer, tem medo. Rui não sabe o que vai acontecer. portanto Rui tem medo.
quando uma pessoa olha para o outro lado, não vê o sinal. Tiago olhava para o outro lado. portanto Tiago não viu o sinal.
quando uma pessoa recebe um comentário injusto, está zangada. Pedro recebeu um comentário injusto. portanto Pedro está zangado.
porque é que, quando uma pessoa dorme pouco, cansa-se mais depressa? porque o sono repõe as forças.

waarom is een mens bang als hij niet weet wat er komt? omdat het onbekende niet te voorzien is.
Jan keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Jan het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Jan het teken niet gezien? omdat Jan de andere kant op keek.
Maria heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Maria boos. waarom is Maria boos? omdat Maria een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
waarom leren mensen? om meer te kunnen.
Piet wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Piet zich.
Anna heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Anna blij.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. waarom? omdat herhaling het geheugen versterkt.
als een mens honger heeft, zoekt hij eten. Jan heeft honger. dus zoekt Jan eten.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Maria doet het elke dag. dus doet Maria het zonder na te denken.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. waarom is hij boos? omdat een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt.
Jan heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Jan sneller moe.
Tim weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Tim bang.
Lotte keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Lotte het teken niet gezien.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Tim heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Tim zich.
Jan is moe. daarom maakt Jan meer fouten. waarom maakt Jan meer fouten? omdat Jan moe is.
Maria wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Maria zich. waarom haast Maria zich? omdat Maria op tijd wil komen.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Piet is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Piet verdrietig.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Anna heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Anna ze beter.
Anna heeft honger. daarom zoekt Anna eten.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. waarom? omdat een mens alleen ziet waar hij naar kijkt.
Max heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Max boos. waarom is Max boos? omdat Max een onterechte opmerking heeft gekregen.
Eva heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Eva sneller moe. waarom wordt Eva sneller moe? omdat Eva weinig heeft geslapen.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. waarom haast hij zich? omdat een mens op tijd wil komen.
Jan heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Jan blij.
Maria heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Maria zich.
Lotte is moe. daarom maakt Lotte meer fouten.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken. Tim doet het elke dag. dus doet Tim het zonder na te denken.
als een mens iets dierbaars kwijtraakt, is hij verdrietig. Lotte is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. dus is Lotte verdrietig.
waarom worden mensen sneller moe als ze weinig slapen? omdat slaap de krachten herstelt.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Piet weet niet wat er komt. dus is Piet bang.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Anna keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Anna het teken niet gezien.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. waarom? omdat vermoeidheid de aandacht verzwakt.
Max wil op tijd komen. daarom haast Max zich. waarom haast Max zich? omdat Max op tijd wil komen.
Eva heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Eva blij. waarom is Eva blij? omdat Eva een cadeau heeft gekregen.
als een mens woorden vaak herhaalt, onthoudt hij ze beter. Max heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. dus onthoudt Max ze beter.
Jan heeft honger. daarom zoekt Jan eten.
Maria doet het elke dag. daarom doet Maria het zonder na te denken.
waarom worden mensen boos om onterechte opmerkingen? omdat een mens verwacht eerlijk behandeld te worden: als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos.
Tim heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Tim sneller moe. waarom wordt Tim sneller moe? omdat Tim weinig heeft geslapen.
als een mens niet weet wat er komt, is hij bang. Lotte weet niet wat er komt. dus is Lotte bang.
waarom zijn mensen blij met cadeaus? omdat een cadeau laat zien dat iemand aan hem denkt.
Max heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Max zich.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Anna is moe. dus maakt Anna meer fouten.
als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken.
Piet is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Piet verdrietig. waarom is Piet verdrietig? omdat Piet iets dierbaars is kwijtgeraakt.
Anna heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Anna ze beter. waarom onthoudt Anna ze beter? omdat Anna de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
Eva heeft honger. daarom zoekt Eva eten. waarom zoekt Eva eten? omdat Eva honger heeft.
als een mens de andere kant op kijkt, ziet hij het teken niet. Max keek de andere kant op. dus heeft Max het teken niet gezien.
als een mens een onterechte opmerking krijgt, is hij boos. Eva heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. dus is Eva boos.
mensen slapen. waarom slapen mensen? om uit te rusten.
waarom haasten mensen zich als ze op tijd willen komen? omdat er minder tijd over is dan nodig is: als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich.
Tim heeft een cadeau gekregen. daarom is Tim blij. waarom is Tim blij? omdat Tim een cadeau heeft gekregen.
Lotte heeft niets te doen. daarom verveelt Lotte zich. waarom verveelt Lotte zich? omdat Lotte niets te doen heeft.
waarom zoeken mensen eten als ze honger hebben? omdat het lichaam vraagt wat het mist.
Max doet het elke dag. daarom doet Max het zonder na te denken.
Eva is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Eva verdrietig.
als een mens weinig slaapt, wordt hij sneller moe. Jan heeft weinig geslapen. dus wordt Jan sneller moe.
Piet weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Piet bang. waarom is Piet bang? omdat Piet niet weet wat er komt.
Anna keek de andere kant op. daarom heeft Anna het teken niet gezien. waarom heeft Anna het teken niet gezien? omdat Anna de andere kant op keek.
waarom verveelt een mens zich als hij niets te doen heeft? omdat tijd zonder bezigheid lang lijkt: als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich.
als een mens moe is, maakt hij meer fouten. Max is moe. dus maakt Max meer fouten.
als een mens op tijd wil komen, haast hij zich. Eva wil op tijd komen. dus haast Eva zich.
waarom is een mens verdrietig als hij iets dierbaars kwijtraakt? omdat hij mist wat hem dierbaar was.
Jan heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Jan ze beter. waarom onthoudt Jan ze beter? omdat Jan de woorden vaak heeft herhaald.
Tim heeft honger. daarom zoekt Tim eten. waarom zoekt Tim eten? omdat Tim honger heeft.
Lotte doet het elke dag. daarom doet Lotte het zonder na te denken. waarom doet Lotte het zonder na te denken? omdat Lotte het elke dag doet.
Piet heeft een onterechte opmerking gekregen. daarom is Piet boos.
Anna heeft weinig geslapen. daarom wordt Anna sneller moe.
Eva weet niet wat er komt. daarom is Eva bang.
als een mens een cadeau krijgt, is hij blij. Jan heeft een cadeau gekregen. dus is Jan blij.
als een mens niets te doen heeft, verveelt hij zich. Maria heeft niets te doen. dus verveelt Maria zich.
Anna is moe. daarom maakt Anna meer fouten. waarom maakt Anna meer fouten? omdat Anna moe is.
waarom doet een mens zonder na te denken wat hij elke dag doet? omdat herhaling een handeling tot gewoonte maakt: als een mens iets elke dag doet, doet hij het zonder na te denken.
Tim is iets dierbaars kwijtgeraakt. daarom is Tim verdrietig.
Lotte heeft de woorden vaak herhaald. daarom onthoudt Lotte ze beter.

kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się.
Zofia robi to codziennie. dlatego Zofia robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego Zofia robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ Zofia robi to codziennie.
Zofia straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Zofia jest smutna.
Ewa wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Ewa lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Ewa lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Ewa wiele razy powtórzyła słowa.
kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia. Ewa jest głodna. więc Ewa szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Maria robi to codziennie. więc Maria robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Anna straciła coś bliskiego. więc Anna jest smutna.
Adam wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Adam lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego Adam lepiej je pamięta? ponieważ Adam wiele razy powtórzył słowa.
Piotr jest głodny. dlatego Piotr szuka jedzenia.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. Adam robi to codziennie. więc Adam robi to bez namysłu.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny. Marek stracił coś bliskiego. więc Marek jest smutny.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. Jan wiele razy powtórzył słowa. więc Jan lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego człowiek szuka jedzenia, kiedy jest głodny? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje.
kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu. dlaczego robi to bez namysłu? ponieważ człowiek robi coś codziennie.
kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny.
Zofia nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Zofia się nudzi. dlaczego Zofia się nudzi? ponieważ Zofia nie ma nic do roboty.
Anna jest zmęczona. dlatego Anna popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Zofia chce zdążyć. więc Zofia się spieszy.
kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się. Ewa dostała prezent. więc Ewa się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Maria nie ma nic do roboty. więc Maria się nudzi.
Jan jest zmęczony. dlatego Jan popełnia więcej błędów.
Piotr chce zdążyć. dlatego Piotr się spieszy. dlaczego Piotr się spieszy? ponieważ Piotr chce zdążyć.
Piotr dostał prezent. dlatego Piotr się cieszy.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. Adam nie ma nic do roboty. więc Adam się nudzi.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego? bo zmęczenie osłabia uwagę.
dlaczego ludzie się spieszą, kiedy chcą zdążyć? bo zostaje mniej czasu, niż potrzeba.
dlaczego człowiek cieszy się, kiedy dostaje prezent? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta.
kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się. dlaczego nudzi się? ponieważ człowiek nie ma nic do roboty.
dlaczego człowiek śpi? żeby odpocząć.
Anna nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Anna się boi. dlaczego Anna się boi? ponieważ Anna nie wie, co będzie.
Anna patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Anna nie zobaczyła znaku.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Zofia dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Zofia się złości.
kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy. Ewa mało spała. więc Ewa szybciej się męczy.
Jan nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Jan się boi. dlaczego Jan się boi? ponieważ Jan nie wie, co będzie.
Jan patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Jan nie zobaczył znaku.
Piotr dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Piotr się złości. dlaczego Piotr się złości? ponieważ Piotr dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę.
Piotr mało spał. dlatego Piotr szybciej się męczy.
dlaczego człowiek boi się, kiedy nie wie, co będzie? bo nieznanego nie można przewidzieć: kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. dlaczego? bo człowiek widzi tylko to, na co patrzy.
dlaczego ludzie złoszczą się na niesprawiedliwe uwagi? bo człowiek oczekuje, że zostanie potraktowany sprawiedliwie.
dlaczego człowiek szybciej się męczy, kiedy mało śpi? bo sen przywraca siły.
Maria jest głodna. dlatego Maria szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Maria szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Maria jest głodna.
Maria robi to codziennie. dlatego Maria robi to bez namysłu.
Anna straciła coś bliskiego. dlatego Anna jest smutna. dlaczego Anna jest smutna? ponieważ Anna straciła coś bliskiego.
Anna wiele razy powtórzyła słowa. dlatego Anna lepiej je pamięta.
Marek jest głodny. dlatego Marek szuka jedzenia. dlaczego Marek szuka jedzenia? ponieważ Marek jest głodny.
Marek robi to codziennie. dlatego Marek robi to bez namysłu.
Jan stracił coś bliskiego. dlatego Jan jest smutny. dlaczego Jan jest smutny? ponieważ Jan stracił coś bliskiego.
Jan wiele razy powtórzył słowa. dlatego Jan lepiej je pamięta.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek jest głodny, szuka jedzenia? bo ciało domaga się tego, czego mu brakuje.
dlaczego ludzie robią bez namysłu to, co robią codziennie? bo powtarzanie czyni czynność nawykiem: kiedy człowiek robi coś codziennie, robi to bez namysłu.
dlaczego człowiek jest smutny, kiedy traci coś bliskiego? bo brakuje mu tego, co było mu bliskie: kiedy człowiek traci coś bliskiego, jest smutny.
kiedy człowiek wiele razy powtarza słowa, lepiej je pamięta. dlaczego? bo powtarzanie wzmacnia pamięć.
Ewa jest zmęczona. dlatego Ewa popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Ewa popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Ewa jest zmęczona.
Ewa chce zdążyć. dlatego Ewa się spieszy.
Maria dostała prezent. dlatego Maria się cieszy. dlaczego Maria się cieszy? ponieważ Maria dostała prezent.
Maria nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Maria się nudzi.
Adam jest zmęczony. dlatego Adam popełnia więcej błędów. dlaczego Adam popełnia więcej błędów? ponieważ Adam jest zmęczony.
Adam chce zdążyć. dlatego Adam się spieszy.
Marek dostał prezent. dlatego Marek się cieszy. dlaczego Marek się cieszy? ponieważ Marek dostał prezent.
Marek nie ma nic do roboty. dlatego Marek się nudzi.
kiedy człowiek jest zmęczony, popełnia więcej błędów. Jan jest zmęczony. więc Jan popełnia więcej błędów.
kiedy człowiek chce zdążyć, spieszy się. Piotr chce zdążyć. więc Piotr się spieszy.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek dostaje prezent, cieszy się? bo prezent pokazuje, że ktoś o nim pamięta.
dlaczego ludzie nudzą się, kiedy nie mają nic do roboty? bo czas bez zajęcia wydaje się długi: kiedy człowiek nie ma nic do roboty, nudzi się.
ludzie jedzą. dlaczego ludzie jedzą? żeby nie być głodnym.
Zofia nie wie, co będzie. dlatego Zofia się boi.
Ewa patrzyła w inną stronę. dlatego Ewa nie zobaczyła znaku. dlaczego Ewa nie zobaczyła znaku? ponieważ Ewa patrzyła w inną stronę.
Ewa dostała niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Ewa się złości.
Maria mało spała. dlatego Maria szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Maria szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Maria mało spała.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Anna nie wie, co będzie. więc Anna się boi.
Adam patrzył w inną stronę. dlatego Adam nie zobaczył znaku. dlaczego Adam nie zobaczył znaku? ponieważ Adam patrzył w inną stronę.
Adam dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. dlatego Adam się złości.
Marek mało spał. dlatego Marek szybciej się męczy. dlaczego Marek szybciej się męczy? ponieważ Marek mało spał.
kiedy człowiek nie wie, co będzie, boi się. Marek nie wie, co będzie. więc Marek się boi.
kiedy człowiek patrzy w inną stronę, nie widzi znaku. Jan patrzył w inną stronę. więc Jan nie zobaczył znaku.
kiedy człowiek dostaje niesprawiedliwą uwagę, złości się. Piotr dostał niesprawiedliwą uwagę. więc Piotr się złości.
dlaczego, kiedy człowiek mało śpi, szybciej się męczy? bo sen przywraca siły.
